RANDOLPH,
A NOVEL
.
By the author of Loganand Seventy-six.
IN TWO VOLUMES.
VOL. I
.
LETTER I.
Baltimore
,
24
th Nov.
18.
No
, dear; you are mistaken in Molton. He is not the
abject creature that you believe. I have no proof to
offer
you, it is true;nothing but my bare word; and that
too, founded upon an interview of ten minutes. But,
nevertheless
,
I do entreat you to believe me; or, if that be too
much, Sarah, let me beg that you suspend your opinion
awhile, and not express it, to any human creature, until
you are assured that you are not wronging a noble
nature
.
I wish that you could have seen him, cousin, when I
handed your note to him. You would have given up all
your prejudices, I am sure, on the spot; nayyou would
have wept. As he read it, I saw a slight convulsion pass
over his broad forehead;it contracted a little too, and
then, there was a quiet hectick; and his patient light blue
eyes flashed fire;and, if I must tell the truth, there was
an angry fierceness in his look, for a single moment, that,
in spite of myself, made me tremble; but, when this was
followed, as it was, almost immediately, by a mortal
paleness, and a slow, calm movement of the arm and
hand, as he reached out the billet to me, it was really
appalling. It almost took my strength away. Such a
delicate creature,so effeminate, and sickly!it is
unaccountable
to me, how his presence should so affect me.
I took the billetI read it.Shall I confess the truth,
Sarah? I was shocked. All that you had told me, might
be true;he might be that consummate villain; as
plausible
,
and as cowardly, as you had persuaded me to believe
him;but never did I so falter and wane before any
mortal
man, as before that feeble and emaciated being;
with whom I had sought a quarrel; against whom,
forgetting
my own manhood, I had volunteered so many
maledictions. Sarahhear me!By heaven, we have
wronged him! I care not what proof you have to offer
me;nay, though it be that of your own sensesor mine
I would sooner doubt them both, than believe that
Edward
Molton is a scoundrel. Nothe great God of
heaven would not permit a scoundrel, so to profane and
counterfeit the heroick bearing of innocence. Are you
not amazed?I am. I read over what I have written.
I think over all that has passed since we parted; and I
look in upon myself, with a strange feeling of doubt and
perplexity. How is my opinion changed!how have I
confirmed all your predictions, when you bade me
beware
of listening to him, or looking upon him. You
foretold this;yet I laughed at you.You said that, if I
permitted myself to hearken to him, I was lost. I
have
hearkened to him.He has used no argument;no
expostulation
;
no entreaty; no defence; yet, I declare to you,
my dear Sarah, that I am ready, at this moment, as you
said I should be, to bleed and die for Edward Molton
for whom?Righteous heaven! for the destroyer of
Juliet
the
murderer of William.Yes, yes!give me more
proofmore!I am not satisfied;or, I shall turn
apostate
to my cousin's memory; yea, battle for the man that
slew him; and bleed for him, that spoiled and blasted the
sweetest creature, by the God who made methat ever
inhabited this earth.
O! Sarah, what is this surpassing, and mysterious
power? Is not Edward Molton fashioned like ourselves?
feebler, it may be, in physical, and in intellectual
resource
?
and yet, if they, that know him, are to be
believed
,
so damnable a villain, that his very breath is poison,
insinuating itself, like a subtile vapour into the sound
and pure of heart; and there operating, like death, till
all is blackness and ashes. But can this be? Would our
Maker permit it? Are we to have no defence; not even
from wisdom, doubt, or experience, against the wily and
insidious? I am not old, it is true; but I have seen much
of the world; and I never yet saw a confirmed villain, in
whose lineaments, the Deity himself, had not written his
B 2
history and character. And yet, here is a face,
youthful
,
frank, open and dignified, where there is not a line,
nor a shadow, but what looks like the boundary or
communication
between kingdoms, upon a map,rather than
the secret and dark tracking of banditti; and yet, you
would have me believe that he is a magician in power,
and a devil in heart; confirmed and established, in the
most appalling and deliberate criminality. I cannot
believe
this, Sarah. I choose rather to believe that we are
deceived, in some likelier way. But, if I should write
forever, I could not communicate a thousandth part of
what I feel toward that man,that
injured man
. I say
this, boldly;I am ready to meet your ridicule, perhaps
your scorn;but, I will not stir another step in the
affair
no,
not even to call him out, which I would rather
do, a hundred times, than suffer the compunction that I
now feel, for having thought of such a thing. Sarah;
can you believe me!I was afraid, yes, actually
afraid
to tell him my errand;and, to this moment, he does not
know that I had aught else with him, than to deliver your
note. Farewell!I am prepared for all that you can
say. Yet I shall meet you, without trembling. I am
prepared even to be classed with the fools and coxcombs,
that are also subject to him;nay, prepared to have my
motives, and possibly my personal courage impeached.
But noI am wrong;forgive me, Sarah.
You
will not
be so unkind;
you
will only say what you believethat
I am infatuated.
Farewell
,
JOHN OMAR.
Miss Sarah Ramsay, New-York
.
LETTER II. REPLY.
New-York
,
29
th November
.
Is
it possible!
I pity you
. Your letter, dear John,
arrived almost as soon as we. I received it, in the
parlour, and, though I trembled, I am sure, from head
to foot, yet I had the presence of mind to open and read
it, by the side of my father and mother. This was the
only
course left to me; for your imprudence, in directing it
as you did, made them watch every movement of my
countenance; and what could I have done, if my father,
my kind, dear father, had asked me for it? O, let me
entreat
you cousin, to be less precipitate. It will be fatal
to you, one day or other, I am sure. You are so direct,
sudden, and rash, that I am always quaking for you.
I am interrupted     ah!
I am called      I have
returned
and left them all talking about you; but, I have only
a moment to spare, lest my absence may be taken notice of.
There are only two things, or perhaps three, that I have
time to say now; and they are these. You
are
infatuated.
Edward
is
a villain: but I want you to tell me, exactly,
how he looked and
acted
, (for he is a masterly actor, and
can deceive any human being, youthful and artless as he
appears, with the counterfeit of any passion, feeling,
character or emotion.) Let me hear this, by the return
mail; and I will then inform you of some other
circumstances
that have come to my knowledge, since I left
Baltimore
.
But there is one favour, that I have to request of
you;be a little more temperate in your style. You
know my opinion of such things. I hate fine writing in
a letter, just as I hate fine talking in conversation.
Adieu
,
S.
P. S. I forgot to say, that, notwithstanding my
prediction
,
I am really amazed, astonished and confounded at
your extravagance. Nay,although I foretold it, I did
not believe it myself, cousinthat you,
you
should have
been such a  upon my word, if out of the abundance
of the heart, the pen had written,you would have found
rather an ungracious word, where that blank is. But
tell me how he managed you. Defend yourself, I
entreat
you; Johnhearken to medefend yourself, or I
shall despise you. Nay;at this momentSarah, the
proud, unfeeling Sarah
, is weeping for youweeping
with shame and vexation. These blisters on the paper,
these blots and blursJohn! I do not often weep;
but, if you do not give me better reasons, than any that
I can imagine, in your unexampled apostacy, I shall be
tempted to swear, never again to shed a tear, whatever
may become of you;nay, to requite you with scorn and
derision, for the distress that I feel at this moment.
After
all that I had said to you, too! Why, pride would
have withheld you, if you were like any other human
being
.
But, good bye!let me hear, immediately; I shall
not sleep, till you are restored to my respect.
S.
EDWARD MOLTON TO MARY HOWARD.
Washington
, .
I shall obey you, imperious girl. You know your
power
,
and you abuse it. It is as I foretold you, when I
detected
the first yearning of your heart. But beware!
no woman shall hold me in thraldom longer than I can
revere her. Love!O Mary!
you
know not what love
is. Do I?look at me;look in that glassthere is the
face of the haughty Edward. That death-like aspect
these sunken templesthat is
thy
work. I do not know
myself. The fire of my eyes, it may be, is not yet
utterly
quenched; but God knows that it soon will be. And,
even now, there is something in their lustre, unlike the
colour or brightness of health; and were I to see it in the
eyes of another, in thine, Mary, I should weep;but, as
it is, there is a melancholy gladness about my heart, that
comforts it, like the touch of a beloved hand, gently put
upon a wounded part.
My character is gone. What of that? It was
sacrificed
to thee. My health is blasteddeath is within me
my vitals are decaying;I can feel them weakening
and detaching themselves, while I write, like the
filaments
of life from a dead heart;but what of that?
Thou art the happier for it.
Even now, I was on the point of slaying another man
to thee! O woman! woman! what art thou made of? So
beautiful, yet so deadly! I hear the echo of his
departing
step, now. The noise of the door, that he hath shut
after him, is sounding in my ears
now
, like something
miraculous; as if a dead man had arisen, from before my
feet, and walked leisurely away from me. What saved
him, Mary? I know not, unless it be his resemblance
totoby heaven, I will
write
it, though it kill thee!
to Juliet!
...... there!.......
He knows not that I suspected his errand; no!for, if
he had, he should never have left my presence, alive!
What! bearded, baited, cursed and threatened, by
children
,
even in the solitude of my own chamber! No.
George, George!it was well for thy brother, and for
thine too. William, poor William, that I was not obliged
to trample on another of your headlong, impetuous blood.
But let me proceed more gently. Here is the precious
note that he brought. O, would that the writer were a
man! Read itread it, Mary, and tell me that you
wonder
at me. You oughtyou willI have surpassed
myself
.
The boy came to murder me, and he went away
my vassal. What a retinue I shall have!the gallant,
the athletick, the noble in heart, the wise, all subject to
me
me!
a weak and miserable creature, on whom the
weakest might set his foot
if he dared
. Read it!and
wonder, as I do, that my heart was not shivered into
ten thousand pieces, when I read it.
(NOTE ENCLOSED.)
Baltimore
, ,
Monday morning
.
Sir
If you dare to set your foot within my father's house,
you shall be treated as you deserve,
by the servants
. I
will not see you. My opinions are well founded, and
not to be shaken. I shall be on my return to New-York,
when you receive this: and there is then, only one thing
that you can do, to alter or change my hatred and
contempt
for you;and that is, to repent and die. You have
slandered a woman, whose only fault was her
tenderness
for you. You have not the courage, and the
greatness
to acknowledge it: and, I believe, are too abject,
even to take the field in defence of your own miserable
villany. Farewell, sir. I do not pray that you may be
hanged, or drawn and quartered; nobut I do pray that
you may live, till your heart ache at the recollection of
your crime, as mine does at this moment, while I say that
I pray God, in his mercy, to forgive me for having
pronounced
or written your name. Once more, farewell.
Do not flatter yourself that I have avoided you from fear.
No.I do not fear you; but I loathe and abhor you, as
something unnatural and base. You are welcome to
show this letter,
if you dare;
the name I shall write,
at full length, giving you all the advantage of your
meanness; and you may show it, as I have no doubt that
you will, to prove that you are on good terms with one
of many, that detest and execrate you. I have told the
bearer to avoid youthat you were to be avoided and
shunned.
SARAH RAMSAY.
Now, what think you, Mary? Is not that about enough
for mortal patience? What would you do? Advise me
counsel me. Shall I follow her to New-York, to France,
to the ends of the earthtill I accomplish my purpose?
What say you?speak but the word, and so sure as my
name is Edward Moltonso sure as I am beloved of
thee, thou terrible woman, so sure will I bring that
naughty girl to my feet
as I have thee
. Nay, start not,
Mary. Is it not true? Thou thinkest that I am in
thy
power. TrueI am;to a certain degree, I am;but
thou art abundantly more in mine. What! do I boast?
I do, and defy theeeven
thee
, thou mysterious and
passionate
creature, with all thy loveliness and wrath, to
rebel. And why? Because
thou
fearest to die; and I do
not.
Thou
wouldst not survive my abandonment of thee;
thou wouldst go to thy grave, guilty, broken hearted,
and shivering. But II should die like a heroa
martyr
,
in my own blaze, laughing at the devils that
beckoned
to me, and covering up my poor shattered heart, in
its mortal spasms, from all, but most of all, from thee:
for thou, woman, were I dying for thee, shouldst never
know it;and I would haunt thee, yea, I
would
, forever
and ever, for thy desertion of meeven if thou wert
unfaithful
to my memory. What! have I not purchased
thee?purchased thee, in blood? And shall I permit
another
to approach thee?never! And better 'twere for
him, to penetrate the cavern where sleeps the young
panther
,
under the watch of its famished mother, than go
near where thou art sleeping! Mary!I would make the
world a solitude, had I the power, were one of its
inhabitants
but to think of thee, irreverently.
I intended to tell thee how I received the boy, that
came to fight me; but I must defer it, till I meet thee.
I overcame himI put the billet into his hand;and, after
a few words, I was calm, very calmI bade him go in
peace. He thought that I knew not his errand;and
well for him was it, that he
did
think so. Death! that I
must conceal and darken the working of my soul before
such children! I cannot tell thee, Mary, how I did it;
but, I
did
it. In one word,I conquered him.
Thine, forever,
Farewell!
EDWARD.
JOHN TO SARAH.
Annapolis
,
(Md.) Dec.
.
I shall try to be
temperate
in my reply. Whether I
shall succeed or not, will depend upon the route that my
thoughts take. At present, I feel calm, and
affectionately
disposed; but you have wounded me, somewhat cruelly
Sarah, and somewhat carelessly;and my nature may
take fire;yetno, my dear SarahI will not believe
it; it was
not
unkindly meant, and I cannot retalite
upon you.
Your sentiments, respecting an epistolary style, are
precisely my own. Nothing is so tiresome to me, as the
conversation of one that talks like a book; and what
is good letter writing, but written conversation?free,
natural, and unstudied, touching us rather, with its
readiness
,
and simplicity, like the playfulness of a well bred
woman, or the pleasantry of one, thatah! I am
transgressing
again, sono more of that.
Of Molton. When he handed me your letter, I read
it; and, I am not ashamed to say, that I read it, as for the
first time. How different did it appear to me, while you
read it, with your lips quivering, and your eyes darting
fire about them, when I thought that he deserved your
keenest, deadliest invective. But when I read it in his
presence; that calm, beautiful self-possession, that gentle
and deep serenity of his, which seemed disquieted but for
a single moment, as he read, I am sure, with a
convulsion
at his heart;
that
unmanned me; I could have wept
almost, for having so dishonoured him. Abuse me,
Sarah
;
I can endure it;but the truth I must tell. When
I had done, I reached the letter back to him, without
daring to lift my eyes to his face. I was overpowered
with shame and sorrow, for the part that I had acted; and
yet I was unspeakably happy that I had not, after my
nature
,
abruptly insulted him, at once; and that continues
to be a great consolation to me.
But what converted me, you ask. Let me tell you.
The repose and steadiness of his look;the quiet,
habitual
dignity of his motion;the musick of his voice, so
manly and composed, so unlike what I looked for, from
one so emaciated and girlish. Little and effeminate men
are so apt to be petulant and waspish, you know.
He was leaning upon his hand. A silence, I should think,
of four or five minutes, followed; after which, he slowly
raised his head. His pale blue eyes had become
intensely
dark; and his light, silky hair, was disordered,
strangely, by his hands, just as if he had been tearing it
while I was looking down upon the floor.
It is hard to bear, said he, looking me full in the
face,and I have only one reply to make to it. Do
you
believe that I deserve it?
The question was so abrupt, that it disturbed me; and
I knew not what I said; but, to my last hour, Sarah, I
shall not forget what
he
saidno, nor what he
did
.
He arose, and came to me;deliberately folded his
arms: and never changed his attitude, or voice, or look,
till I was ready to fall at his feet.
Sir, said he,I understand your embarrassment.
I knew the cause. Your cousin Sarah, a high minded,
but very imprudent girl;nay sir, you will hear me out,
I hopehas endeavoured to persuade herself, that I am
an accomplished villain; nay, to persuade you. You are
young and passionate, precipitate perhaps; and you
adopted
her opinions. But you had never seen me. She had
never seen me. You have set with me but a few moments,
and are convinced that you have done me wrong. Is this
wise? Is it not as great an infirmity, to retract an
opinion
hastily
, as to adopt, or advance it, hastily? If you
are generous, I have you in my power; for, where the
generous have done wrong, their atonement is
disproportionate
,
enthusiastick, injudicious. I am unwilling to
take advantage of this. But I wish you to judge for
yourself
.
I do not ask you to go among my friends;(his
countenance darkenedit was even melancholy) for I
have no
friends
; but I bid you go among my enemies.
Listen to them,hear their stories, examine
them
; and
if they be not more cunningly devised, than slander and
falsehood usually are, you will find enough there,
without
hearing the other side, to set your heart at rest.
Their stories neutralize each other. Am I so artful, as
they pretend? Then how can they, poor simpletons!
so plainly foretel my designs?
Am I so cautious? So difficult to elude, or detect?
so wise too, as they pretend? Then how happens it, that
so many of my secret and portentous conspiracies, the most
subtly conceived;the most darkly perpetrated;are a
subject of familiar gossipping to the whole city? What
am I able to blind the good and wise; to set the laws of
my country at defiance? laugh to scorn the ministers of
justice;baffle them all
all!
except the feeble, and timid,
and shortsighted? Am I so weak, think you?so very
weak, and foolish, as to lay bare the mysterious and
hidden
operations of my heart, before women and children?
...... sir... I leave you to judge of me, for
yourself
.......
You have been cautioned against me.
C
I see it in your eyes. You think better of me than you
intended to;nay,for it has been a common expedient
with that extraordinary woman, your cousin, the bitterest
enemy that I have on earth, I believe, and perhaps the
most to be dreaded... You have been told... yes, I
see that you have... your emotion betrays you,...
your conscience is in your face
you have wronged
me, Sir!
What then? Do I reproach you for it? No.
I forgive you....... Nay, as I was about to say,
you have been cautioned against me, as a being of
consummate
address
(I started, and looked him full in the
face;but he betrayed no emotion. Was it chance? or
how was it that he used your very words?) One whom,
it would he fatal to your faculties... to your liberty,
to approach!..... Did you believe her? Did she
believe it herself? No sir, she did not. Perhaps it was
the rhetorick of the sex... pray, do not be offended
with me
I know your cousin Sarah, better than you do
(What did he mean by that, Sarah? Has he ever seen you?
It could not be an idle boast; such men do not boast;..
nay, it was rather a threat, delicately uttered to be sure;
but, nevertheless, a
threat
, which I should have resented
on the spot, but for what followed.) She is a generous,
heroick girl; but she has wronged me, and shall one day
confess it. (This was said, in a tone of such solemnity,
that my blood thrilled... it was really awful... it
sounded like prophecy.)
No Sir. She did
not
believe it. But she knew this,
that a man must be magnanimous indeed, who would
dare to be the
friend
of another, whom he had heard
called
a villain;nay, of one, whom he himself, it may be, had
called a villain,after he had been told too, that such was
the power and authority of that villain, that no man could
withstand, or resist him!.... Is it not so? She
affected
to believe that you were
convinced
when you were
not
when you only suspected itof my evil nature
and she predicted, nevertheless, that you would become
my friend, the moment that I opened my mouth... O,
it was indeed a masterly contrivance!... for, no
matter
what proof I offered, there is not one man in a
thousand
,
nay, in ten thousand, who after such a prediction
would dare to believe me an injured fellow creature;
and still less, is there one that would dare to avow it.
I have doneFarewell, Sir.
This was, as nearly as I can relate it, dear Sarah, the
substance
of our conversation. But his
manner
, that it
was, which oppressed me. I felt humble and heart
smitten
while he spoke,.... I forgot the little difference
in our ages; and I listened to him, I declare to you, like
one who hears patiently, some much older, and wiser,
and better man, upbraiding and admonishing him, with
the voice of compassionate authority... What did I,
when he had done?.... Ask me Sarah, ask me, if thou
durst... I gave him my hand;and I would have
fallen upon his neck.... and I would have wept, but
for the shame that I felt to weep before such a noble
creature
.
I awoke, as from a trance, when he had finished; and
all the echo of his deep solemn voice had died away. I saw
his great heart heave, as I took his hand; and there was
a motion of his fingers, after they passed hurriedly through
his beautiful hair, and over his hollow clear temples,
just as if he dashed away a tear with them. ThereI
have made my defence. Despise me, if thou canst.
Scorn me, trample on me; but remember, there will be a
day of retribution for thee. Sarah! I can see thee
weeping
...
Gracious Godsurely I
do
see something...
............... I left off
abruptly Sarah, for my candle was very low; and,
perhaps
,
the painful agitation, in which I have been kept for
a whole week, together with the unpleasant, strange
solitude
,
about this old house, was the cause of a singular
deceptionhark!........
Again!.. it is very strange... I
could have sworn that some one was breathing near me;
and, as I turned, there was a soft sound, that, to my ear,
seemed like naked feet... passing secretly away
from my elbow... I wish that I was out of this
uncomfortable old mansion,these fancies are very
childish
,
to be sure; and yet, they agitate me, as if I were some
fooolish girl, shut up in one of the old haunted ruins of
... but this will never do... On looking
back, I find that I was about saying that I could almost
see thee weeping; yes, weeping Sarah, in contrition and
bitterness, for what thou hast said of Molton. Good
night!.. It is dark as Egypt already; and these last
words are scribbled by chance; and all connected
together
,
for I dare not lift my pen from the paper, lest I
should put it down in the wrong place.
Farewell,
Good Night
.
JOHN.
MARY TO EDWARD MOLTON.
Washington
,
Dec.
.
My own dear Edward
,
I have just left the President's house. I have come
away earlydisturbed by another resemblancebut no,
I will not regard it. There are faces that haunt me,
turn where I will; and sometimes, I should almost fancy
myself surrounded by the painted, embroidered puppets of
St. James . But stay, let me divert my thoughts.
I have come away, wearied to death, and heart sick of
their wretched folly and parade. O, Edward, when I
used to listen to thee, till I thought my heart would burst;
and hear thee talk of this great people, so full of
republican
simplicity, so stern and spartan-like, a
commonwealth
of kings, till thy strange face shook all over,
with the passion beneath it, like the reflection of
something
terrible in troubled water; my spirit arose, to
intercede
for them, among the kings, and princes, and
nobility
of Europe.
I scorned and mocked at the follies of the old world;
and my chest heaved to participate in the wise and awful
solemnities of this. Why did I trust to thee, Edward?
Thou art altogether an American. Why did I follow
thee, hither?
Shall I tell thee what I expected to see? I willmen
and womenLacedemonians, at leastcharacterised by
sublime plainness and strengthfull of republican
grandeur
,august
in republican sobriety and steadiness;
deriding, calmly, but with a derision that kings would
not encounter, all the trapping, and appendage, and
parade, and nonsense of royalty. But what have I
found! Edward, I am used to speak plainly; and I shall
not depart from my settled habitude, even thought it may
hurt thee;for thou knowest my veneration for such men
as George Washington, and others, like him, the growth
of America, when God, himself, fought her battles, and
bred her children;and thou wilt endure my plainness,
while I lament her degeneracy.
What have I found ! . I will tell theea
plebeian nobilitya struggle for precedence between the
families of to-dayand the families of yesterday;paltry
titles, given and taken by all ranks, without authority
or right;our worst follies and worst vices awkwardly
imitated and carricatured;talent and virtue in the dust;
greatness under the chariot wheels of wealth;a
republican
court affecting to disdain the patricians of Europe
their titles and diamonds; their regal foolery; the hierarchy
of our churchesand the ermine of our judges and
chancellors
;yet
loaded with dirty finery; crowded and
blazing
with paste jewelry; and Squires and Honours; and
Excellencies
!
and Bishops! O, is it not paltry! Nay,
Edward
,
so ridiculous is this bustle and parade of imitation,
at times, that I should be tempted to laugh at it, outright,
were it not too serious a thing for laughter, when
considered
in its true light,the symptom of a mortal
degeneracy
,
in a brave and great people.
Washington, you must know, and you must know it
in this way too, (for your stay here was quite too short,
for you to make any observation for yourself) is a sort
of metropolis; the city of
magnificent distances
, as the
Abb somebody called it, where people enquire after each
other's health by a telegraph; make love by the
pennypost
and
recognise a difference of fifteen minutes in the
time at their chambers and places of businesswhere, as
in Paris, or London, all the poison and death of the whole
system are concocted at leisure; and whence, they are
distributed
to all the healthy extremities, until they learn
C 2
to languish and palpitate for the unnatural aliment. But I
am getting too serious; and were I disposed to be a little
merry, at one of the most melancholy hours of my life,
which is exactly
this
, I should continue the illustration,
and inform my Edward, that I have lately seen some of the
natural consequences of
excess;
met a few sufficiently
alarming
contractionsdisorders
and
spasms
, within
the last weekah! the door opens   * * * * *
a letter from thee, Edward!O, how welcome to my
exhausted
and sick heart.
I have read it. Boaster!would that I had thee,
here!I knew not what I should dofatigued and
wearried
to death as I am,with thy rebellious and confident
spirit(that is a badly constructed sentence Edward;
it is easily misunderstood, if thou'rt in an evil disposition,
but I have not the heart to mend it.) Ifoh
if
thou
wert here, how could I rebuke thee;indeed, I know
notperhaps, turn to thee, dear, and fall asleep in thy
bosom. O, come to me!It is so wearing, this
impertinent
routine of folly and dissipation, that I had rather
hear thy voice in its sternest mood, when I kneel before
thee, trembling in every joint, than endure this chill and
lonely, desolate feeling, which follows the riotous
excitement
of such a place as : No, I cannot write any
moremy heart is too full good night, Edwardgood
nightdear,
dear
Edwardgood night!
Forever and foreverthine!
MARY .
Morning
.
I have just read thy letter again, Edward. It is
hardly
light enough yet, to see the characters that I trace with
my pencil; and it is exceedingly cold; yet, here I am,
sitting
up in my bed; my port folio before me; and the cold
day-light shining on the paper, with a feeble and sickly
lustrepoh!I will be in better spirits. I will answer
thee, as I would that thou shouldst me, had I written
thee such a letter as thine. Soaway with all
despondency
and complaint. For awhile, I will be proud of
heart, and forget that I am in a land of strangers,
hapless
and aloneguiltyO God!and, perhaps, even now,
now
while I am writing, a
widow
indeed, abandoned,
not by her husband, not by her legitimate lordno, but
by the spoiler of her famethe rifler of her wretched
hearta lover!O, Edward! kill me, if thou wilt, I
can endure
that
, dear, from thy hand; but do not abandon
medo not tell me again that thou
canst
O, nothink
what thou wilt, meditate what thou wiltbut O, in
mercy
,
do not
tell
me, unless thou wouldst see me dying of a
broken heart, upon the threshold of thy dwelling, do
not tell me that thou ever couldst abandon me, whatever
may happen. NoI will notI do not believe it. Thou
durst
notO, Edward forgive me!I am distracted
I know not what I sayYet, thou
durst;
for thou durst
do any thing. Do not be angry with me, dearforgive
me, and do with me what thou wilt;yet do not tell me
so plainly that thou art dyingO, nonor of what thou
couldst dono, no don't do that;do any thing but that.
That
will kill me. Nothing else can. My parents, my
poor parentsthey know that I am not made like other
women;nay, why remind thee of that. Unnatural as
I was to them, thou implacable man, what have I been to
thee, but the most dutiful, the most affectionate, devout
and trembling woman? And couldst thou abandon me?
O, Edward, what have I done to thee, that thou shouldst
darewhat!
dare
againindeed, I forgot myself, but
this language is so natural to me; and then, it would be
so proper, if addressed to any other human creaturethan
to Edward. What wonder then, if I sometimes forget
that thou art an exception to the family of man.
Edward
!
come to meI cannot answer thy letter. I meant
to; I took my pencil up for the purpose; (for the ink is
frozen) but I have been unable to see, plainly, what thou
hast written;my eyes are dim, and blood shotI hope
not with an evil spiritmy own writing looks unlike the
tracing of leadit is fiery, red, and luminous. No
matter;come to me, Edward, and I will forgive thee
all  Curse me, if thou wilt, but come to me.
M.
SARAH RAMSAY TO JOHN OMAR.
New-York
,  .
What, John, no argument, none!
no
entreaty;
no
expostulation!I quote your own words. In my last,
I promised to communicate something of moment, which
I learnt, accidentally, on my route; but, before I do
that, I must look over your letters together. How is it
that I find so many contradictions in them? You,
surely
,
do not mean to deceive me; and, I believe, are
incapable
of a deliberate misrepresentation; yet, on recurring
to two or three, (I go no further back) I find many things
that, to me, are irreconcileable. You often appear to
forget what you have already written, or said upon the
subject, that is most interesting to us; you abound in
repetitions
;
beautiful, but extravagant language; and, I
know not what else, that, unwilling as I am to suspect you,
have put me upon examination; the result of which is, that,
after making all due allowance for your rashness, warmth
and impetuosity, I find many things, yes,
many
John,
which are mysterious and dark to me.
But let me mention some of them,in order as they
occur, in your own letters. I shall leave you to explain
them;perhaps I am too serious, cousin;but, really, it
appears no light matter to me, for one so naturally frank
and ingenuous as you really are, by nature, to be caught
doubling on his track.....
In your first letter, (the first of the three, now before
me) you speak of Jane, in a manner, that, as I then told
you, was alarming to me. I cautioned you emphatically
against her, in my reply. I knew her well, and I never
loved her. She is an artful, cold hearted, showy,
unprincipled
girl; and I should have been more pleased,
had you been
more
struck, and astonished, at her talent
and deportment, at the first sight. Why?for the
reasons
that I have already assigned. Sudden and violent
impressions are not lasting, cousin; but they that
insinuate
themselves, more delicately and tenderly, they are
to be dreaded. Jane knows your disposition wellshe
knows that you cannot
love
a brilliant or obtrusive girl;
and, I am sure, that she will withhold every
manifestation
of her dazzling and unrivalled power, merely for the
purpose of appearing
amiable
. I told you this at
first. I foretold her whole plan; and wasnaturally
enough, laughed at, for my pains. Yet, she has done
all that I foretold; and you not only have kept it a secret
from me, but led me into a belief that you were neither
interested nor amused with her, while you were actually
in her power, to a great degree. I wrote to you, and prayed
for a direct and explicit answer. You wrote a letter, to
be sure, in
reply;
but it was no
answer
. You evaded all
my questions. Once more, however, I am resolved to
try you; and I shall probe deeply, because I know your
infirmities; and, because I believe, that, if you have the
courage and manhood to persevere, as you have promised
me, you will become a distinguished man. Johnyour
reputation is dear to me. You know that I am not in
the habit of saying what I do not mean; or, of using
words bigger than my thought; and, I hope, therefore,
that you will take what I am about to say, in the very
spirit, with which it is written.
I would lay down my
life, cousin John, cheerfully, to promote your true happiness
.
Will you be kind enough to remember
that;
and, if you
please, preserve this letter, to try my sincerity hereafter,
in any vicissitude. I shall never repeat it;but I hope
that it will not be forgotten.
Let me return to the subject. You are vain. You
acknowledge it; and, at times I think, are ashamed of it.
But your vanity lies deeper than you imagine; and, what
is worse, on a side that you do not suspect. You are
most accessible on that point,which, I dare say, you
have never thought of. If a woman would win you, and
had the art to manage you steadily, she would never
praise your talents; for, of them, you have certainly a
very
just opinion now. I do not say this,
en badinage
, John,
to fall for once, into
your
weakness, of saying in another
language, what may be so much better said in our own,
but because it is true. After many mortifications,
many
disappointments, and much heart burning, you have
arrived at a pretty fair, rational estimate of your own
talent. A woman, therefore, who attempts to win you,
if she act wisely and artfully, will affect to discover some
qualities in you, that the world have never seen. All
that is obvious to others, she will overlook. She will
never attempt to dazzle or astonish you. But she will
do this;she will aim either to subdue you by her
timidity
,
and gentleness of spirit;or by an affectionate
bashfulness
,
constantly breaking out, through all her attempts
at concealment and restraint. She will get you,
gradually
,
to become accustomed to her society. She will
adopt your opinions,
not
, by avowing them loudly, and
perpetually, with her lips; but by
acting
in conformity to
them. Her deportment will be retiring and melancholy;
timid and abstracted; and there will be, with an
occasional
pensiveness, and resignation, a dart of fire thrown
out, now and then, to show you that she does not want
for spirit. She will appear to have no relish for the
world; her very eyes will betray a sort of willingness to
be out of it, at the same time that she will appear too
pious to wish for death; and too submissive, to rebel
against, or even to repine at, the dispensation, under
which she is fading: nay, if she be truly what I think Jane
is, she will manifest a continual, but apparently
reluctant
deference to your opinion, taste, thought and
judgment
;
but this will be a delicate and insinuating
deference
,
invisible to all but yourself. It will appear to you,
the unwilling obedience of a gentle spirit, afraid of your
influence, alarmed at your ascendency, and on her guard
against your power. She will even dress in your
favourite
colour;and wear her beautiful hair, after the
manner
that she
alone
has heard you commend in some other,
or in some picture, or piece of statuary; butshe will not
do this, immediately after she has heard your opinion;
or, if that opinion were uttered before a third person, she
may not do it at all, because she knows well, that the self
love of a man like you, is never so fastidiously sensible,
as when it finds, what it is apt to call, a simple and
innocent
heart, offering secret tribute to him,
unconsciously;
no, she will not do this immediately, lest other women
might baffle her, or other men put you upon your guard;
but she will do it soon enough afterward, to attract the
attention of a vain man;and, in that way too, which
he
cannot help seeing. Such flattery to a sensitive man,
if well timed, is really irresistable. All women know
this; but few have the
tact
to profit by it. I have seen
more than one sensible girl completely thrown out, by
overdoing the part: and many a beautiful one, who did
it, continually, without knowing it. Would they learn the
art in perfection? Let them watch the manner of a
woman
,
that really is in love. To her lover, every thing
that she says or does; every intonation of voice, and
every
movement of her body or face, tell the tale; but, while
they tell the tale to
him
it is to him aloneto the world,
it is all an impenetrable mystery. In proportion as he
is
flattered
, the world are blinded: and, in proportion as
they are blinded, if his be a delicate mind, he is
flattered
.
Now, tell me the truth, John. Is not this, exactly what
Jane does? Is not she full of such unpremeditated
witchery?have you not already become so accustomed
to her society, that you are uneasy, if you do not see her
on some regular, certain evening? Do you not find too, that,
one way or another, you are more and more with her, every
week of your life,
accidentally
, as you think;but, are not
the intervals of absence less frequent and less long? Have
you not learnt to hear your names coupled, without any
feeling of surprise, by the gossipping people of the town?
Answer me, boldly cousin;and then, for my last
question
on this subject, let me ask you this,for
this
is the
balancing pointthe verdictthe
issue
as your young
friend, the lawyer, would say, upon which all your
future
happiness may depend. Have you not learnt to
look with compassion upon all the bodily infirmities of
that girl?to forget many circumstances in her
situation
,
and in that of her family, which, to a reasonable
man, nay, to
yourself
, a few months since, would have
been not only rational, but insurmountable objections to
a marriage?a marriage!you are amazed. YesI
dare say that you are. But hear me. Habits are
dangerous
things; the most destructive are formed slowly
and quietly. Men do not fall in love,
where they expect
it
men of sense, I mean. Why?Because they go,
fortified
in adamant, to encounter women, who are thought
especially beautiful or perilous. Yes;and we are
never
in such danger of being overcome by any habit, as
when we believe that, it is at our own choice, to tear
ourselves
away from it, whenever we please. Sampson and
Gulliver were both sleeping, when they were bound;and
cobwebs have held stronger men, who were weak only
as you are, cousin, in their security;they fall from too
much self confidence. Compassion has destroyed many.
It may make you,what you little believe now; and what
you would have mocked at, six months ago, the husband
of a haughty, sick girl, of an ambitious spirit, and most
unamiable temper. Tell me, JohnI entreat youhave
you not already learnt to regard yourself as, in some
measure, necessary to the happiness of Jane? OI am
afraid that you have.
If so, you are lost,forever lost; for, if she can once
persuade you that her happiness is at your mercy, your
noble, unthinking heart, will be offered up in sacrifice.
CousinI tremble for you. Yet I must seal this long,
long letter, here; and delay my other admonitions, until I
hear, explicitly, in reply to these....
Adieu
.
SARAH.
Bless meon folding it, I find that the sheet is
entirely
covered. What shall I do? It would be a pity to
send a blank envelope; so, I will even delay the whole,
till to morrow, and then try to finish my sermon.
* * * * * * * * * *
* * * * Well cousin, I have read over
what I wrote last evening; and, I find that there is
nothing
material omitted, except the
text;
and that, you will
be kind enough to bear in mind, is your
vanity;
not the
vanity of exciting love, and being beloved. Persuade
you that you have made a woman love you, and she may
do what she will with you.
And now, if you please, for the mystery and darkness
complained of. Why have you never told me to what
extent
your intimacy with Jane had gone? Why, when
you must have seen the blessed Juliet, the dear suffering
Juliet, so often, have you always spoken of
her
, as if by
report? Were you afraid to tell the truth? Confess it,
John; you may as well. After all that I have heard you
say of puppy love, and childish marriages, without
any view to futurity, sickness, a family, or widowhood,
you were ashamed to tell me, that you were drifting to the
same precipice.
But there is something, yet more serious, to be laid at
your door. After your interview with that Molton;
that wretch, whose very name is so hateful to me, that
my hand is convulsed, and my frame shivers, as I write
it, you told me that he used
no argument
, no
expostulation
,
no entreaty to convince you that he was an injured
man. I replyI demand the particularsyou answer
me. And lo!this creature of the imagination, instead
of rebuking, in the sublime quiet of a great heart, as you
had represented, all suspicion and doubt, and dishonour;
had really argued the question of his guilt and innocence,
before you, in a masterly styledeliberatelyand...
Johndear JohnI have no more to sayno, nothing
except this. Jane has conquered you, by appealing,
adroitly, to your
generosity
and he
he
(for I will never
write his name again, if I can help it)has conquered
you, in the same way.
You ask me what he means, by saying that he knows
me. He is a liar. That is a phrase, cousin, that you
never heard me use before;but he deserves it. He does
not
know me.
You ask too, if he has ever seen me. I answer noI
believe not. I have seen him; but, it was at a distance,
and in a crowd. He was pointed out to me by Juliet
herself
.
He threatens me too; does he?well, I do not
tremble. Nay,if he can make me feel that I have
wronged him, I will go down on my knees before him
and your prophecies shall be fulfilled. Monstrous!if
aught could add to the unutterable atrocity of that man
after his deliberate abuse of the high talent that heaven
hath given him;after his cold blooded, profligate
abandonment
,
of the highest and holiest affections of the
human
heartit is this immoveable bearing. But heaven
will not be insulted, forever. I shall live to see him
perhaps it is now my time to prophesy, scathed and
riven with the judgment of Him, who shall not be derided
with impunity.
Once more, Farewell
.
D
EDWARD MOLTON TO MARY HOWARD.
Washington
,  .
I am astonished!at a publick house!what could
possess
you?IIwhy did you not write,
and tell me?
Forgive me, my dear girl;but, indeed, you have no
idea how cruelly I have suffered by your silenceyour
illness too!ah, I knew by the manner, in which your
letter concluded, that I could not, to your rescue, too
speedily
.
In fifteen minutes, I was in the saddle. I am here
here, where you slept but two nights ago;yet, where
are you? Whither went you in such haste?I came to you,
loveready, with my lips, to draw out the poison from
every wound of your poor heartO, Mary, where art
thou!Raving perhaps;forsakenhelplesseven as
thou saidst in thy letter;and I, what can I do for thee?
pale, wearymy very blood, the little that there is left
of it, all running, with a sensation of mortal coldness to
my temples. Where art thou Mary? The iron is rusting in
my heart; and no hand but thine, dear, can pluck it out
O, noI did not mean it. I did notbelieve me. I
do
love thee, Marylove thee beyond allallin heaven
and earth.Ah!a paper! * * * * *
Bless thee loveheaven forever bless thee! But how
couldst thou foresee this? Didst thou know, love, that
I should inhabit thy chamber so soon?so soon throw
myself
upon that pillow?O, I see the motive that agitated
thee. Thou art gone, lest our secret should be told in
thy delirium. I follow thee. This line is sufficient.
To the mansion, says thy billetwhy, then, I must
have passed thee on the road * * * * I must return
I
I shall send this by William, charging thee not to
enter
that house. The negotiation is not yet completed;
and my agent has kept my name a secret till now; so,
my dear Mary, if he should overtake thee, before thy
arrival
,
let me pray thee to drive into the citysecretly as
possibleand rest at Madam Waltons, where I shall he
within an hour afterward.
Be very carefulas my
sister
, thou wilt have to be
especially
guarded, while we are there, which shall be no
longer than while William can light a fire in our rooms
at .
E. M.
JOHN TO SARAH RAMSAY.
Really, Sarah, I do not know what to say to your
extraordinary
letter. Sometimes I feel hurt and mortified;
and then a little angry; but, at last, I have come to a
resolution
,
to answer it, plainly, and to the point. You once
complained of my long letters; and, when, in one of mine,
that afterward fell into your hands, I said, with some
little bitterness, perhaps, that there
were
persons, who
could endure long letters from me; you reproached me
for it;silently, to be sure, but so as to make me feel that
I had behaved like a child. Now, I do not complain of
long letters, unless where a long conversation, from the
same person, on the same subject, would be tiresome; and
I am really thankful for yours, the longest and cruellest
that you ever wrote.
YesI
am
extravagant. I
am
vain,and I do not
always proportion my word to my thought; for all
which, I am sorry, andandbut no matter
I will not promise, as I used to, in such cases, never to
offend
again, in the same way,because that were
impossible
to perform. I will only say, my dear, excellent
cousin, that I will undertake a thorough and serious
reformation
in the matter. I shall not succeed at once;
I know that I sha'ntand shall occasionally provoke your
animadversion, for a long time, I dare say; but, in the
end, I hope to prevail. Habits, that are long in forming,
are long in correcting;awkward enoughis'nt it.
Sarah
?
But
you
will understand me, and that is all that I
desire, at present.
You are wrong, and ungenerous too, for the first time,
in your opinion of Jane. She is not the artful girl that
you suppose;there is much more of innocence,
kindness
,
and simplicity in her disposition, than you would
imagine. ButI do not like her. I never could love
herand I have told her so!not, to be sure, in so
many
words; but she happened to play off some of her
management
,
a little
too
adroitly, in the very way that you
mentioned; and so, I thought it was time to speak plainly;
as plainly as I could, without wounding her, or
distressing
myself. She understood me, and I left off going to
the house for about a month; and then renewed my visits;
but, scarcely had I got upon my old familiar footing,
than I caught her at the same manuvreing again. I
abandoned the house entirely, for a time; and, finally,
managed to give her a better bargainin our
acquaintance
of the hills. They will soon be married.
So that, so far as Jane is concerned, your advice,
which is excellent, and made me laugh more than once,
till the tears came into my eyes, while I was
comparing
it, with what had actually taken place, is altogether
gratuitous. And here, you know that I might stop;
but to give you a proof of my unreserved sincerity
toward
her, who would
lay down her life for me
.I
cannot
help telling you, that I have been as constant a
visiter
,
as you have heard, at Mrs. Palmer's fire place;
but my visits were not to Jane. To whom, then? To
nobody. But why did I go? I'll tell you, frankly,
Sarah
;to
be near a sweet girl, who is dying in a
consumption
.
O, no, not to talk, or laugh with Janeno,
but to look atshall I name herthe innocent, the
affectionate, the dying Juliet. How blind are the world!
Nay,even the acute Sarah, and the heart broken
creature, whom I have gone to sit by, and listen to,
that I might come away afterward, and weep, even
they
are as blind as the world. I have been accused of
loving
all but her;all!and yet, about her alone, hath
my spirit lingered, like one held by enchantment, fearing
to breathe or speak, night after night, without daring to
look her in the face, or even to approach herthe sweet
sufferer. O SarahI have set by her while her delicate
frame shivered, and her very hands were unsteady, upon
the table, where they rested, when some distant allusion
was made to her destroyer, till all the blood in my body
was boiling up against himyes, he must be a villain
such a sight were better than all the argument in the
worldand yetno, noI will see him firsthear
his
storysound him to the heart. Have I paid her
attention
?
No. Do I love her?I know not,but I
compassionate
her;and, I would die, to make her happier.
Toward all other women, my faculties approach loftily,
and undismayed. But when I attempt to approach her, O,
there is a feeling of religion;a something that I cannot
expressthat rebukes meand I stand before her meek,
uncomplaining gentleness, with a mixture of sorrow, and
trembling, and self reproach, that I am of the same
species, with a creature, who could meditate aught of
mischief
to one like her.
OI well nigh forgot to tell you, that Molton has a
beautiful half-sister, a most queen-like creature, who has
been some weeks at Washington, the wonder and idolatry
of the place. He has just returned with her; and, it is said,
intends going over to Europe. I hope not. I am
very
earnest to see Maria Howard as she is called. She has
been seriously ill, I am told; and he is the most
affectionate
brother in the worldconstantly with her, since last
Tuesday evening, when they arrived.
Thank heaven! I have sold the house;and I am now
at liberty to pursue my studies, just as I desire.
J. O.
FRANK TO SARAH RAMSAY.
'
s Place
,
Jan.
.
What is all this correspondence, between you and
brother
John, about, coz? It looks very suspicious, let me
tell you, when such an auaug
august
,yes, that's the
wordwhen such an august creature as you are,
is found interchanging whole quires of paper, with such
a madman as brother John. The world will talk, Sally;
and I warn you in season: so good bye. Now
dont tell me again, that I never wrote a long letter in
my life. It is true,this is the first, and probably the
last; for, really I'd rather talk myself into a consumption,
D 2
as John
has
already, than scribble myself cold, as I have
now, to one that will curl her hair with the tenderest
things that I can say, and so. NoI can't eke
out another line. It must go, as it is;but, if you ever
reply, pray be good enough to say, how the devil you
manage to write so many
pages
, when it worries me
into
a fever, to write a few sentences.
Adios
,
FRANK.
O, I open this to tell you the best thing in this world.
You know that John has sold his house. I dare say that
he has told you of it. But to whom, think you?that's
the question!to whom?
To the agent of Edward Molton!
your
chief favorite!you know. Lord, how I laughed
at him. It was admirably managed: and Molton is in
actual possession, at this moment. SarahI can't
I can't laugh;it makes me serious when I think of the
villain: its a good trick, though; but, damn himI
say it, emphatically,
damn
him.
F.
SARAH TO FRANK.
My Dear Cousin
,
I thank you for your foolish letter, and hasten to set
you, hair-brained as you are, upon the scent of our prey,
a wild beast cousin, that may be tracked in blood. Judge
of my earnestness, when I consent to overlook your
swearing, and address
you
, seriously. But so it is. I
have just received a letter from Washington, which I
must commit to your care. Do not deceive me, Frank.
I think that I know you. That unthinking levity of
yours, is affectation. You are boisterous, and rude, that
you may not be suspected of sentiment. Is it not so?
Have you not been too keenly alive tobut no. It is
enough for me, that you have a steady hand, and a stout
heart. Will you do me a favour? I want to put your
life at hazard. But that is not all.
That
you will
permit
,
I am sure, whatever may be the cause. But I
demand
what is more difficult for you to perform;yet, the
cause is worthy of ita continual effort. Can you
be a man?stern, inflexible and serious, for a while;
a few weeks only. You canyou will. I shall
understand
that you are ready to be, what I am sure you are
capable of being, with all your constitutional rashness,
and affected frivolity, a prudent, but implacable
minister
of justice, if you do not
refuse
, by return mail.
By the enclosed, you will perceive that I have good
reason to suspect that the girl, whom you will recollect
only, as
Helen
, and speak of, in the same way, when you
write to me, lest any of our letters should miscarry, is
really in this country, after all:naythat she is, in
what capacity I know not, whether wife, or mistress, a
follower of Edward Molton!You are thunderstruck.
But, I have no time to explain. You will perceive
also, who and what she is, by the enclosed; which,
after
reading it, I beg you to return to me. Perhaps the
tremendous riddle is about to be unfolded. O, how
sincerely
,
how fervently, do I pray to our Heavenly Father,
that it may be! Frankmy dear, dear Frank, think
what I am trusting to you;the honour of a whole
family
.
Ah, be not indiscreet, or precipitate. I have chosen
you, in preference to John, because I think it safer;for,
to deal plainly with you, nobody would ever suspect
me
of employing
you
, in an affair of so much delicacy and
mystery.
The moment that you have read this, and re-enclosed
the contents to me again, you will take immediate steps,
to ascertain the truth of the conjecture. I have little
doubt now:but we must be
certain
, entirely certain,
before
we act.
SARAH RAMSAY.
(The following Letter was enclosed.)
TO MISS SARAH RAMSAY.
My dear young lady
,A circumstance has occurred
this morning, which seems to justify, in no slight degree,
your strange suspicionrespecting a certain person.
You know how she was admired and sought after; and
truly, I never saw a more fascinating creature. She left
here, very abruptly, about a fortnight since; and the
next day, a gentleman arrived at the house, and was
shown directly to her chamber, at his own request, by a
black girl who happened to be in the hall, when he
entered
.
But just as he was on the point of opening the door
of Miss Howard's room, he seemed to recollect himself;
for he turned, and asked the stupid little creature, in a
threatening manner, where the lady of the house was.
The child was terrified, and ran, screaming, down the
stairs. The gentleman, whom nobody knows here,
although
it is said, that he was seen here about three weeks
before, behaved like a distracted man. He
must
have
thought it a publick house; for, when the family were
alarmed, Mr. Arrinaut the elder son of Madame
Arrinaut
,
at whose house, the lady chaperone of Miss
Howard
,
had stayed, was sent for;all were silent as death
till he camenobody dared to enter. He ran up stairs,
and found the stranger folding a note, just written; and
another lying by him on the table, which, from the
appearance
of the writing, Mr. Arrinaut does not doubt to
have been Miss Howard's.
What business have you here, Sirsaid Mr.
Arrinaut
.
The stranger, he says, looked at him, for a moment,
as if amazed at his rudeness;and then quietly went
up to himand asked him where
Mary
was.
Mary!what Mary?Do you mean Miss
Howard
,
Sir? said Mr. Arrinaut.
I doanswered the stranger;and then, as if
suddenly
recollecting himself, while the tears stood in his
eyes,he addedGracious God, sirI am
sadly
afraid II pray you, where am I?how came
I here?what have I done?
Please to give me your name, first, sir, said Mr.
Arrinaut
,
and descend with me to the parlour.
Edward Molton, was the reply.
What!the
brother
of Miss Howard?
The same.The
brother
ayethe
half brother
of
Miss Howard. Mutual apologies and explanations
immediately
took place. The brother, it appeared, had
been led into a strange mistake. From the similarity
of names, he had been induced to believe that she was in
a publick house; and, therefore, had came on for the
purpose
of taking her away, even from the excellent woman
who accompanied her.
He mounted his horse immediately, after being
informed
of her return to Baltimore, and departed at full
speed.
The story, with many aggravations, soon got abroad;
and, at last, came back to our house, with the addition,
that this enchanting woman was not named
Howard
and
was not
his half sister
!I sent my brother, who is
cruelly
sensible, on matters of this sort, since the imposition
practised upon us last year, by Miss * * * * to trace
the story to its author. Would you believe it!He
found a gentleman in the suite of , who had
seen this Mary Howard at court!He was not
acquainted
with her, or her family; but was sure that her
name was not
Howard
, when she was presented. At the
's last ball, he met her again; and sat next to
her at the supper table. She would not know him.
There was some mystery about it; for her eyes betrayed
a consciousness of having met his before. She retired
early; coloured, as she passed him; then turned,
haughtily
,
toward him in particular, and bade him good night.
This was the last time that she was in company
. He is a
sensible man; a profound observer of human nature; and
has told me, plainly, that he thinks there is somewhat
suspicious in her deportmentI do not believe that she
knew me, he saidbut I am sure that my countenance
troubled her. I am much changed since she saw me.
I never saw her but once; and, while she has not entirely
forgotten my face, yet, it is probable, that she cannot
remember
where she has seen me. Thus I account for her
perplexity;no, her name is not Howardnor is she
married
.
Perhaps she has eloped;and now, it does
appear
to me, that I have heard something of that sort
she was very much celebrated; and came out, at the last
Drawing Room that I attended. Yesyesit
is so
her name, I have lost; but I have an indistinct
recollection
,
that there is somewhat wrong in her history.
I related this to our charming friend, who was, of
course, much shocked; but she forbore all reproaches till
she had arrived at a greater degree of certainty. All the
town was in uproar about the affair. She was cruelly
censured, and misrepresented; yes,
she!
who, but a few
days ago was idolized and caressed by the whole city,
for having such a melancholy, and magnificent
creature
,
as they called Miss Howard,
then
, under her
guardianship
.
In justification of herself, she showed me the
letters which Miss Howard brought; and
you know
too,
that she came in the company of the celebrated Mr. ,
the member from . How was it possible to doubt her
credentials? And why
should
we doubt them? Was she
not beautiful, accomplished; and, at the worst, of high
rank abroad? And why should we be fastidious? We
are unreasonable, dear, are we not, to complain of their
cast off gentry? Heaven and earth!Mrs. B was at
my elbow. Another discovery! A handkerchief has been
found withwhat, of all the letters of the alphabet,
think you, marked upon it? With no others, my dear
Miss Ramsay, than H. W. O. Yes; it is a fact, I
assure
you. I have seen them myself. They were marked
originally in blue silk, and have been picked out; but,
so recently, that they can be plainly traced by a faint blue
stain. You may judge of our consternation.
We sent immediately for the paper in which the
advertisement
appeared; and, at last, succeeded in getting it
but not from the office. The papers
have all been taken
off the files, and there was not a copy to be had in the
city; but, at length, we recollected an acquaintance, who
was in the habit of cutting out the pieces that struck her,
for any reason whatever, in the papers of the day. We
sent to her, and luckily obtained it. Yes! the very letters!
Good heaven! how deceived have we been! All flashes
upon us now, so clearly, that we wonder at our own
blindness. The same lofty carriagethe same
impassioned
tenderness of tonethe very colour of the hair
and eyesand yet, that we should never have suspected
her!
How strange! But then, who would have thought
of looking here for your Helen; that most interesting and
unfortunate creature; that subject of so much inquiry and
wonder, throughout all America? Really, my dear, there
are things of daily occurrence, in common life, more
extravagant
and improbable than we ever find in romances
and novels; just, I dare say, as there are skies and trees,
which no painter would dare to copy. Nay, to add to
our wonder, we are just told, (for nothing else is heard
of in Washington, now,) that Miss Howard herself, when
that advertisement appeared, read it aloud, at Mrs. L----'s
breakfast table. It is distinctly recollected; because she
read it, in a manner very unsual to her,
en badinage
.
What a wonderful woman she is? Tell me, if you know,
where she isand who? We are dying to know her
history
;
and I, for one, shall persist in believing well of her,
in spite of appearances, until I know that she is
unworthy
.
And above all, I pray you, my dear Miss Ramsay, not
to forget that we are equally curious to know who, and
what her
brother
is. Is he named Molton? Where does
he live? Tell us all that you know; for he has excited
a strange interest here. Mr. Arrinaut says, that he is
the most extraordinary man, that he ever met with;
that, at first, he thought him a lunatick; but that, when
he entered the parlour, and made his apology, with such
an air of gentlemanly self possession, pained and
distressed
as he was, with his awkward mistake;and,
particularly
when he mounted at the door (and, by the way,
he says that he never saw a man sit a horse so
royally
)
he, Mr. Arrinaut, was
awestruck
and affected,
inconceivably
affected, by the melancholy lustre of his eyes.
Ma chere amie toujours  toi!
P.
Washington City
,
, 182.
FRANK TO SARAH.
Your confidence, cousin, has made a man of me. I
have read the enclosed, in consternation and dismay. If
the sister of Molton be really Helen , it is highly
probable that Molton, himself, is the wretch, of whom we
have been so long in search. How providential it is
Can he possibly elude us now? Can you imagine any
escape
?
Struck by your confidence in me, and ashamed,
heartily ashamed, of that affectation, with which you
charge me, I have attempted to become,
at one step
,
what you would have me be. But perhaps you would
like a reason for what I have been. It is thisother men
are silent in their humiliation and distress; or else they
complain
. I never complain. Thus much of religion
have I--that, to whatever happens, I am resigned.
Whatever
is
is right. I cannot be silent, when, by
constitution
and habit, I am
believed
to be volatile and noisy;
nowhatever I might be at a fitting opportunityI
cannot,
now
, be silent and thoughtful; because I cannot,
and will not, subject myself to the misrepresentation of
the world. I lovedSarahas you know, with all my
heart and soul. My object was the happiness of the
woman
that I loved. To promote
that
, I would have
sacrificed
myselfand almost my hope of heaven. She
discarded
me;I use no disguiseno concealment to you,
Sarah; because I would have you know my heart truly,
and as it is. She discarded mecut me adrift. Very
wellI did not complain!... I do not... You knew
her... You knew that she loved me, or, at least, that I
had reason to believe so. Perhaps I was mistaken
what!mistaken;noby heaven, I was not. She
did
love me!she would have died for me. She--But nono
matter now. Very well. She discarded me. I felt sorry
for it; chiefly, I do believe, for
her
sake; not, that I did
not feel---aye, feel to the core of my heart, as if hot lead
had been poured down my throat; but,
it was her choice
.
I never complain. I only pray that it may prove to have
been wise... I do sometimes pray, Sarah; and when I
do, it is for
her
. May she be happyAll-righteous God--
fill her pure heart with comfort and consolation!---Make
her happy. May she---never---never--yes, I can say even
that, with sincerity and fervour, may she
never
repent of
having abandoned me! May she find a truer, nobler heart:
some one that has, at least, all my good qualities, and
none of my bad ones---May sheBut no! That
is foolish. I merely desired to make you understand
why
I would not be silent or thoughtful---
why
I affected a
gaiety
,
while my very heart was on fire;--why, when all is now
so mortally cold, here---
here
, Sarah, that no green thing
shall ever sprout here again:it is, that I may not be
thought broken in heart, or bowed in spirit. No!---let me
die, if it be thy will, O my God---piecemeal. But let not that
woman hear aught, or suspect aught of the cuase, to
embitter
her last moments.No more!---The
theme unmans me. I know not when I have written so
much, or spoken so much, on this subject; but you have
dared to look through my panoply---into my heart;---and
beholding that, have shuddered,---and been
just---nevertheless
.
I shall not forget it. I have a stubborn spirit;
one that cannot sue for indulgence, but is thankful for
justice; and, while it lives and breathes,
will have it
and will not brook injustice.
I have been unable to pursue your inquiry, as I
wished
.
The weather has been exceedingly unfavourable,
and all that I can hear is, that Molton and
his half sister
are occupying the old mansion aton the Hill;--that they
have still the same English servant, (but his livery is
changed;)---and have given out that they shall neither
give nor receive visits during the winter. Something is
said about the death of a relation, as an excuse for this;
and the
sister
has appeared once in black. It has been
supposed, by some, that this solitary, and secluded life,
has been adopted for purposes of economy. But I
have good reason to know better;---my means of
information
may be depended upon:--they are confidential and
not to be betrayed, but they are sufficient to justify me in
saying, that economy is the least of their motives, for this
abrupt abandonment of society.
I have heard some whispering to-day, relative to her
deportment at head quarters. The story has gained
prodigiously
,
and assails me now at every corner, in a multitude
of romantick and wonderful shapes. You shall be kept
informed of all. John is bewitched, I believe. He has
forgiven
Molton the trick; for, indeed it deserves no better
name, in getting the house; and has actually been
closeted
with him for some hours, and refuses to communicate
with me.
E
Upon my word!---three whole pages!---the longest
letter
that ever I wrote in my life.
Yours, my dear cousin
,
FRANK.
SAME TO SAME.
The plot thickens upon us. John has just left me, and
I must write you by this post. We have had the
strangest
conversation in the world. He is in love with Juliet!---
yes, truly, respectfully and tenderly. I am bound to
believe him; he has come to me like a man, and told me
so, I verily believe, the first moment that he knew it
himself
.
I suspected Jane, for a while; but then, I thought
that he had too much chivalry, in his disposition, for her.
Are we alike, cousin? People say that we are; but it
appears
to me that we are not. And who shall judge?
Strangers
will see likenesses, a family likeness, between persons
at first sight, who, to them that know both intimately, are
totally unlike. May it not be so in the mind and character?
I think that John has more real extravagance than I, and
less that is artificial---more appearance and less reality,
on many subjects; and I would have added, but for that
last sentence, which, on looking at it again, has utterly
discomfited me!---that I had more modesty!
Mr. Arrinaut has been here, to call Molton to
account
.
I wish you could hear John describe the meeting.
It almost brought tears into my eyes. He was Molton's
friend!---yes---can any thing under God's heaven, amaze
you, now, Sarah?--After some conversation, in which Mr.
Arrinaut lost all command of himself, while Molton
maintained the most invincible composure, the former
struck the latter. John immediately interfered---but what
did Molton? He smiled. Leave the room, my friend,
said he, to my brother; leave me alone, with this
madman
:---I
shall find a way to tame him. My brother
went out---but stood at the door. A singular altercation
took place:---on one side a great deal of loud violence;---
on the other, the deep inward tranquillity of a hero--can
he be a
coward
, Sarah?---but hear me through. All this
appeared but to incense Mr. Arrinaut the more. He had
given
a blow---it had been endured---not a muscle stirred in
defence; his lip only writhed and quivered, and his
haughty blue eyes lighted up with a preter natural
brightness---as if he had said---boy, you are no match for
me, even in physical strength. Nay, Mr. Arrinaut had
called him a coward, and a scoundrel. My brother heard
it---his blood boiled, and he looked to see the glitter of
some weapon. But nothere was only the glitter of
the eye;---yet
that
was deadly. Molton smiled---and it
was then, that my brother shut the door. The most
provoking, insolent language was continued on the part
of Mr. A. and endured by Molton, until my brother lost
pall atience;---at this moment, just as he was on the
point, (you know his impetuosity; and a legion of devils,
at such a moment, would not frighten him)---of bursting
open the door, cursing Molton to his head for a poltron,
and perhaps throwing Mr. A. out of the window---he
heard the names of
Maria Howard
, and
Helen
---somebody
(the last name he did not hear,) pronounced; and, the
next moment, a loud shriek, and the sound of one
dashed against the door where he stood.... He
retreated
,
stunned, as it opened in his face, and saw a man
stagger
against the wall---his cravat stained and torn, and
the blood gushing out of his mouth.
Molton followed;---his hands all redquivering
like a young lion over his prey; and was only prevented
from completing his work of death, by the interference of
my brother.
But how could he do this? you will ask.So I asked
John, but he could not answer me. Brother, said heI
would sooner encounteranybodyanythingthan
Edward
Molton, at such a moment. There was nothing
human in his countenance. I had thought him feeble and
sickly; but his arms were now barehow, I know not
he was in his dressing gown when I left him; and his
muscles looked as if they would burst through the skin.
You know the size of Mr. A. yet he was dashed to the
earth, by Molton, like an infantsenselessblinded
and red with his own blood, as if a thunderbolt had
struck him. It was half an hour, before he recovered
and, when he did, the first object that his dim eyes
encountered
,
was the face of Molton, who stood over him,
with his brow gathered, and arms folded, so full of
mortal
determination, that my brother expected him to
fasten
upon his victim's throat, at the first respiration. Verily,
thought my brother, that man
hath
a devil.
The poor fellow shut his eyes again, with a faint
groanshivered, and turned away his face.
At this moment, Miss Howard entered the room;but,
so worn and wasted, that her own brother did not seem to
know her..... She threw herself upon his bosom,
and sobbed aloud. The sound of her voice appeared to
affect him. His eyes lost their intentness of expression
his brow grew smoother;he heaved a deepdeep sigh;
his eye-lids quiveredhis lips trembled, and he kissed her,
murmuring in her ear, some low sounds of endearment,
in a broken voice.
What did he, my brother?what has he done to thee?
said she.
Helen
ha!
Mary
;forgive me, dear,
said Molton, as if recollecting himself instantlywhat
done to me?he profaned thy
brother
with a blow;I
bore ithe cursed himI bore
that
he called him
coward--I bore thatbut then, poor young manhe
named
thee, love, irreverently, andand
there he lies
.
His voice trembled, as he said this:and John said
that his countenance softened to a melancholy, beautiful
gentleness, kinder than humanityfar kinderand he
added, Mary, his punishment is with thee now. What
shall be done to him?
Forgive him, she answered, putting her hand through
his rich hair, and pulling his forehead to her lips
forgive
him, and let him go in peace.
Forgive him!never!but he may go in peace.
O, but thou wilt forgive him, dearsaid she;
who could have resisted her? said John.
No! was the replyNo! not if it were my own
father
;
he has dishonoured thee, HelMary.
She lifted herself upraised her head from his bosom;
looked him full in the face.
Brother
there is a
promise
is
it forgotten? I hoped never to claim it. I
demand
it
now
.
Bewaresaid he, solemnly.
No, Brother. Now is thy time of trial. Hast thou
a great heart? Prove it. Go to the sick mangive him
thy handsay that thou forgivest him.
I thought his spirit would rend his chest, said John.
He stopped. Sister, you know not what you demand of
me, he saiddrew one long breath, that you might
have heard in the next roomand obeyed;obeyed too,
so magnificently! O, it was godlike!he gave
Mr. A. his handNay, his eyes were wet; for his heart
once touched, would have way.
I endured much from you, Sir, he said, in a low
voice; and I could have endured anythinganything
but
that
. Sleep quietly; you shall be taken care of, as
my own brother; and, when you are well enough, I will
convince you, that you deserved nothing less than death
death, here and hereafter, for your blasphemybut
you are too ill to converse.
Thus ended the affair. It occurred yesterday
morning
;
and to-day Mr. A. set off for his farm in Virginia;
and John says, that, when they parted, he and Molton,
they embraced; and Mr. A. saidSir, you have
forgiven
me, but I shall never forgive myself.
I did deserve
death:
and any man that ever says to me, of that woman,
what I said to you, shall receive death at my own hands,
or I will receive it at his.
There, cousin, I have related the whole, as nearly as
I could, in John's own words; and, allowing all that I
think right, for his extravagance, I cannot but add, that
there has been something sublime in the carriage of
Molton
,
on this occasion. What think you?.... Was
it not, as John calls it,
regal?
.... He cut me to
the heart in describing it. He cannot be a coward!no!
we are wrong.
FRANK.
E 2
ANSWER.
No, I am not at all staggered, Frank. My opinion is
unchanged. The only difference that I know is, that, at
present, I believe Molton a more dangerous man than
ever
,
because less feeble and effeminate. I have received
both of your letters at once; and have read them with an
eagerness
that has left my heart palpitating so, that I can
scarcely see what I am about. But let me answer
them in the best way that I can.
You have a noble heart, Frank; but, like your
brother
,
you are disingenuous; not, to be sure, in the same
way, but after a fashion of your own, that is almost as
bad. However, as you have complimented my sagacity
so handsomely, by this last reformation of yours, and
become
so suddenly, what I said you were, at heart,
a man
,
I have some encouragement to proceed. And I shall
proceed, cousin, unamiable as it is in a woman, to talk
so authoritatively; and unwilling, as all men are, to see
their dictatorship usurpedtheir prerogative
encroached
upon. Once for all, I would have you understand,
that I
respect
you, nowand that I would rather commit
a fault, by admonishing you too seriously, than that you
should err for the want of that admonition.
You speak of religion. I am glad of it; but I do not
like the manner in which you speak of it. There is
somewhat of your habitual levity in that part of your
letter. Religion, my dear cousin, is not a thing to be
lightly talked about; nor is that proud submission, which
disdains to repine, under any calamitous dispensation of
Providence; any bereavement; or any humiliation, at all
worthy of the name that you have given it. It may be
stoicismit may be pagan greatness; but it is not
resignation
.
Resignation is meek and lowly;submissive
and silent. No, Frankif you have any respect for
me, I pray you to think more seriously, when you
mention
aught of religious experience to me. I do not
interdict
the subject; by no meansI would rather invite
your attention to it; for I know of no man, who would be
a nobler ornament to any society of sincere believers, than
you would be, were you vitally affected. You know that I
care little for forms or ceremonies; but I look to hear men,
and gentlemen, certainly, whether they be professing
christians or not, speak of religion with less flippancy,
than you sometimes do.
And now, while I think of it, I beg the favour of you,
to get a letter of your brother, which I wrote to him some
weeks since, in which, in the distraction of my thought,
(and wickedness of my heartI may as well own it at
once)I am sure that I recommended the spilling of
blood. Heaven forgive me! I have bitterly repented
since, and I pray you so to inform your brother; telling
him, at the same time, of my shame and contrition
and counselling him to forbear, if he cannot quite forgive
the wretch. NayI have too much of natural infirmity
about me yet, dear cousin, to trust myself with his name.
In spite of my sorrow for what is past,the thought of
him sets every vein in my body tingling. Yetwhat an
escape I have had! Can I ever be sufficiently gratetful
for ita duel might have followed from my rashness.
Yes, you are like your brother; worse in some points
better in others. And now, while it occurs to me,
there is one point, in which I would recommend a little
discipline. You are too passionately fond of poetry;
he of musick. By the way, that puts me in mind of our
quarrel last summer. Have you forgotten what I told
you of Byron's plagiarism. Do you remember what I
showed you in Wordsworth, and Mrs. Radcliff, that he had
stolen?and when you quoted something of his, in prose,
respecting the mirror, which is shiveredby
something
or otherin every piece of which, Memory, while
looking down upon it, beholds the beloved image
multiplied. I told you then, you know, that I had seen
it somewhere, I was sure, notwithstanding his lordship's
self complacency, where it is introducedor the childish
praise that I have seen lavished upon it. Well, some
days since I met with it again; and copied it for you.
It is in the twenty-third letter of the
New Heloise
and
reads Qu'on brise ce fidele miroir de Julie, sa
pure image ne cessara de briller jusques la dernier frag
ment, &c.
Are you surprised at my avowing, that I have read
this work of the Divine Rousseau, as he has been
called
?The
apostle of affliction? I hope that you are
not. I read it deliberately, knowing its character.
And the result is not, what he so pleasantly
predicted
in his preface. I do not believe that I am yet,
une
fille perdue!
Pardon my French. You know that I am
not
very
ostentatious of such things. But, on this
occasion
I use it, as merely introductory to my opinion,
which is deliberately and temperately formed,that Jean
Jacques Rousseau, is a fool. That is coarse language,
Frank; but I do not shrink from discussion. The man's
vanity has turned his head. There is one letter alone,
in which his little knowledge of human nature, is made so
shockingly evident, that we should never forgive it, in an
ordinary writer. After Julia has resisted what, even to
me, appears to have been much trial, and,
perhaps
,
temptation
when
all is passedshe deliberately invites her
lover to her room. O, it is base and contemptible. No
woman could have done it. A wanton would not. Nay,
Julia herself, Rousseau's Julia, never would have done it.
It was impossible. She resists when tempted;but
untempted
yields.
Thus much for Rousseau. He is not
merely a distempered madman. He is a fool. His
angels
are gross and sensual; heBut let us leave him
and go, as fast as possible, to what more deeply
affects
ourselves. This will be a long letter, cousin; I
foresee
that
; but, be patientwhat you get extra now, will
leave you the less to receive hereafter.
You are under a melancholy misapprehension respecting
the woman of your love. You left her no choice, but
that of forgiving you, when you appeared careless of her
opinion; and did not seek to soothe or conciliate her---
and, consequently, of forgiving you at the expense of your
esteem and respect:--or, of bidding you farewell. I am not
at liberty to say more upon the subject. But of one thing I
can venture to assure you. She loved you. And such
women
do not easily forget their love. Whether she ever felt
aught of that passion before, you, perhaps, know better
than I do; but I believe that she never did. If so, she will
never forget you. I have heard a good deal of your
conduct
of late; you are wrong---I know your pride---it is
unworthy
of you; and, surely, you were never fitted to make
so gentle and patient a creature as she is, happy, if you
can so soon wear the semblance and bearing of a stern
man. I know it all, Frankyou have met and passed her,
even her, whom you so love yet, with a most unkind
indifference
.
I know your reasons; some little civilities
have been omitted by others; but are
they
a reason why
you should wound
her
, so unfeelingly, even if she be with
them. Frank, you have a noble heart; every body respects
and admires you, for your bearing under this humiliation;
and your magnanimity in confessing the fact, that she has
abandoned and rejected you, looks well in the eyes of the
world. But search your own heart---what was your true
motive? Was there no selfishness, no affectation of doing
what was difficultno disdain of the world's opinion in it?
Yes, Frank, I do believe you. I have no doubt that
her happiness has been your chief aim; that you pray for
it, now, devoutly.
Let it continue to be so
. Be a brother
to her; watch over, pray for, guard her, while you have
life in you.
That
you can do, and the time may come,
when she will want such a brother.
Nay, it will come
.
In the mean time, when you meet her, if you ever do, be
gentle and kind in your deportment; let her not suppose
that your tenderness and respect have turned to
hostility
,
indifference, or contempt. No---I know you well,
Frank; and I know that, when that face of yours looks
sternest, there is a yielding and tender spirit at the heart,
who would weep, were it gently bidden to, by the one it
loved.
Your duties are not, cannot be discharged, toward that
woman, while it is possible for you to be of any use to her,
in any way. Woman is naturally helpless and
dependant
;
but
she
is especially so. Remember how she has loved
you---your meetings---the bridge---the stump---the hill top
---the rock---all of which I remember, from hearing only
faint allusions to them. Judge you, then, how her heart
must thrill yet, when they are thought of.
The secluded life of Molton, of which you speak, is
strictly in character. The catastrophe is approaching;
he knows it. We shall find him prepared. He will
receive
us at last, like the coiled serpent. Wo to the
foot that would first crush him. Be it my fate;---I shall
not shrink from it. The proof accumulates---the scene
darkens---and we shall burst upon him, when he least
expects it, withNay, I must not babble at this rate.
I am now satisfied of one thing---and that is, of the
identity
of Mary Howord with
Helen;
of course, then, she is
not his
half sister
. But what is she? His mistress? For the
honour of human nature, I hope not. O---if I might tell
you all---but I cannot. Her family---her history---her
name, and sorrowsthey would bring tears into your eyes,
but to hear the simplest relation of them. Can it be, that
he
was her betrayer? O righteous Heaven! when shall
his course be arrested? Whenno, no---in thine own
good time---oh, our Father, wilt thou withhold thy
pestilence
,
and turn back the destroyer!
The whole of the interview, which you have so vividly
described, is of a nature rather to astonish than to
convince
.
It is possible that Molton may not be a dastard; but
still it is equally possible that he is. The most
pusillanimous
animal will guard its young; and may not the coward,
his mate? At any rate, it is, if not a sublime moderation
---sublime acting; and that, you know, I should look for,
from him. Nay, such things are unnatural. They may
be in nature, to be sure, but that does not make them
natural.
Farewell
SARAH RAMSAY.
FRANK TO SARAH RAMSAY.
My excellent Cousin
,
How thankful I am, for your sincerity and plainness,
I will not attempt to say, just now; but, the best proof that
I can possibly give you, of
my
sincerity, will be by my
conduct.
But let me answer your letter in detail; and the first
thing that strikes me, is, (a rare fault in you,) a remark
that is quite unintelligible. What do you mean by this---
Such things are unnatural. They may be in nature, to
be sure, but that does not make them natural.
I hope that you are not getting fond of paradox; but
really
,
that
looks not a little like it. Pray, is not that natural,
of course, which nature produces? Don't forget to
answer
me.
I hope, my good cousin, that, hereafter, I shall
approach
holy things more reverently; I would say, less
flippantly, did it not look like resentment, to retort,
even in a quotation, a word so emphatically used; and, I
beg of you, hereafter, to continue the same friendly manner
with me, when I approach them lightly; and rebuke me,
as you have now. I shall be grateful for it; and, in time,
may be nearer what you desire; at present, I do not
attempt
much; for another of your maxims is ringing in my
ears; a maxim, the truth of which is confirmed by every
day's experience; that isthat they, who attempt most,
particularly in the way of reformation, often effect least.
They think the work too easy...aim at too much...are
easily discouraged, and become worse than ever.
I have
found it so
.
I saw John about the letter, which you so lament
having
written. He won't part with it; but, catching
somewhat
of my levity, (for, to all the world but you, Sarah,
I am still the same frivolous, noisy blockhead, without
heart or bitterness,)he has endorsed your recantation
upon the back. Nay, morehe has repeated the lesson to
Molton; who with his own hand, wrote as much upon
the back of your insulting note to him...adding a cold
compliment, at the same time, to your consistency.
Cousin
,
were you right in sending that note? was it prudent?
was it like a Christian? You see that I have caught your
own manner. And are you not a little too inveterate
against him, wicked and vile as he undoubtedly is?
Nay, is not your asperity, your prejudice so great, that
they blind you to some fine virtue in his character?
You know that you are violent, and decided in your
temper
;
and perhaps
perhaps
, cousin, you have been
precipitate
in your opinions respecting himsome
others
,
I mean, than those which relate to his personal courage.
I only mention the thing. You will meditate for
yourself
;
and determine, I am sure, when you do determine,
generously.
We will not dispute any more about poetry. I have
been extravagant, I admit; but you perceive that I do not
suffer any of that drunken exhilaration of the heart,
which unfits a man for sober and substantial enjoyment.
Poetry is to me, no longer, a madness; it is only a rich
and beautiful halo, with which, when I please, I can
invest
what I will; and straightway, for my own
entertainment
,
hear musick, and smell incense, and see moonlighted
drapery, and feel the touch of soft lips, awhile, all about
me;having all my senses illuminated, hallowed, and
purified, with vision, and lustre, and odourwithout
sensuality too.
That is a bold decision. But I cannot help agreeing
with you. The gentle and sweet Julia, with all her
frailty, would never have been so desperate... but I am
amazed to hear you speak upon such a subject. How
dare you?...but no, there is no daring in it. The
impurity
must be in the mind. There can be no affinity, to be
feared, between the pure in heart, and the pestilent
vapour
that issues from the alembick of Rousseau. It
would, it
must
pass over the untainted and unsullied,
like foul breath over christal.
Still, my dear Sarah, I do not believe that it would be
wise, in the present fashion of the world, for you to
acknowledge
that you had read
La Nouvelle Heloise
.
Not that I would have you
deny
it; but it would be more
prudent
,
I think, not to own it unnecessarily. By some, you
are already thought a prude. They would rejoice to know
that you had read and criticised that work, of all others.
And men, my dear, who might not have wisdom enough
to understand you; or magnanimity, or charity enough to
allow your true motive, might easily insinuate some
unkind
thing; and unkind insinuations, however gently
breathed at first, against a woman, soon become
malicious
and deadly. Few of us are so insignificant, as not
to be capable of making any woman uneasy, for a time;
and most of us rejoice in an opportunity.
Sarah! I have read again, and again, what you have said
ofofno! I cannot write her name. It is too painful.
I sometimes find myself, unconsciously, weaving the
initials
only together; and I awake, as from a trance, when
the spell is completed, with a most distressing tightness
at the heart, and my veins, about the forehead, throbbing
with a painful heat and hurryso!never mind the
name. I am wrong. I confess my fault. I will be kind to
her
, though
they
have been most unkind to me; for the
memory of the past is here yetthe urn is shattered
true;but the scent of the roses will hang round it still.
Where, in the name of heaven, did you learn to touch, as
you have, upon every successive spot, that had life in it,
about this heart of mine? O, Sarah!that bridgethe
rockthe woodthe hill!you know not what you
have said! You have profaned; yes, you
you!
the
holiest
and greenest spot of all the wilderness, that she and I
have ever met together in.
There
, went we together; sat
together; leaning against the same tree, together; tasting,
together, of the same spring; united in heart and spirit;
or, as your favourite says(It is wicked to quote poetry
at such a momentI confess; but, did
you
never laugh
out, to keep yourself from crying?)
Congiunti eran gl' alberghi;
Ma pi congiunti i cori:
Conforme era l' etate;
Ma'l pensier pi conforme.
But I must quit the theme; it is too oppressive for me
another word, and my heart would run over.
When you can, I pray you, let me know all that is
proper and fair for you to communicate, respecting
Helen. I begin to feel a strange interest about her. Am I
right? Is there not a peculiar appetite for excitement, in
the deserted heart? It appears to me, that I covet
something
,
I know not what; but something, that I cannot do
without, to occupy me inwardly, with that sweet
delirium
whichbless me, I am getting back to the old
story again. Yet, one word I must put in, even upon
the prohibited themeit is this: I may burn incense
to othersbut it must be at other shrines, in other
temples
.
She who trod mine, in her nakedness and beauty,
hath departedand no other shall ever stand where she
stood. I owe that to her
that!
and it shall be paid.
F
Mais, aprs toutma cousinel valait mieux, que dit le
fou Rousseaul valait mieux ne jamais goter la flicit,
que la gorter, et la perdre!
Adieu
ANSWER.
Est-ce possible!
French and Italian in the same letter!
at such a moment too, and from such a man!Frank, I
know not who is most to blame for it, you or I. I
began
,
I believe; and you, I hope, have
ended
it; for, I confess, that
you have made me heartily ashamed of it. How
naturally
we fall into such ridiculous pedantry. Now, that
French sentence of yours, for examplewhy was it
introduced
?
It certainly is not what you think, unless,
indeed
,
you have amazingly changed since last June; for,
on the third of that month, you say, I am happier, even
now, with the conviction of having been beloved by that
woman, than I should be, in the possession of any other.
That sentiment came from your heart. But this, it came
only from your pen.
The lines from Tasso, are not worth repeating. I see
no particular merit in them. They are often quoted; and
I am quite sure by Rousseau himself; and, if I recollect
right, he accompanies them with a most liberal
translation
,
indeed. No, no, cousin; let
us
be superior to this kind
of childish pedantry. If we cannot talk in English, let
us, at least, quote
aptly;
and on befitting occasions. I
have seen writers, and you can recall some at this
moment
,
over whose pages we have laughedspitefully
enough, too, at timeswho, evidently, kept a common
place book, for scraps of stuff, in French, and Italian, and
Spanish; and, when they wanted a quotation, turned to
that, culled one, no matter what, so it was in a foreign
language, and then fitted the incident or sentiment to
the quotation. Nothing is easier. The difficulty lies,
when one is talking or writing, naturally, to remember an
apt illustration, to fit the subjectnot in fitting the
subject
to the illustration. An ill-timed story is not worse
than an ill-timed quotation, lugged in, by the head and
shoulders, as it often is.
Another thing: you are quite too fine, here and there,
in your last. There is too much tinsel; too little heart,
at times. Be more careful, for the futureor, rather,
be less careful. Don't write for effect; don't study to
captivate; and you will be much more likely to succeed.
I hate antithesispointepigramand dirty ostrich
feathersand they are the only four things, I believe,
that I do hate.
Ohof the
unnatural
things, produced by
Nature
.
Set your heart at rest, cousin, I am rightand will
convince
you, in the morning; at present, I cannot. It is
or it wants only five minutes of twelve o'clockof a
Saturday
night, too, and I cannot, will not encroach upon
the
Sabbath;
(as we Christians call the
first
day.)
Good night
Good morrow!
My proposition was, or, at least, may be resolved into
this: that in nature, some things are found, that are not
natural. Is this denied? Are monsters natural?are the
lame, and halt, and blind, natural? No!they are
exceptions
to what is natural. Deformity and
redundancy
,
are only so, by comparison with the
general
operation
of nature. There is a general nature, and a particular
nature. To be natural, we must resemble the former;
not the latter; as a painter, or sculptor, studies the
species
,
not the individual. Have I said enough?
Yes, Frank, it is possible that I have not sought
to cherish a truly christian spirit, toward Edward
Molton
;
it is
possible
that I have judged him too harshly;
but, nevertheless, I have every reason to believe, that
he is a hypocrite, a dastard, and a villain. When I see
good cause to change my opinion, depend upon it, that
I shall rejoice to avow the change, as publickly as I have
the opinion. 'Till then, I hope not to mention his name
again. I have some things to repent of, bitterly and
seriously, in which he was concerned; and, while I think
no better of him, I think much worse of myself. And, as
an especial favour, I beg of you not to mention any thing
again, that, by any accident, you may chance to hear him
say of me. I despise, I detest him, so heartily, that I
cannot express to you, how humbled I feel, when I learn
that he speaks of me.
I am going into the country, for a week, where I hope
to get permission.... But no, I will not excite your
curiosity
.
Tell John to write me; and, if you please, you
can direct your letters, for the next week, to
Post Office, care of .
Farewell
ANSWERFRANK TO SARAH.
Dear Sarah
---
Allow me, while my very forehead reddens with shame,
to confess the truth. That French sentence, I took from
my common place book.... just in the way that you
said; nay, that you may not think altogether better of
me, than I deserve, that very quotation from Tasso, was
taken from Rousseau, as you conjectured!I
happened
to get it for the purpose of comparing Byron with the
original; when these lines struck me, and I
transcribed
them; determined to introduce them, the very first
decent opportunity, either in conversation, or
writing
.
I am very busy, this morning, and should not
have written you, even these few lines, were I not
anxious
to shew my contrition, as speedily as possible, for
my folly. I am still occupied with my observations.
John is strangely myterious of late. Something, I should
imagine, had been cleared up, in that adventure of
Juliet's
;
for he speaks openly, now, of his intention to win
her, if he can. And I say, let him,
if he can
. I do not
believe that she will be easily brought to love another.
But what do I say?is she not exposed to incessant
importunity
;
a secret and ever active influence?....and may
she not yield at last? Cousin, I cannot reason upon the
subject. But these, the following, are conclusions that I
came to, when I was able to reason. If she marry
another
,
she must either love him, or not love him. If she
do not love him, she is base, or weak; and I shall
never
make myself unhappy about her. And, if she do
love him, he will be either worthy of her, or not worthy
of her. If worthy of her, then she will be happy, and
that will make me happy. And if he be notthen she
will prove herself to be
not
the woman that I took her
for. Behold my conclusion!
Oh, I must not forget to tell you, that John has just
returned from Washington. He saw Mr. Arrinaut; and
Molton has not a more devoted friend on earth. He
said to my brother, as they parted, with tears in his
eyes, you have wronged Moltonwe have all wronged
him. He is an innocent man, so far as I am concerned;
further than that, I have nothing to say. He has
convinced
meand I take upon myself to say, that Miss
Howard.... or Miss , her real name, I am not
permitted to tell, is a woman, fitted for the society of
queens. My sister has been with her; and, I doubt not, is
the wiser and better for it. My mother knows the
wholeshe has wept over the letters that Mr. Molton
sent to her, for her own satisfactionabsolutely putting
his life into her handsand she now speaks of
Miss
Howard
, as of a daughter.
Ever yours, cousin
FRANK.
SARAH TO FRANK.
We have, at last, determined to go through New
England
;
and I am to be left, next summer, they tell me,
somewhere in the District of Maine; what will become of
meheaven only knows. But I shall be among a host
of relations, who, I am told, are the worthiest people in
the world. Let this account for
my
levity, cousin, and
apologise for the little that I have to say. Enclosed is the
letter which led to the discovery of Helen. She was
F 2
thought to be in America, but where, it was impossible
to conjecture, as all traces of a lady, whom they
supposed
to be her, were lost in Richmond, Virginia. It
was then that my father was written to; and his
extensive
correspondence was immediately brought in aid of
the wretched parents. But all to no purpose, as a last
expedient
,
the advertisement, which you saw, was written.
That
led to the very point, by a most lucky circumstance.
You know, that all
dead letters
, as they are called, after
some previous ceremonies, are sent to the general Post
Office, and opened. One of the clerks, struck by the
singular
beauty of the writing in one, that he opened, read
it; and, when he came to the bottom, found the initials H.
W. O. He happened to recollect the advertisement, for
he had pasted it up in the office; and, on comparing the
whole, he felt himself justified in directing the letter, not
to H. W. O. at the place where it was written, (the
usual
practice, when they apprehend it to be of importance,)
but to my father.He received it, and, sending
immediately
for the young man, (a most interesting fellow, too, as
our fashionables say,) was confirmed, beyond all doubt,
in the belief that Helen was the writer. The next thing
was to ascertain where she was. The letter, as you
perceive, was written in this city, but we were not
satisfied
with our inquiries here; and whether we should
have ever fallen upon the right track, is very
problematical
,
had I not seen the direction, one day, by chance,
as my father was reading it again, and commending the
style. Judge of my astonishment. I had heard of
Molton's
half sister
; and I knew of a circumstance that seemed
rather mysterious, if she were truly his half sister. So I
wrote to Washington. The result you know. You
may keep her letter till we meet. I am unwilling to
trust it by mail, and I hope to see you soon. Mr.
Marion
(the youngster of whom I spoke,) appears
greatly
concerned in the affair; and a venerable old man has
called, repeatedly, on my father, since I left the city. I
am told, who is determined upon taking some serious
measures
.
There is one thing certain: they say, that, if
Molton
be her betrayer, he is, actually, at this moment,
holding
his life at the mercy of the law. I should begin to
pity him, sick and wasted as he is, were he anybody but
Edward Molton, if I heard that he was arraigned for his
life. It is even said(but this in confidence, Frank, you
understand me, and will have an interest in keeping it
to yourself)it is said that there was something
inexplicable
in the death of William.Do you start!And that
I tremble. Frankand that an inquiry will yet be
instituted
.
If so, let Molton beware! There is an
inconceivable
mysteriousness about all that concerns that man.
Something has happened of late, to make me question
my own knowledge of his affair with Juliet. His
chaacter
darkens, and sheshe is mad, I verily believe;
for, I have good reason to think, that shelet it not hurt
you, my dear Frank, to hear itthat she
loves him yet
.
Yes, I am aware of the contradiction; but hitherto I
have been mistaken.
SARAH.
(The following was enclosed.)
New-York
, .
Well, Edward, to continue, where I left off; and this I
hope will be the last of my journalizing. I like no place
yet, so much as Richmond, after all. The people
here
,
are pleasant; there is enough of parade, and uproar, to
remind me of London;much opulence, but it is all
mercantile
opulence; and the manners of the people are
those of the newly made gentry. Here is none of that
lofty, imposing, natural gentility, which I have seen at
Richmond. The people of Virginia, to say the truth,
are much more like our nobility, than any of their
countrymen
.
Perhaps, we may attribute something of this
to their slave population. They carry that air of
dominion
,
like the still more southern planters, (which
befits
them, in a republican land, only when surrounded
by their slaves,) into all the concerns of life. This I like,
where I have seen it;for there it was proper enough.
How I should like the same lordly air, in New England,
a nation of
men
, I do not pretend to say. But one thing
you must have observed. It struck me at once. From
Boston to Charleston, there is so much
mannerism
, that
I think I could tell a Philadelphian, a Baltimorean, a
New-Yorker, a Bostonian, a Virginian, or a Charleston
manby the very cut of his coator his walk,and,
certainly, by his pronunciation. A stranger would
hardly believe this, yet the natives aver it; and the little
experience that I have had, leaves me no reason to doubt
it. Moreover, there is such an invincible
nationality
, if
I may so express myself, in the people of each city, that
their very opinions are peculiar and characteristick;
nay, their dwellings, their spirit of enterprize,
commercial
speculation, and literature are so. An amusing
jealousy
exists among them, too. They have a court
language
,
of their own, in every state; and all that live
out
of the capital, are provincials, of course. Nay, the
people
seem to partake of the age and rank of their
respective
places of residence. A Philadelphian carries his
nose above all the world,except the New-Yorker.
One boasts of his literature; another of his great canal.
A Bostonian talks about letting money at 5 per cent.
interest
;India
dock;the
dome
the Exchange;
Bunker's Hill;Faneuil Hall, &c. and fancies that all
rivalry is presumptuous. The New-Yorker carries you
over the CITY HALL;talks of De Witt Clinton, and a
superannuated old gentleman, to whom the Emperor of
all the Russias has lately sent a ring;lounges up
broad-way
,
and swears that
that are
is the capital of all North
America. But go to Philadelphia, and you are done
up at once, with criticism, and taste, and science;they
make the handsomest gigs in the worldthe best boots
and are the most regular bred people in the union;
have, what they call, the
Water Works
(where a
wooden image holds a wooden swanthrough whose
beak, a little squirt of water runs up, now and then, to
the height of ten or a dozen feet,)and a Masonick
Hall, where there is a wooden Washington;a picture
gallery, among which is a picture by Mr. West,the
vilest
thing that he has ever done, in my opinion,where,
after you have paid for admission, you are made to pay
12 cents more, for a criticism, evidently written by
somebody that never saw the picture. Next, you go to
Baltimore, and there you find, among a people of
adventurers
,
slave dealers, privateersmen, broken merchants,
pirates, mail robbers, and rioters, the same ridiculous
pretension
,
in another shape. In Baltimore, they do not value
themselves for their literature, or age, or wealth; but for
having shot General Ross, at North Point;for having
built two monumentsand several of the best privateers
that ever infested the seas;and for having grown up
faster than any people, ever did; not even excepting those
of St. Petersburg, when they exhausted the resources of
the whole Russian Empire.
Thus a Baltimorean comes from the
first
city in the
union; he proves it by referring to the year 1752, when
there were only three or four miserable hovels, where
the city now stands,and all their commerce was carried
on by one or two fishing smacks.
A Philadelphian proves, that
he
is from the
first
city
in the union, by referring to the last census, where, it
appears, that there were more cattle, within the liberties,
than within those of any other city of the United States.
A New-Yorker, to prove the right of
his
city to the
first rank, refers to the
next
census. And a Bostonian,
appeals to history, and shows that Boston is first,
because
oldest
.
And when you get to Charleston, you find the people
there, affecting the same airs, on just about as rational
grounds; one of which, if I am not mistaken, is the
defence
of Sullivan's Island,forty or fifty years ago.
But in Richmond, I have found nothing of this. The
distinction that they seek, is one, that is perfectly
evident, they have found,from that air of self
complacency
and
negligent superciliousness, which
characterise
them. They affect to disdain all competition with
the plebeians of the north;commerce is beneath them;
literatureO, it is all froth and flummeryexcept what
is imported: though, perhaps, an occasional look into a
Philadelphia publication, is taken, by way of seeing what
the pleasant barbarians of the north are about.
Shall I go on? I will, for one more page, and then,
farewell forever, to this ungenerous return, for so much
politeness and attention, as I, a stranger, have received
from the people of all these cities. Yetwould you
believe
it.
I am only repeating, what they say of each other!
and what is believed too, by each, of all but themselves!
I spoke of their character. I will give you an
example
or two. In Philadelphia there is all the cold,
plodding
,
cautious deportment, of suspicious age, toward a
stranger, even when well recommended. You deliver
your lettersand are asked to call againare told that
the gentleman will be very glad to see youat his
counting
room. He will be happy to see you, any where, but
at his dinner table, or fireside. He is afraid of his
daughters
or
his spoons. Yet, after a time, strangers are
delighted
with the Philadelphians. They are sincere,
cordial
,
and direct; well informed, polite, and sufficiently
indulgent. But I never knew a stranger, of a few days,
not superlatively introduced there, who did not curse
them all, for a sordid, unfeeling, mercenary people.
In New-York, there is a royal opulence, in their style
of living; great warmth, approaching to imprudence, and
very little discrimination, in their treatment of
strangers
.
In Boston, it is much the same, provided one comes
from England. There, he is feasted and feasted, and
puffed, till he may literally eat his way, at the publick
expense, from Dan to Beersheba. But in Baltimore,
they have all, or rather
had
, for they are beginning now
to be cautious, having been cruelly bit by a few of our stray
nobility(by the way, remind me of this, when we meet,
and I will relate some amusing anecdotes, in illustration
of
our
impudence, and their credulity)a most
improvident
warm-heartedness toward every thing in the shape of
a stranger. Like people in their youth, full of youthful
properties, unsuspicious, careless and noisy, the whole
city is ringing, from one end to the other, if a stranger,
of any notorietyan elephant, or a noblemanan
American
general, or a pair of mustachiosa brute, or a
mountebank, appearsit is all the same to themthe
dwellings are emptied, like the baby houses of children,
and the streets are impassable till the raree-show has
departed.
You speak of their publick buildings. Some of them
are beautiful, it must be confessed; but to hear the
Americans
talk about them, you would be led to believe that
the seven wonders of the world, at least, were within
the circumference of every city of the union. What is
truly their own, is overlooked;the thunder of their
cataracts
;their
rivers and mountainsunrivalled and
unapproachable
are
all forgotten, so laughably too, at
times, that a friend of mine solemnly assures me, that, he
lately had occasion to speak of the trembling, and
continual
noise, that appears to issue from the earth, and fill
the whole sky, within two or three miles of Niagara, to a
man who had grown old in its thunder and spray, who,
he soon found, had never given himself any trouble about
the cause of either; for he expressed some indignation,
like one that resents an attempt to impose upon his
credulity
when
my friend informed him, that the rest of the
world was silent and still,that other lands neither
shook nor soundedand that other skies were as silent
as these would be, if he should stop his ears.
I have only a moment morein which, if you are not
already wearied to death, you may follow me, dear
Edward
,
while I speak of the publick buildings.
I will begin with Boston, because I begun there.
There are some pretty churches; (including one that they
mean to build, which is, already, the most beautiful
building on paper, in the world)and some about as
grotesque and fantastick, clumsy things, as you can well
imagine.
[1]
[1]
Lately destroyed by fire.
The Exchange is a noble buildinghemmed
in, and blocked up, by an encampment of printing offices,
tailors' shops, and shoemakers. Then, there is a State
House, a great clumsy, awkwardly contrived affair,
perched on the top of a beautiful round hill, like a fat
man on a feather bed; much too big for the hill; with the
head and shoulders far too big for the body. The Mall
is beautifuland the stupendous undertaking which they
are
soon to begin, for connecting, with a solid block of
masonry, a part ofNorthampton, I believe, with west
Boston,
is
, it is in vain to deny itaa. They
have a Court House, too, with a front of Chelmsford
granite
;
and its wings askew, which I particularly admired,
from the position, where I stood. The State Prison, at
Charleston, is however, of a better character.
There
is no pretension to beauty; but it is a strong, dark, useful
pile of building. Several dwelling houses are noble
one or two, (building near the State House) princely;
and, taken together, I suspect that they are better built,
and more comfortably arranged, than any others in this
country. There are, also, four or five bridges, by which
you enter the town; not one of which is even tolerable,
as a matter of architecture. I must not forget the
Mall
,
neither, as they call it, in a spirit of paltry imitation,
together with their Park
place
, and Suffolk
place
, and
Bowdoin
square
, and this
court
, and that
court
all
of which, I am already American enough, after
breathing
the air, for a few weeks, to despise very cordially.
But the
Mall
, as a walk, not as a
Mall
, is unrivalled.
At a distance, the town looks like an amphitheatre, with
a great brick pile, whose disproportion is not to be
discovered
,
thencrowning it, like a square of palaces.
But the streetsO, it is in vain to think of describing
them. No stranger should venture abroad, without a
chart and pocket compass. A gentleman, whom I knew,
assured me, with a face that I shall never forget, (a
bystander
would have thought that he was talking treason;)
that, after twenty attempts, in as many different directions,
to escape from an enclosure with a high brick wall, he was
brought up, twenty times in succession, by the very place
that he started from. It was a grave-yard. Every lane
and alley, street and passage, seemed to terminate there,
and only there. Start which way he would, east, west,
north or south, the end of his walk was always the same
high brick wall, with the place of graves, within it.
Thus much for Boston.But, when you get to
New-York
(By
the way, I have overlooked New Haven, and
its churches and colleges; and Cambridgeall of which are
exceedingly wonderful and imposingto the inhabitants
and professors,)you find yourself arrested, in a noble
street, by a truly magnificent buildingthe City Hall.
It has two fronts; one of fine marble, and one of brown
free stone!You may judge of the effect, when you stand
at the ends. There is a house in Boston, constructed in
the same spirit of pleasantry. Approach it as you will,
the front being of granite, you perceive the ends to be
brick
. That is a truly American spirit; showy and
boastful
,
without propriety, fitness, or taste. But you can
not approach even the City Hall, without perceiving
somewhat
more of the same spirit, in
front;
for the
enclosure
there, is askew; so that you cannot enter it, and march
directly up to the great steps. No; you must oblique and
manuvre, or you will never get there. I know of
nothing
else worth description. There are some paltry
publick buildings, many handsome private houses, and a
respectable penitentiary; (a matter of which the
Americans
seem especially jealousand, toward which, they
are often abundantly magnificent, perhaps with a
presentiment
like that of Swift, when he founded a
madhouse
,
and made all things comfortable about it.)
Wellwe are now at Philadelphia. Of course, the
Pennsylvania Bank is to be praised again; (for the
United
States' Bank is not yet thought of:)no! for once I
must disappoint you. I don't like it. It is too cold,
formal
,
and quaker-like. We don't want Greek temples for
banking houses. NoI do not like it. It wants that
which gives a charm to every thing, and without which,
the purest and most beautiful creations of genius, are
base and inefficient;it wants
suitableness
. The
waterworks
,
of which you have heard so much, are paltry: the
markets fineparticularly the butchers' division; but
the market-houses, throughout the country, except in
Boston, are contemptible. The Schuylkill bridge is a
pretty affair enough; but you will be surprised, after all
that you have heard of it, when you know of what it is
built. Is it iron?No! Stone?No! What then? Deal
boards and logs. There are some respectable private
buildings, country seats, wire bridges, wire fences, and
publick institutions; but nothing that I think worth
troubling
you about.
We will now go to Baltimore, if you please. There
you will find the handsomest, because the most
appropriate
,
publick edifices in America. With the exception
of the capitol at Washington, a magnificent pile of stone
and marble
painted!
and a sweet, pretty church at
Richmond, the description of which has gone the rounds
of Europe, like a problem in geometry, defying all
conjecture
G
as to its purpose; and the city hall in New-York;
andandandthere is none so truly beautiful.
First, there is the Cathedral, a heavy pile of granite,
somewhat after the fashion of St. Peter's; and the
grandest
building, of its dimensions, that I ever stood within:
then, there is the Unitarian church, a piece of exquisite
deceptionmanufactured of
lime-stone
, wooden-bronze,
and pine-marble;that is, without punning, or
attempting
to punplastered and stuccoed, till the eye is
completely
deceived into a notion that it is stone. Then,
there is a pillar, which is (or
will
be,) a round,
substantial
affair of marble, called the Washington Monument.
Edward, I must be serious here. I cannot write or speak
the name of
George Washington
, without a
contraction
,
and dilation of the heart, if I do it irreverently.
The pillar is grandplainsubstantial; and I like it
better than I should, a work of ten thousand times more
architectural merit. It is only wonderful to me, that a
series of blundering, should have produced so simple and
august a thought. But, I suppose that the building
committee
could not agree upon the ornamental partlike
all who quarrel about matters of tasteand so, awarded
such as they
could
agree upon; which was, naturally, the
simplest proposition. But was it wise? Would it not
have been better, had the money which this pillar has
cost, been applied to some equally permanent, equally
ornamental, and more useful purposesuch, for instance,
as a hospital for the men of the revolution? Will not
others look for the same reward?and will not
monuments
,
in time, become as common in America, as titles
are, even now?to say nothing of the ridiculous conceit
of
perpetuating
the memory of
George Washington
by
a work, that
must
crumble in a few centuries....
Why is it, Edward, that I never think of that man,
without sitting more erect in my chair? When I was at
home, I dreaded to approach him. I feared that I should
find him, as I had others, who were called great. They
were pyramids at a distance;but, when I approached
I found them built of pebbles.I came.I stood
upon his grave. I plucked off a branch from the dark
cedars, that had sprung from it. Were they instinct with
his
spirit?
They had been nourished with his bloodand
substance.The thought makes me tremble. Some
fancy possessed me. I went home, and bent one of the
beautiful little branches into the form of a weeping
willowpasted it on paper, and painted the grave
underneath
it, with all the shadow and desolation of truth.
God of heaven!Edwardnot a flower sprung there!
What would I have given, for one blessed little violet, that
had blossomed, perhaps, out of the moisture of the giant's
heart!Might it not be? He was gentle; and if warmth
and richness of soil were enough, his tomb had been a heap
of blossom and verduretrodden and crushed incense
and odour.
Farewellmy heart is too full for trifling, now.
Good night
.
(CONTINUED.)
Morning
.
As this letter is the last, probably, that I shall
write in the form that you have directed, it would be a
pity to seal it, without the
improvement
, as they call the
application, or moral of a sermon, here, accompanying
it, like a subtilely distilled essence, with which you can
reanimate the earth that goes with it, whenever you
please.
The application, then, is,isreally, I forget it
entirely; let me go back, for a moment.
OI have omitted, I see, to speak of several things
worthy of a traveller's notice in Baltimore. There is
the Exchange, the best contrived building, and, to my
taste, more entirely beautiful, of the kind, than any that
I have ever seen, except that at Berlin, (the new one, I
mean.) Yet, here is the same base, showy spirit, of
which I have before complained. It is plastered all over;
and this plaster is cunningly managed, by the
application
of gray paint, to look like stone; nay, even the real
stone about it, is
painted
. Upon my word, I should
prefer the sober honesty of Dutch brick;this is
rouging
,
with a vengeance. The publick authorities, and publick
edifices, paint and patch, and cheat; and how can they
have the face to scold the women for such things?
Another
fault is, that, as you stand beneath the dome, you are
immediately struck with a painful sense of instability in
the pillars. They are massyDorickand of
beautiful
Italian marble, imported with their capitals; but they
rest upon the brick pavement. A slight expense would
remedy this. Let a few bricks be taken up, and a frame
of marble, of the same colour as the columns, be set in,
even with the pavement, and the sensation would never
returnat least to me; for, between ourselves, I shall,
probably, never see it again. Another fault, I
discovered
.
I am sure that it is one; the arch on the front side,
as you stand in the centre of the building, facing the
great entrance, goes beyond a semi-circleand,
unluckily
,
begins to
contract
, before it unites with the
pillars
;
and then, it changes its direction. The sight was
painful to meand mine is not an experienced eye.
There is a Medical College there, too, furnished, I am
told, with the best philosophical apparatus, in the country.
It may be so; but they are well supplied at Cambridge,
and in Philadelphia. However, there is one thing, at
which you will smile. At the Hospital, the students are
set to studyingnot morbid anatomyO, nothat
night shock and distress thembut dead people in wax
work.
[2]
[2]
No longer sofinest collection, of morbid anatomy in the country,
now.Ed.
There, Edward, I cannot go onmy travelling spirit
my familiar has departed. Have I not caught the true
manner? Are not my decisions, just as off-hand and
peremptory
my
tone, as pert and arrogant, as would befit a
publisher of travels. One of my countrymen, they say,
here; and, really, I am ready to believe it, for no one has
done justice to this noble, generous, boastful people,
was once making a book, at the rate of one hundred
miles a day. He came to a tavern. Give me some bacon
and eggs, said he. We have none. Whatno
bacon
and eggs? he repeated, whipped out his journal, and
entered No pork this side of the Alleganies; bacon and
eggs, not to be had, for love or money.
Farewell; once more, farewell---of one thing, only, I
can complain, in sincerity; and that is, of their too little
republican plainness, among this people. They have too
much deference for us; in fashion---opinion---literature
and the arts. This should not be. In literature, they are
our equals; (I speak of the present generation.) In arts,
particularly that of
painting
, they are, abundantly, our
superiours. And, in what others, have we a right to
dispute
?
What do
we
know of musick, or architecture, or
sculpture? Nothing---certainly, nothing of the latter,
and not more than they do, of the former.
Adieu, forever adieu, to journalising.
W. H. O.
JOHN TO SARAH.
Midnight
How long it is, dear Sarah, since I have written to
you! But you will forgive me, knowing, as you do, my
propensity for doing such matters, by fits, and starts;
beside, Frank has become your correspondent; and, I
dare say, that youno, I won't say what I was going
to. It would have been affectation. I take it for
granted
,
that my letters are acceptable to you; and that, when
they are not, you will tell me so.
Frank is another man, of late. He is strangely
affected----with
what, I know not; but he has grown very
pale; and I find him constantly in company with a
couple
of strangers, an old man, and a young one, whose
countenance has something very pleasant, though very
fiery, in it; the manner of the old man is noble and
erect; but he seems to be feeble, and, I should think, very
sore at the heart. How is it, cousin? I ask you, because
I have reason to believe, that you know them both. Did
you not introduce them to Frank? Nay, I do not blame
you. My numberless indiscretions have offended you;
or is it because I am younger, a very little, by the way,
though, than Frank---that you dared not trust to me?---
But, no matter. There is my hand. I forgive you. Your
reasons are good, I am sure. Take your own good time
to explain them; and believe, meanwhile, that your
secret
,
though you dared not trust me with it, is safe. I know
not if these men are watched; but I have some reason to
suspect it; and, if you are any way concerned in the
matter
,
you can apprise Frank of it. I cannot. We have
quarrelled, lately, and I shall not be the first to
advance
.
They never go out, I find, except after night;
G 2
and then, with abundant caution, like conspirators.----
Nay, cousin, seriously, if you were not concerned in the
affair; or, if I had met them alone, and seen their
movement
,
such as I saw last night, when somebody
followed
me to my very door---stopped, when I
stopped---retreated
,
and went on, just as I did, like the echo of my
own footsteps---evidently, as I have reason to believe,
while mistaking me for the younger of these two---I
should inform the police, immediately, and have them
both taken into custody.
Juliet(cousin, I feel a sense of suffocation
now
but
it must come.) Juliet will not listen to me. I know
not whom she loves;but, be it whom it will,it is a love
that will carry her to her grave. It is unchangeable
immortal. Naymore than this,there is somewhat
inexplicable in the deportment of Molton toward her.
Am I his confidant? I believe that I am. At one time,
I thought that I could read his heart. He appears to
have no disguise. I am obliged to believe him; for there
is no trick, no subterfuge, no artifice about him. If I
ask him a question, he either answers it, at once; or says
plainly, that he cannot, or will not. I find, too, that he
has not been so intimate with her, as I supposed. Tell
me, Sarah,tell me, my dear cousin? Do you believe
that it is Molton, whom she loves? Tell me plainly.
I can bear itI am sure I can. It may kill me in time;
because, with him for a rival, I have no hope;but it
will not do it immediately. If she do not,how is it, that
his namehis very name, so agitates her? I have seen
her colour to the eyes,and then become so deathly pale,
that I had not the strength to touch hershe was like a
corpseat the sound of his voice, as he passed, one day
in the street. If I thought soby heaven, I would blast
him forever. What!O, nonono! He is all that is
noble. He is in my power, Sarah;and I cannot use it
ungently. But nono!I am the veriest blockhead in
the world. Is not her emotion natural enough, when
she hears the voice of her destroyer;William, alas, thou
wast dearly loved, too dearly perhaps, for thine own
peace,but who would not have died, as thou didst, to be
so lamented!
You know that Maria or Mary Howard is not his
sister
.
But do you know, who she
is?
It is in vain to
conceal
it any longer. Perhaps you know it all; for Frank
did, I believe, as soon as it happened. I have
determined
to sound Molton's heart,I have had a terrible
suspicion
sometimes,but he is inaccessible to me. He
only
smiles, looks me in the face, and shakes his headas
much as to say; Forbearmy heart has no door for the
suspicious
. I speak of Juliet. He betrays no emotion.
I even mention Helen;the colour of his troubled blue
eye deepens, but his voice changes not. Gracious heaven;
what a woman she is;so beautiful, so mournfully and
touchingly beautiful!O, I feel sometimes, when she sings,
as if I could lay down my head in her lap, and weep
there forever, at the sound of her voice; and then, her dark,
lustrous eyesat times they are fastened upon the face of
Molton, as he sits by her, and reads(O, would that
you could hear
him
readthere is no musick like itso
impassionedso solemnso thrilling)with an
expression
,
that isno, it is not loveit is not tenderness
it is something more terrible. At such moments, I
knew not what to think of her. I am the only visiter.
Nobody else is admitted; and I go there, I know not why,
perhaps, as I went to the dramas of Germanyto be
agitated, and alarmed. Shall I ever be able to read
his
heart, as he does mine? I fear not!yet he is but little
older, a very little older than I am. Where has he learnt
his
art?it is that of a long apprenticeship to  death,
I was near sayingbut, certainly, to calamity and trial;
if not to somewhat yet more dreadful. Nothing seems
to appal him. I have seen a pistol held to his breast
and the agitated finger of a man, choking with passion,
was upon the trigger. Was he so well prepared for
death? He smiled;he never put out his hand,he
would'nt deign to put it aside from his heart;and
yet, upon my forehead, and I was only a spectator, the
sweat stood in large drops.
The same severe quiet spirit, he carries forever. He
was riding through Connecticut, Helen says, not long
sincewhen several good people came out against him,
with staves, thinking to take him,dead or alive, for
riding on a Sunday. He smiled and suffered them to
gather round, until they were ready to unharness his
carriage
;
when he leisurely drew his pistollooked to the
priming;gentlemen, said he, you profess to be
citizens
;
but my notion is that you are highwaymen, and I
shall not consent to be stopped under such a pretence.
The good people instantly abandoned the horses, and
took to their heels; but, willing to quicken their pace,
Molton made deliberate aim at one of them, and shot
away a part of his camblet cloak, in mere
wantonness
.
The other day, toobut why recapitulate such things.
He is a man of iron. He has none of the attributes of
humanity. He is dying, I believebut he forbids me to
allude to it, or to observe it before Helen; for she appears to
feel every change in him, like the touch of death upon
her own heart. I have seen her faint away;and lie,
like a dead creature, for hours, when he happened to
grow suddenly pale, and put his hand to his side. There
is a ridiculous rumour about, which some experience of
my own, makes me regard more seriously, than I would.
It is said that the house is haunted!and I am sure that
I heard noises there (in the room too, where Molton
sleeps, and where I used to sleep) last night,thatI
knew not why, affected me in an unaccountable manner.
I felt as if somebody were near me * * * * aha groan
* * * What! * * * * * * * * * It is
Molton himself. * * * I went to the door, and spoke to
himbut either his voice had changed, or I was more
disturbed than I am willing to believe; for, when he
replied
,
my terrour amounted almost to phrensy. The
voice was not his. It was sepulchral. What could
possess
me?I smote at the doorIt yielded; and I fell at my
full length.The only thing, that I recollect, distinctly,
is, that Molton stood, as if death struckpaleghostly
pale, and shivering, with his arms outstretched, as I
entered
!--and
that he exclaimed--or at least, the words rang
in my affrighted ears, all night long-William! William!
The light fell from his hand, and we lay together in
darkness, till they came to relieve us.How long
we were so, I know not. But, it appears to me that we
are all mad!When I recovered, for I was stunned, I
saw Molton sitting at his tablea naked sword lay upon
itand a pair of pistols.Helen was sitting beside him,
in her night dress, and clinging to him, O, with such
distracted eyes, and bloodless lips, that my veins ran
cold in looking at her.
Molton never spoke nor moved. I waited like a
culprit
,
willing to hear his voice:and not daring to trust
my own. But his brow was calm and immoveable,
as the coldest marble. I was fain to beginI faltered
I mentioned the sound, the groanhe awoke, all at once
then. as from a trance. I heard the same, said he;
was that all! We are children, indeed. Good night,
JohnI obeyed, like a child. I went, and left them
togetherI went to my bed; but I could not sleep.
All night long, I heard, as in the issuing air, whispers,
and sobbing, as of some unhappy creature.Do not
laugh at me, Sarahcall these things childish or not, they
are very terrible. Realities are not more so? Who
does not suffer in his dreaming, more than he could, were
he awake. Yet that is
imaginary
. But, O! how these
pangs of the imagination, the spirit, how infinitely, they
transcend, the gross corporal suffering of the body!
Do you believe in spirits? Tell me, plainly. Doctor
Johnson didwiser men, and better men, still do. The
belief is universal too, among islanders, holding no
communication
with the rest of the world? Whence is this, says
Dr. Johnson, too; they, who deny it by their words,
confess it by their fears.`How many serious, sensible
persons are living now, who do believereally
believe
,
that they have seen a spirit. Allow all that you can
for a weak imaginationdeceitfalsehood, and our love
of the marvellous, there are still some things, at the
mention
of which, the blood thrills. Do we not all believe
more than we are willing to confess? If notwhence
the painful interest, with which we sit and listen to the
preternatural. Nay, whence the spirit that sets us
exploring
into mystery and horrour. If we were
sure
that there was
nothing supernatural in either, we should disdain to
enter
their dominion. All people, ancient and modern, have
believed in them. I need not mention the witch of Endor;
the spirit that passed before him, the hair of whose body
rose, and whose flesh crept thereat; nor the belief of the
Jews, at the time of our Saviour, that evil spirits inhabited
the bodies of men, and went forth at his bidding;but I
must remind you of the belief of his own disciples, who
saw him after his resurection.
They took him for his own
spirit
.
It is no argument Sarah, that, being unsubstantial
creatures, spirits, if they came to us, would be unseen,
unheard, and unfelt.That may all be, and yet a spirit
might be as distinctly before us, as are the images of
madness
,
or dreaming. Nay---do we not often feel, what is
not---a ring upon the finger, after it is gone; pain even
(as anatomists inform us) in a limb that we have lost?--
Do we not hear our name called in the woods; whispers in
the wind?--And our sight and touch, how often are they
deceived by optical delusion, and sleight of hand?---
we learn to distrust our senses, after repeated deception.
Where then is there any difficulty in supposing, that a
spirit may be manifest to us, by some correspondent
deception? Sarah I feel strangely solemn, as I write this
---I feel as if I were appointed to plead it as a matter of
truth and soberness; nay, is it not--in our sleep for instance?
And why may not the death of a dear friend, afar off, be
thus communicated, at the instant, to the surviver, if he
be asleep? and if asleep, why not awake? There is no
greater difficulty in it. He may be operated upon, when
his eyes are shut, or made to believe that they are open.
My opinion isI cannot say that it is a
belief
yet
that
such things are
. The reason, I dare not tell; but
something has happened to alarm me---and greatly, too.
Adieu
JOHN.
SARAH TO FRANK.
My dear Cousin
,
Summon all your manhood, I have a secret to
communicate
;
a matter of life and death, to you. I have made
a discovery. Prepare yourself, my dear, dear Frank;
imagine the most distressing humiliation and
disappointment
to a proud nature, a nature like yours,and be a
man. Are you prepared? Listen!
Juliet never loved you
. The proofs are in my own
possession
.
I have written to her, for her justification. In
my opinion of her integrity, and beauty of heart, I have
committed myself, all my judgment, and all my
experience
.
I have been cruelly mistaken. I have helped to
delude
you
, my gallant and good cousin; you, whom I so
lovebut, no, no; I will not weep. I loved Juliet, Frank;
I loved her. You know that. I loved her, with all
my heart and soulbutthe thought chokes meif
she have trifled with you, I have done with her forever
forever and ever. I may always love herbut I shall
never esteem her again. I have written to herwarmly,
earnestly; but, I believe, not angrily;beseeching her,
on my knees, Frank, and in tears(it is no figure of
speech)literally, on my knees, and in tears, to
exculpate
herself. I await her answer. I can forgive her, if
she have abused my lovemocked at my judgment
bruised and brokenmyNo, no!I will not even
write thus of her, till she be proved guilty, by her own
sweet lips. O, Juliet! how I have loved thee! Come to
me, dearcome to me!let us weep in each other's arms.
Restore thyself to my love and admiration, and I declare,
that I will lie down and die, contented and alone.O,
Frank, tomorrow I shall know the truthI expected her
answer to-day:yes!and when the post arrived, and
brought me no letter, I felt relieved by the
disappointment
;
and have written to you, because I cannot, at once,
communicate the tremendous certainty that I expect.
She never loved you;
of
that
, there is now, no longer,
any doubt;of
that
, I am certain. I only wait now, to
learn that she has not dishonoured herself. If she have
wilfully deceived
thee
, I shall never forgive her. I feel
it, heremy resentments do not easily change, much as
I have prayed that they might; and, if she have wilfully
deceived thee, Frank, thou most generous man, I do fear
that there will not be time enough left to mefor
relenting
.
Even now, my cousin, now, while I am writing to
thee, I feel as if the hand of death were upon me.
Farewell
......
O, Juliet!
I wait her answer. In the meantime, be thou a man.
Awake, Frank, awake!it will be the better for thee.
Write to me immediately; I care not what: but write to me.
Whatever it be, it will be welcome to me; for it is
probable
,
very probable, that I shall be on my way to the north
I hopenever to return!O, Juliet!
SARAH.
REPLY OF FRANK.
Wednesday Night
, .
I thank you, my noble cousin, I thank you. It is too
true.
She never loved me
. I have just left her. My
hand is unsteady. Enclosed, is her reply to you. She
was very sickbut I have seen her. Yes! I have been at
her side. What passed, I cannot tell theeperhaps she
has communicated it, in her letter. If not, it is a secret,
and shall die with me. Do I feel any self-abasement?
No! Do I repine? No, no! God hath given me strength
to face heavier trials than this. God hath dealt with me,
mightily, beforeand no mortal knew it. Nay, at this
moment, I am more composed thanHer tearsher
tendernessher emotion at the bridgethe fountainthe
hillthe rockthe stream!O, who would not have
been deceived, as I was.We had visited them
together
.
I knew not that they were already dear, so
dear
,
so very dear to her:and when I saw her there, again
traced her mysterious rambling to the same spot
surprised
her, at last, in confusion and tearsO! how little
thought I, that her tremblingher speechless
supplication
her
shamewerenot for me!oh! not for
me!I cannot go on!I know not what I write!
Thursday Night
, .
Yes, cousin
Juliet never loved me!
But lest she may
have forborne to tell thee so, and to justify herself, hear
me bear witness in her behalf.
She never wilfully
deceived
me. She is the noblest and best of all God's
creatures
.
To the last drop of my heart's blood---to the last
breath that I draw---I am devoted to her. Weak and
timid as she appears, she is full of sublimity and
heroism
.
I hope that she will tell thee all---O, I hope that
she will; but no---I need not hope it. She will not.---
They happiness is not so mortally engaged, as mine. But
take her assurancebelieve hertrust thy soul to her.
I know not how thou hast been deceivedbut mine has
been a delusion of my own. She was innocent, and her
heart bled, when she saw it.But, farewell. I
cannot
go on. A vessel is about to sail for France, next
week. I have been down to secure a passage;---I am not
yet successful: but if I should be, I shall depart. Let
us correspond. I cannot live here any longer.
Another
country....another field....occupation, intense,
incessant
occupation only....can save me fromwhat?
from delirium....madness....suicide.Tremble, Sarah,
tremble. My hand has been already raised! What saved
me? The Almighty struck it down! My brother stood
suddenly before me. Whence he came, I knew not. It
was like an apparitionwe had quarrelledand have
been strangers for a month. He bore a billet from
yes, I will write her name once morefrom
Juliet
!
I copy it. The original I will never part with---it shall
be soaked in my heart's blood first. A moment later,
and this hand had been stiff! A moment later---oh! my
brother! my poor, generous brother!---how have I
wronged thee.Farewell. He has enclosed a letter
also. I know not what it is. I care not. I only know,
that I love you----all----all!----with unspeakable
affection
.
Be kind to her, Sally---O, be kind to her! She
was never so worthy of your love or veneration.
(Copy of the Note.)
My excellent Friend
,
As you are about to leave us for a long time; and, as
it is highly probable that we shall never meet again, in
this life, I have taken the liberty to address a few words
H
more to you, on the melancholy subject of our last
conversation
.
I never wrote to a man, before; and, I trust,
that you, who are now master of my motive, will not
misjudge the action. I am in your power. I feel it, but
I do not tremble; for, I am sure, that you are generous
and noble. What was communicated to you, yesterday,
I need not repeat, is of a nature never to be told, to any
human being. This was my injunction, when we
parted
;
it was the condition, under which, I committed
myself
to you. Allow me, now, to add a qualification. You
are at liberty to tell all that I told you, to whomsoever
you
may think proper, when I am no more. Your
silence
will not be long. I do not say this to distress you.
I do not say it with any feeling of levity, or unbelief:---
ah, no, my friend! but in the firm persuasion, that our
good Father hath already bidden me to the chambers of
death. It would be weak, if not wicked, to pretend that
there is no terrour in this feeling. No, my friend, were
it permitted to me to choose, I have yet so much the
infirmity
of woman about me, that I should cling to life;
but still, as I am growing weaker and weaker, I feel that
all the delicate fibres of my affection are gently and
slowly loosening and detaching themselves, from the
things of the earth; nay, from all that I have most loved
here, and that
they
are continually losing somewhat of
their vitality and attractiveness,---till I am brought to
believe, now, that the time will come---(and the thought
is
painful)---when the tendrils, that a young heart puts
forth too early, and too freely, embracing and
intertwining
with all that had warmth and affection in it, will
become so deadened and seared, that they will be
insonsible
of the moment, the awful moment, when their hold
is utterly gone and relinquished, forever and ever.
Heaven prosper thee, my friend! Watch thy faculties.
Remember thine accountability to thy Father, in heaven;
and acknowledge it, by thy
life
. Farewell. While I
live, my friend, my dear friend, I shall remember thy
generosity and greatness, with the feeling of a
sister
.
JULIET R. GRACIE.
Mr. Francis Omar
.
(JOHN TO SARAHENCLOSED.)
O, Sarah, what a brother I have. How little I have
known him. The gay, unthinking young manhe is a
hero. And Juliet too, what shall I say of her? Is it not
strange that I never suspected the depth and devotion of
Frank's attachment to her? He would never confess it
and his general hilarity, his free bearing, before all
women
,
deceived me. I thought, and we all thought, that he
was invulnerable. Yesthat man loved her;that man
was worthy of her. What solemnity, what feeling!
Indeed cousin, the tears, the steadiness of such men, men
that are always cheerful and carelessoh, they have
weight, and substance in them, like the smile of a man
that smiles but seldom. I have seen men shed tears
tears like sweattears like molten leadbut never did
I see such tears, as escaped from the eye-balls of my poor
brother, when I handed her note to him.
Are you prepared,said Ias soon as I could
speak;for, when I entered the room, he was standing
with his collar openano, noI cannot tell
theepay no regard to what I have said, but listen
Are you
prepared
, brother? said I.
He shuddered.
I reached him the billet, saying emphatically,
Be
prepared for the worst
.
I am
, said he, in a voice that went to my heart. I
thought that I should never be able to speak again. At
this moment, he shut his eyes, two or three times, quickly;
a dark spasm passed over his face, and a few drops,
a very few, fell upon his naked arm. He startedshook
them off as if the skies had rained blood upon him;sat
down;read the note;and, without uttering a single
word, wrote a brief reply, which he read to me. I
wondered
at his composure. Once, only once, he faltered,
like one suffocating, as he read it to me; but he instantly
overcame it, and went on, in a stern, deep voice, like one
reading his own death warrantaloudto his mortal
enemy
.O
what a heart he has!so proud, so mighty.
Why, really, it was our notion, because he was never
melancholy, never absent, abstracted, or thoughtful, and
always full of pleasantry, and frolick, that he had no
feeling. No feeling! Heaven!how we may be
mistaken
!
Never have I seen a mortal man so convulsed
and shattered by humiliation;but it is over now, all
over. He is a man again;yet, how altered! His
very
countenance immoveable;his deportment like one,
who has nothing of humanity left to him;no hope on
earthand no wish for heaven; doomed to live, and die,
for them that he cannot love. Within four hours, has this
change been wrought;four hours, and his countenance
is like something, upon which a stern sculptor has been
at work, for that time. It is sublime,and
unchangeable
,
I am sure. He will go to France, and, I think it
probable, to the peninsula; but for which party he will
pluck the sword, I cannot imagine. He appears to have
some scruples of conscience in the matter. Farewell
I hear him breathing frightfully loud, in his sleepI must
awaken him. * * * * *
Wednesday Morning
.
Ah, my poor brother!another escape, another, almost
miraculous. I have just left himI have been with him
all night longI heard him breathing aloud, and left my
letter unfinished, last night, to run into his chamber. I
found him senselessblack in the face. It was with the
greatest difficulty that we brought him to; but he has
commanded my silence; forbidden me to mention it, even
to the physician. But how could I obey him! I sent
for our excellent Doctor. O, Sarahthis is the
second
of these fits. within the last twenty-four hoursthe third
will be fatalmy brother! my poor brother!
Wednesday, 3 o'clock, P. M.
He is better,the vessel has gone; we shall have
him for a few weeks longer, therefore, if his life be spared.
In the mean time, he is resolved. Nobody,not even his
brother, I find, is to see the working of his heart. He is
composed to-day; and there is a great serenity in his
face, unlike anything that I ever have seen, in a living
countenance, except in Molton's, once or twice;such
as I should look for, in one who had been familiar
with deathfor a long, long time, in his very presence
chamber. It rebukes all familiarity, all sympathy. I
dare not touch upon the theme. I fear that it would jar
him to dissolution; but how mistaken I am. How
inscrutable
is the operation of such a mind, when the
whirlwind hath passed over it, and it is literally
upturned
,
with all its riches, and mystery, to the light. He
speaks of herfirmlyunaffectedly;but with a slight
compression of the lipand a deep and impressive
solemnity
;
and he no longer weeps, but he prays for her.
I heard him last night, when he thought that I was
asleep; and I thought that my heart would break. He
had scarcely strength enough to arise from his bed; but he
did arise, nevertheless, and poured out his devotion, with a
fervour and inwardness, such as I never heard, from any
human being before. He refuses all attendance; and we
that watch him, have to do it by stealth;he spurns all
consolation too, as something idle and unnecessary.
Good byeenclosed is a letter, I think, in Juliet's
hand writing. Brother, I believe, has a page or two,
also ready for you; and, if he have strength, he will
enclose
them both in his.
JOHN OMAR.
SARAH TO FRANK.
There---no man on earth is so well entitled to the
enclosed
,
as you. I know not whom she has so loved, but
I have a fearful, harrowing conjecture. I am satisfied of
her principle and purity, and am happy. We depart
tomorrow
for the north, and shall go first to Niagara. I
shall endeavour to write to her, the dear sufferer, on the
route, and shall direct, to your care. One word more.
We were both deluded by the same appearances. That
she had loved some person, I was sure; and, having no
suspicion of any other than Frank, except in one case,
and for a little time, although I knew all, I supposed, who
H 2
have ever been suffered to approach her, I gradually
yielded to the belief that it was he. What convinced me
was, that she permitted your intimacy, after. I thought
that she knew your sentiments. This was altogether
so contrary to her general deportment, that I had no
longer any doubt on the matter. But read her letter.
There is her justification. Who can resist it; we have been
mistaken, cruelly, I admit; but whom or what can we
blame for it? Your delicacy, her unsuspicious, kind
nature
,
or my rash judgment? Had you brought her sooner,
directly to the point, we should all have been spared this
shock; had she been less kind, more suspicious, or more
vain, she would have taught you with her own lips, that
you had nothing to hope, without subjecting you to the
distress, that you experienced, when you were rejected;
and, had she thought it possible that you would suppose
yourself to be beloved by her, she would have
poured
out the last drop of blood from her innocent heart
before she would have permitted yours to ache, under the
delusion. But, heaven be thanked, our eyes are open at
last, and we have now, only to tremble forno, no,
I cannot tell thee that, I am too hasty in my temper: and
must watch it; beside, they tell me. (my enemies to
be sure, but they are the right persons to go to, for the
truth, sometimes) that I am arrogant, dictatorial. I
believe
them. I am sorry for it. I will be humbler. I
have been I fear under a delusion.I have been
persuading
myself that I was altogether a New England girl,
sensible
,
firm and high, like my mother. But I am wrong, I
was too young when we left New England, and the
southern
air has changed my original constitution. I do not
resemble my mother. O cousin, it makes me very sad
to think of her, and I really yearn to see the places, and
breathe in the wind that she was familiar with at my age.
Perhaps I may, after a time, deserve the name that you
have sometimes given to me, of the
downright yankee girl
.
Farewell, once more, dear Frank, farewell; and
remember
the words of Juliet, think of thine accountability.---
Show thy sense of it, in thy
life
.
SARAH.
(JULIET TO SARAH, ENCLOSED.)
Ah! Sarah!you have cut me to the heart. I look
back, my dear, unkind as you are, upon all your past
affection
,
and endeavour to forget that you have doubted
me; but what shall I say to you? how
can
I defend myself?
I have only my simple word to offer, and it may be, that
my word will be no longer enough to satisfy you. I
must stop---I cannot go on.
Evening
.
I am much better, now, dear Sarah; and my heart,
bleeding and exhausted as it is, hath forgiven you. At
first, I was unable to answer you, at allor, even to
meditate upon the subject. Your anger was too
suddenly
announced, for my poor nervesit fell upon them,
like a clap of thunder. I have, always, been
accustomed
to indulgence and tenderness, as you know, my dear,
rash friend; and, even where affliction hath, sometimes,
laid her hand upon me, it hath always been with
gentleness
.
Death came, toobut, there was little terrour in
his aspect;his countenance was mournful, and his tone,
like that of a departed friendship, in our dreaming, was
very pleasant, even while it made me weep. Judge,
then, how little I was prepared for such a letter as yours.
Sarah, I do not reproach you; I love you too much for
that; but you may believe me, when I declare, that, I
have never suffered so rude a pang, since my birth, as
that letter caused me. But, it has given me courage; I
am not long for this earth, my sweet friend;another
season of flowers, will find me, I am sure, beneath that
beautiful tree, which I chose, long, long since, for my
place of rest;another year, and all my infirmities will
be forgotten.Why should I be angry, then? why should
I forbear to do the little good, that is left to me? and how
shall I best do it?
After much reflection, I have made up my mind to
communicate
a few thoughts, to my dear Sarah; thoughts that,
if I had lived and been happy, from my natural timidity
and unwillingness to give pain, even when my judgment
approves of it, she would never have heard uttered
with my lips. But it is better that she should hear
them from mine, than from the harsher ones of the
world.
Sarah, you judge too precipitately. You deceive
yourself; and mislead others. You are kind of heart,
high of spirit, and truly pious; but your piety goes for
nothing, beloved Sarah, where it interferes, directly,
with either your head or heart.... Your temper, too, is
violent, and unforgiving; not implacable, perhaps, but
unforgiving.
Remember these words. When I am gone, Sarah, they
will be found true. I know that they look unkind; but,
they are not so. I have often observed these faults in
my friend. I could recall many illustrations; and cite
many authorities, among them that best know youbut
I prefer dealing more plainly. I prefer telling you, in
the plainest possible words, my dear friend, of your
besetting
sins. And, having done that much, I will now
proceed
,
as well asa trembling handand eyes nearly
blind with weeping, will permit, to answer your charges.
Yes, Sarah, I have wept; for it is a constitutional
weakness, of mine, to weep at unkindness, even when
assured, by my own heart, that I do not merit it.
But let me enter on my defence, as patiently and
delicately
as I can. You have been deceived, you say. I
can believe it. I know your disposition too well, Sarah,
to suppose that you would have wilfully contributed to the
distress of Mr. Omar. But the question still recurs.
By whom were you deceived? by what? Not by me.I
am sure that you will deliberately acquit me of
that
. Not,
I hope, by any circumstances, that a little more charity,
(it is a cruel thing, perhaps, to say this, Sarah, but it is
exactly what I feel, at this moment,) and a little more
caution
in you, might not have explained, by some other
hypothesis, at least as amiable, as that which was
adopted by you. Did I ever manifest aught, in word or
deed, Sarah, before you, resembling love for Frank Omar?
What, then, were the facts? But, let me begin
with your earlier symptoms of precipitation in such
matters
.
There was poor William. What made you
imagine
,
for a time, that he was the legitimate and chosen
lord of my affection? That you did, there can be no
doubt, though you may have forgotten it now. What
were the facts? The chief one, I am sure, was, my
distress
,
my agony and delirium, at the time of his death.
You thought, and so did others, many others, perhaps,
after that mysterious event, that my heart was buried
with him. Did you not? And, then, another suspicion
arose. Why did you always couple the expression of
your sympathy with me, with that of hatred and
detestation
of his destroyer. Nay, has not he, that same
Molton, has he not been publickly called the
destroyer
of William and
me?
But how of
me?
The charge is
terrible, let it bear what countenance it may. It implies,
that I am either base, or dying; dishonoured by the love
of him, that you believe to be a monster of perfidy and
wickedness;---or, broken hearted, as the surviver of him,
whom that cruel man sent, so unpreparedly, to his grave.
On that point, you were mistaken---John was
mistaken
;
Frank was mistaken. I never loved William, other
than as I loved many, resembling him, in generosity and
goodness.
The next thought, the
next
Sarah, was for a moment,
yet more frightful. You have not forgotten it;you
never
can forget it. Do you remember my distress, my
humiliation? And why were you troubled? Merely
because
I had known the man, before he went to Europe.
Merely, because you had heard of his standing by me,
when I was at the instrument, and reading my heart,
with his arms folded.Was it prudent, dear, to infer so
much, from the few incidents that came under your
observation
.
Suppose that we did walk together? You
knew that my health demanded some such exercise;and
who was better qualified to beguile the way, than one,
whose extraordinary mind, and settled, unapproachable
severity of deportment, left one nothing to apprehend
from his conversation?But why need I dwell on him.
You have acknowledged your errour there, and I hasten
to forget it.
But all these things did not teach you the
circumspection
,
that I have observed in your character on other
occasions
.
You still believed that I had
loved
. Sarah!
I will not deny itit is a thought too solemn for
disavowal
too
sweet for concealment. You were rightI have
loved;but further than that, I cannot gonot even to
you. The object of that loveno, it was not love!it
was religion, life, idolatry;judge then of its power and
truth; it has brought me to the grave.But the beloved
one, you will never know. Perhapsif the bashfulness
of my very heart will permit it, perhaps I shall
communicate
it to Mr. Omar;he is to be here, this evening; and
I am endeavouring to prepare myself for the interview.
How oftenO! how often! have I hushed the thought, as
it arose, and I felt my cheeks burn the while, that I was
dear to that excellent, that noble young man. But it
would come; it
would
, now and then, obtrude itself upon me
when I was all alone; and I would determine to make myself
understood. But how could I? His affection was so delicate,
so profound; there was, I know not what, of reverence
and awe, that I did not deserve to excite, and that I
wondered
to see in him, about all that he said or did, when
I was near. My friends observed it; I was rallied
about him; and, at last, I determined to treat him less
cordially. It was a vain determinationhe cameI
refused
to walk with him, as usual. He was hurt, cruelly
hurt, at first, as I perceived; but the next moment his eyes
lighted
up
and I trembled for the inference that he
would draw.I went out again with him, rather than
be left
alone
in his company, as I should undoubtedly
have been, for it was, as you know, the well meant,
but indelicate practice of my good aunt, in what she
thought her impenetrable management on such an
occasion; and rather than permit him to believe that
I abstained from walking, for that reason, or that I
felt less freedom than usual with him. We visited
some spots that were dear to me; he was so silent
that I forgot, utterly forgot, sometimes, that he was with
me; and when the sound of his friendly, sweet voice, awoke
me from my passionate reveries, it was only to
make me ask my own heart why I had permitted myself to
imagine so vain a thing, as that he loved me, on no
better
evidence, than such solicitude and watchfulness, as
this. We returned, my spirits were much depressed--and,
for the first time, I observed that his hand shook, and his
lashes glittered, when we arrived at the gate.He
refused
to go in. It was unusual with him? but still I thought
little more of it until several days had passed, and the
looks and manner of the family convinced me that they
thought we had had some quarrel. I could not well
abandon
my walk. The season was tempting. The snow had just
gone, and the tender green earth was just beginning to
emit its own peculiar rich smell of invitation. I went
alone I came to the top of the hill;it was consecrate
tomethere was one spotone!and, as I leaned
against a slender tree there, and thought over the days of
my untroubled innocence, the tears fell, all alone as I was,
like rain upon the dry leaves below. Once, I remember,
that I was startled, and I concealed myself, for I thought
that some step was approaching. After this I descended.
There was the very rock;and, near it, rippled the cold
clear stream, whereno, noI cannot tell thee that.
I took off my bonnet, I scooped up some water in my palm,
and tasted it, as I would tears;my eyes were turned
toward a distant opening, where I could just distinguish
a tree, beneath whose beautiful branches I had once set
and listened, till my heart ran over;there was the rock
toothe turf seatthe pure watertheNo, no!my
limbs were too weak to support me, and I was blind with
my tears. I heard a rustling near mea faint whisper
something touched memy blood thrilledat such a
moment
!...in
such a place!...O, I dared not look up!I
expected
to encounter the only human being, whose presence
there
, would not have been profanation. But I did look
upit was notno, it was not
hehis
portentous
forehead
his
uplifted eyes were afar off. Noit was
Frank. I was glad to meet him;ashamed and humbled
as I was, at being caught in such a situation; I was so
glad to feel him near me, for it was getting quite dim in
the wood, and there was a long solitary road to be
travelled
homewardthat I believeII was more than
usually cordial, at least, I judged so, from the change
that I perceived in him. His dark eyes glittered again;
and there were instantaneous changes in his noble face,
from red to pale, and pale to red, like the reflection of a
passing sunset over a piece of statuary. Indeed he
looked so handsome, and so happy, that I had not the
heart to treat him coldly; and, if I had, what should I
have been, but a capricious girla childwhose
humours
were not to be understood, even by herself?
Suppose
that he had asked me, why I had altered in my
deportment
?or,
as he once did?if he had offended me?
what could I have said?
Soon after this, I thought yet more seriously of the
matter
,
and determined to bring him to an explanation.
Yet that was not easily done. An honest woman, I
thought, would spare him the humiliation of an avowal.
Truebut a modest one, would never suspect a passion,
till it was declared. Nay, is it not a wise maxim to
believe
all the pretensions of a man, hollow or falseor at
best, think of friendship only, until they are proved to be
more serious? You can now judge of my perplexity.
What was I to do? If I led him to an avowal, it must be
by encouragement. But that would have been base, if I
did not, as I certainly did not, mean to return his love.
At last, our dear William was slain;all the rest you
are acquainted with;my illness, distraction,the
subsequent
kindness and attention of Mr. Omar, until he
declared
himself. Then, and then only, was it permitted to
me, to deal frankly. I did so. I told him that
we must
part
. This, I did, that I might not, unnecessarily wound
him. Yet it would have been better, I now find, had I
said, as a friend, I shall always hold you dear;but as
a husbandI cannot think of you. I do not love you;
I cannot love youI never have loved you.
Yes, Sarah!I ought to have said just those words;
but what woman could have said them, to such a man?
Ah, it is no light matter for the proud in heart, the good
and the free spirited, to go with their offering to the feet
of any woman, and have it
un-accepted
. I do not say
rejected
:
still
lessdo I say,
trodden
on,
smiled
at, and
scorned
; as he would have thought that his was, had
I so treated him.
Need I say more, Sarah? Need I appeal to your
knowledge of my whole life? Do I hurt you, dear, by
refusing
to communicate the whole?ah!the hour
has come;I hear his treadhis voicehe is
ascending
the stairs.Farewell, for a few hours
Farewell
!
Eleven o'clock
, .
He is gone. It is nearly an hour since he left me.
But it is only now that I have strength enough to draw
myself to the table. He is an exalted young man, Sarah.
I wish that I could love him. It would make me happy
to reward such sublime devotion;and, were it not, that
I judge of another, as of myself; (and
I
should be
unutterably
miserable, were one, that I loved, to marry me, with
aught but such love as I felt for him)were it not for
that
, I should have been almost tempted to place my hands
within his, while he sat by me,fallen upon his noble
bosom
,
and wept away the little life that I have left, upon the
heart of a man that truly loved me. I was strongly
tempted
movednot
with compassion alone, but with pride
and admiration. But I forbore. Yet I did as much. What
think you, it was?
I communicated that to him, Sarah, which is unknown,
and shall he, while I have life in me, to every other
mortal
,
beneath the skies. I told him allall!my shame
and horrour;my humiliation, self abandonment; and
yes, I told him
all
. Was not that a proof of my reverence?
It was. What I have not dared to whisper, even in my
devotions; for God, I thought, must be jealous of the
delirious
and passionate love that I bore to one so little like
Himeven
that
have I told Frank Omar, without
concealment
,
reservation, or disguise. I am in his power:
I glory in it.
And now, Sarah, my beloved Sarah, farewell. Our
future letters, at least on my side, I am sure, will be
much shorter, than those that we have interchanged
hitherto
;
and why should they not be? My breath is shorter;
my slumbers lighter; and my poor thin hands; alas, Sarah,
I am very weak and unwilling to go, after allfor a tear
fell upon them, as I held them up, and saw how
transparent
they wereI am unaccountably affected at times;
the veins in my forehead frighten me. They are much
more like the delicate, faint wandering of blue stains in a
flower leaf, as  ah I had well nigh told his name
than everand I listen too, sometimes, to my own
voice, till I tremble all over. It is strangely clear.
I
Mournful, it may be; but, when it comes back to me, as
it will sometimes, like a sweet bell tolling in the wind,
OI could go and make my own quiet grave, with my
own hands, just where we parted lastwe!yesand
the violet should spring up where my first tears fell, when
no, no! no matter whatno matter who. It is all
over. And then, too, there is an unnatural brightness in
my eyesthey ache dismallyand there is a strange,
uneasy
throbbing at the ends of my fingers; and,
altogether
,
what with the tender and incessant watchfulness,
the
very
affectionate and delicate attention that I
perceive
increasing every hour,with the carefulness to
exclude
every unpleasant sight and sound, from my dark
chambertheir serious facesthe solemn whispering
that I catch (for my hearing has become wonderfully
acute of late) as my good doctor is continually arrested
in the entry, by some one or other of the servants, or
visiters;I really have enough, I think, to authorize my
saying, that, if you would see me alive, my dear,
excellent
Sarah, you will visit me immediately. If you should
not be able, for I know well how you are situated, let us
continue to correspond. While I have the strength to
pray, I shall pray for you. Do the same for me, dear,
will you?
Stay, it is possible, dear Sarah; and, perhaps, I ought
to say,
probable
, that I may never be able to write to thee
again. If solet this, my parting advice, be
remembered
.
I adjure thee, solemnly, as a dying woman, Sarah,
to wear, hereafter, a more humble and unpretending
deportment
;
for thy sake, dear, I beseech this;for thou
art altogether more amiable, tender, and affectionate,
than the world believes thee;but, chiefly, do I pray
it, for HIS sake, who hath endowed thee with such
astonishing
faculties, and will demand a sure and steadfast,
and benignant application of them.Piety, dear
Sarah
,
true piety, is meek and lowly; yet sound and
substantial
.
Farewell!Naylest this
may
be my
last
letter, I will enclose a lock of my hair. You once
thought it beautiful. There was another,
one
other,
whose opinion was even dearer to me than thine;
he
thought it beautiful, too:ah!dear Sarahlet it
not shock thee. The touch is harsh now,and I have tried,
in vain, to restore the silkiness and lustrethe truth must
be told
my hair is dead
. Would he not be shocked at
the sight? He wouldI am sure that he would; for even
I, fortified and prepared as I am, for the reception of my
bridegroomDeatheven I, am utterly overcome
by a little lifeless hair, which I have been twining here,
for some minutes, about my finger, to see if artifice would
give to it aught of that natural, undulating flexure, which
was once its beauty and vitalitybut no, no
it is dead;
a part of me is already deadand II can feel the
remorseless influence coming nearer and nearer, every
breath that I draw, to the fountain of my being, till all
that hath greenness about it, is withering; and all that
hath moisture, is drying up. A little longera very little
longer, and thy poor troubled Juliet will be at rest. Be
thou the guardian of her fame, thanthou, love!and
she will requite thee for it. O, if it be permittedhow
tenderly watchful will she then be of theeand of one
otherwhom heaven, forever, and ever, bless and
protect.Farewell, Sarah, Farewell!
Thine, forever and ever
,
JULIET.
JOHN OMAR TO SARAH RAMSAY.
By heaven, it is true. It is just as I feared. He, against
whom we have plottedhe whom we had be set, like a
wild beast, in the toils
he
hath escaped. Escaped! Nay,
that were a trifle; but we are now in
his
power. Frank
has gone to the south. I am glad of itglad; for some
blood would be spilt, else. It is just as I feared. Do you
not tremble, Sarah? Or, do you not anticipate the truth?
Have you no chill?no spasm at the heart? Molton
is the man. Edward Moltonhe, whom I could curse!
III know not what I say.
But he is the man that
Juliet loves!
How are you, now, Sarah? Hardly had
we despatched the messenger to prevent your arrival,
than I discovered the true cause of Juliet's resuscitation.
Molton had seen her. It was only for a moment;but,
gracious heaven! her whole body was instinct with a new
spirit. She never appeared so touchingly, so delicately
beautiful. Her parted lipsher innocent, clear eyes
her sweet face, blushing through her tearsher
agitation
oh!
I could have fallen on my face, before her.
Yet, how did he behave?Listen. It was described
to me, by Frederica; but whether she suspected the truth,
or not, it were impossible to say. She is too generous,
however, to betray it, even if she did. And you, my
dear cousin, you will guard it, as your own honour.
What an unaccountable creature he ishow
immoveable
not
a tearnot oneyet his chest heavedand the
blood settled in his eyesand he staggered, when he
touched her handyet, not a wordnot a looknot a
gesturebetrayed him. Once, while she was speaking
to him, with that serious gentleness of her's, he held his
breath so long, said Frederica, that I thought he would
never breathe again.
He stood before her, as she sat looking out of the
window
,
like an apparitionuncoveredhis eyes cast down,
and his hair strangely disordered.
She lifted her eyesa faint cry escaped herand she
would have fallen, but for his encircling arms. Was she
sensible of the touch? Her colour came and went,
rapidly
;and,
while his head was turned away, and the big
sweat stood upon his lips, his very lips, Frederica says,
that she saw Juliet open
her
eyes, with an expression so
tender and happy, thatShe stopped there. She
was unwilling to betray her own opinion. They
conversed
for a few moments; and he appointed another
hour to see her, when I am to be there, saying, as he
departed
,
says Frederica, that
there was no hope for either
.
What did he mean? I know not, but I am determined
to be present, and understand the reason of his calling.
Has he come to be forgiven for themurder, shall I call
it?no!it may not be the murderof William? Or is it
my hand shakes with the thoughtis it to disquiet a
saint, in her last moments, with the remembrance of
something, I know not what, but something, I am sure,
of tremendous emphasis, in her recollection of the past?
Adieu, till the interview is over!
Evening
.
I have just left Juliet. She is inconceivably better;
but this often happens in the consumption. Hectick and
deliriumdelusion and brightnessare our ministering
spirits, then. And we, perhaps, are never nearer our
utter extinction, than when our eyes flame brightest, and
our garlands emit the most of perfume. What an
inexplicable
creature is he!and she too!she is, alike,
incapable
of being understood. Where is her dread, now,
of Molton? Why is he admitted? Does not her aunt
remember him?detest him? Or, is it only a last
indulgence
to the dying girl? Really, I wish that you were
here; and I have half a mind to countermand the courier,
notwithstanding your necessities, and the order of
Juliet
.But
stayI am summoned. He is coming up
the avenue; and I would be there to see the meeting.
Twelve o'clock
.
He has gonegone!and poor Julietalas!I am
in greater perplexity and consternation, than ever?
What has he done? What said to her? I heard all
saw all!But there was some other meaning in it,
than what I saw!Else, why was she so affected?by
his first appearance, I mean; for she was calm,
beautifully
calm, after they had been alone. But that was the
result
...... Perhaps you can explain it. It is all a
mystery to me.
(A servant has just entered to say, that Juliet is in a
sweet sleep. Thank God! thank God!)
Listen, then, to what I saw. I can see them yethear
their voices----her's, clear, and soft, and timid----his,
deep and inward, as if his spirit were speaking, and
not his lips.
He entered. He was, evidently, prepared and
sustained
by some preternatural effort. He came---and his
presence was unlike that of humanity. Was he
death-struck
?
I know not---but his face was pallid---pallid!---
it was cadaverous!---quiet and established.
I 2
He went directly up to poor Juliet, whose hand hung
over the pillow, against which she was leaning; and, it
was evident that she had not the power to lift it, for the
effort was made:---it moved, but fell down again, like
something lifeless, while she coloured, faintly. He took
her hands, both of them, in his, with an air---ah! he must
have been dear to her once, and must have known it---
Assure yourself, Miss Gracie, my sweet friend, said
he, in a firm voice, that
She slowly lifted her meek eyes. He could not well
bear it; for his manner was more hurried and tender, as
he added---Forgive me. I would have said
Juliet
, had
I not feared to distress you. Then, glancing his eye
at Jane and myself, he added, I feared, too, that it might
be misunderstood.
She motioned, faintly, to him, to sit down; for, I had
observed that her eyes, surcharged with moisture and
glossiness, were perpetually stealing upward, as if in
meditation, timid and wavering religious meditation,
upon his face, while he stood over her. He did not
observe
it; or, at least, he did not betray his observation.
He obeyed---he sat down---he still held her hand---he
looked at it---his lips moved, as if he were talking to
himself---a
slight, tremulous motion, I thought, passed over
his whole frame---it might have been mine own agitation,
however, or that of the light; for my hand was resting
on the table, and it shook. His face was solemn,
tremendously
solemn and desolate;---and once, when he drew a
long breath, her hair stirred with it, and the strange
spirituality of her form, awoke. I could have told her
thought;
his
, I am sure that I could.
She
was always
transparent;but he,---his countenance was marble and
death---forever and ever---except at this moment. He
put
her
hand to his side---her eyes were away---but I
could perceive the same bashful consciousness under her
thick lashes. It was done with an expression of pain,
and soreness; and, from the look of his unchangeable
eye, as it wandered over her temples, her hands, her
attenuated
form, at the same moment, I could have sworn,
almost, that he was deliberately comparing his own
situation with her's. What was the result? He
replaced
her hands---they were meekly crossed upon her
lap;---and a smile, yes, a smile, the second that I ever saw,
of the heart, in Molton's face, played all over it;---and
the effect of that smile, so sweet, so melancholy, was
such---you will hardly believe it---that my own eyes
ached. I put up my hand to them---they were running
over---I looked at Jane---the tears were there, too;---at
Frederica---she was sobbing!
No---no! said Juliet, I cannot bear this!
Frederica
,
dear, reach me that book, and the little packet,
there. Take them, Mr.take them, Edward. But
do not open them, yet. There will be a time(The
smile returned, and he put his lips to her hand. Why
did she permit it? Who ever dared as much before?---
Yet she, sweet saint, as if utterly forgetful of our
presence
,
appeared to receive it as no profanation; but,
rather
,
as her lawful and accustomed homage.) When I
am no more, Edward---(I looked at him, as she said
this;---there was no change, nor shadow of change, in
his face; but his eyes were nearly shut---and his hands
were locked, in the attitude of one listening to strange
musick, issuing from his own heart.)---
then
, you are at
liberty to open it, she added.
And not till
then
, Juliet.
No!
But, what if death should be nearer to me---than
What!
cried Juliet, in a tone of horrouralarmed,
it was evident, more by the look with which the words
were spoken, than by the words themselves
What
mean you, Edward?
I meanI know not what;but it might happen,
dear Julietit
might
happen, that one could foresee his
own death.
Juliet raised her eyes in terrour---he was leaning
toward
her;---and I could see the blood rushing, hither and
thither, about his temples, just as if forced there, by some
fearful operation of the heart; as if it were pressed to
suffocation, and discharging all its life, at once. She put
her hand upon his forehead---Edward Molton, said
she, in a tone so sweet, so solemn---oh! I never heard
aught that resembled it, before---
Beware!beware!
there is One who can read thy heart, and will requite
thee for the thought that was there. Look up, Edward!
I forgive thee! It may be, as thou sayest, my friend,
thatthatNay, I need not repeat it; but if it
should be---which God, in his mercy, avert---
then---then
,
Edward, the seal may be broken.
Molton arose. He took the papers---the book;---but his
face was very stern, then---and there was one moment, a
single moment, when I thought that he was about to dash
the book upon the floor---his eyes lightened---but it was
all over, instantly;---and he stood high and dark before
her, as at first, and full of tremendous repose.
I must leave you, he said, in a firm voice; and, from
the situation in which I now see you, it is probable that
we shall never meet again---on this earth, Juliet;-----but
butwe
shall
meet, somewhere, sooner than they
expect. Bear up, Juliet---the hour is approaching. Go
blithely to thy chamber. I shall to mine. It has no
terrour for me. The time will come---it
will
---when the
horrible mystery shall be exposed to thee;---when
No! I must not trouble thee, woman!Juliet!----my
friend!---I must not trouble thee, at such an hour! Thou
art prepared, I believe. Be so.---It befits thee well.----
Expect nothing---hope for nothing. Death
is
near thee,
and they that would deceive thee, are crueller than death.
(I would have interfered here, but Juliet forbade
it;---and Molton darkened all over, like a sorcerer, whose
untimely spell is interrupted and broken, at the
moment
of its consummation.)
No, Juliet!there is no help for thee. All that
remains
for thee, now, is to dienobly and bravely.
Linger
a little while, and I shall set thee an exampleah!
do not mistake me. I shall not do what thou dreadest.
Look up!look up, thou broken hearted woman!and
believe me
me;
hear me say, that the time shall come,
when all that troubled thee, will have passed away; when
all the darkness and mystery, which I would not, even to
thy solicitation, put away, at our last interview, shall
be no more;and yetbelieve meEdward Molton will
never repeat that, which thy poor heart now thrills at
the recollection of.Mourner!Juliet!farewell!
Juliet gasped for breathextended her hand to him,
with a smile of unutterable thankfulness.
Then
, said
she, I forgive thee. Thou art still the man, that I took
thee for. Farewellfarewell, Edward! Repent, and
be forgiven!
He dropped upon his kneeshe pressed his lips to her
handnot, oh no!
not
with the look or attitude of love
no!but with something holier, higher, purerit was
that of adorationthat, with which a martyr bows upon
the Bible, for the last time.
He was at the door. Her eyes were shuther
delicate
lips just openand he paused; for, like us, it was
probable that he thought her patient spirit had flown!
He pausedshe raised her hand lightly, with a motion
that
he
understood
he!
for, in an instant, he was
another
man;the tears rushed to his eyesand he
shivered
from head to footas if
his
soul were rending
itself
away from her frail tenement.
Leave us!leave us, alone! said he, hurriedly;it
is only for a moment.
We glanced at Julietshe signified her assentand
we departed. I was the last out; and, as I shut the door,
I heard him say, Are the letters
all
here?and she
answered, inarticulately, Yes!it was for that, that I
sent for youit was dangerous. He knelt by her, and,
I thought, but I did not turn fully round to look, that his
arms embraced her, and that her head was upon his
shoulder.
The conversation was low, and interrupted, I thought,
by deep emotion, silence, and sobbing; and Jane says
that she heard your name pronounced, more than once,
in a tone of great earnestness, like displeasure:nay,
though I did not listen, I confess that I thought the same,
once, and I distinctly heard Juliet say, that
She
(but
whether she were then speaking of you, or not, I cannot
tell,) had a noble heart, and a tender onecapable of
the most devout affection, and the most sublime sacrifice.
Soon after this, Molton opened the door, and came
out, and passed us, without appearing to see usthe
same imperturbable solemnity in his facethe same
regal
carriage and movement of body.
When we re-entered, we were both struck with an
essential
alteration in the countenance of Juliet. There
was something in itsomething that I never saw before,
there;---something that I should have called pride,
resentment
,
or indignation, in any other face; but I feared
to think it so in her's. There was the appearance, too,
and Jane called my attention to it, secretly; and when I
looked, I observed that Juliet's eyes followed meand,
I thought, that she coloured and trembledthere was
an appearance, too, in the ashes, as if paper, and a
considerable
quantity too, had just been burnt there:nay,
there were the leaves of a book, or my fancy deceived
me, plainly to be seen, for some minutes after we
entered
.
But, from this moment, Juliet's whole manner was
changed. She was more serious---less pensive: more
heroick and calm;and I was with her for a whole
hour.
What am I to think of this? Can we doubt any
longer
who is the lord of her heart? It must be Molton---it
is. And yet, we have been deceived before. Does she
not know who his
half sister
is?---what
her
character is?---
and that he is, really and truly, the murderer of
William
?---that
William whom she so loved? Let it have
been done fairly, still it was murder in this terrible
Molton
;
for William was a child, a mere child to him. He
could not have injured a hair of Molton's head. Then
why did he slay him? Ah! Sarah! it may be, that I have
thought too well of Molton. What!---am I so base?---
this deadly infusion of envy and jealousy!---O, forgive
me, heaven!---has
this
been able, so soon and so entirely,
to corrupt my heart? What! shall I doubt Molton
now
,
merely because I think Juliet loves him, when I have
withstood all else?---prejudice, slander, and the influence
of thy mortal hatred, Sarah? O! man, man! how base
and earthly are thy judgments! No, Sarah---I will not
desert this man. But give me to see his guilt---make it
plain---and I will pursue him to the end of the earth.----
Yet, what is this, but seeking to gratify my own envy
again? Ah! Sarah! I was not always so inveterate.----
There is some distemper in my heart---some disorder---I
know not what;---but it has changed my nature. All is
greenness and bitterness, where oncehell and fury!
should it
not
be green and bitter?---has not he
plucked
out, by the roots, the blessed image, that death could
not have defaced there---dissolution and rottenness could
not have corrupted! O, shame! shame!---these transports,
how unworthy they are of me! No.---I will be his friend
yet, in spite of my hatred and fear of him. I will go this
day, this
hour
, and visit him as usual;---and wo to the
hand that assails him, without the majesty of the law---
the
law!
---ha!that reminds me of the two strangers
theit may be. But, tell me, Sarah, tell
me. Can it be possible that Juliet loved Molton? Did
he love
her?
if so, how
could
he have loved another?---
No!---he could not. He never loved her, then. But did
she love
him?
Sarah, I dare not answer that question.
I feel my bones quiver in their sockets. Can she have
loved him?---and
does
she, after all? She knows that
Helen is with him---I am sure of it. Can her spirit
endure
such contamination?---
can
it?---No! the touch of
impurity
would be death to it! Good night!
Morning
.
I have kept this unsealed to the last moment. Juliet
is perceptibly better. It
is
pride;---I am not afraid to
say so, to-day;---It
is
pride---I am sure of it. She sits
more erect;---there is less of that tenderness, that
thrilling
tenderness, in her tone---less languor and
melancholy
in her eyes;---there is even a dash of serious
haughtiness. Heaven be praised! Do not inform Frank
of this---
do
not, I beseech you.
Adieu
,
JOHN.
SARAH RAMSAY TO JOHN OMAR.
I know not what to believe. She is too exalted, too
pure of heart, I am sure, to permit any affection, there,
for the dissolute, however specious they may be. But
Moltonthe remorseless villain; O, beware of him.
---What
tremendous apathy, is this? What unspeakable
infatuation? Will you permit the serpent to enfold you
all,I know not how to express myself. I am troubled,
almost to suffocation and blindness, at the thought of him.
Would, that I had less sensibility; yet, why should I
wish it? Would we pray for torpor, numbness, to escape
the pains that accompany sensation? Are not even these
pangs, these palpitations, these tears, these tears of
scalding humiliation and self-abasement, which Juliet,
the meekest creature upon this earth, has wrung from
me, by her reproaches,no, not by her reproaches. but
by the kindest admonition, in the world; are they
not better than insensibility? They are. We have our
sense of suffering, and joy; of agony, and rapture; most
exquisitely proportioned to each other. He, who has
the least sensibility to pain, has the least to pleasure.
Let us not lament, therefore, that our senses are not
sealed up, our touch deadened, our ears stopped, our eyes
shut, to the beauty and the harmony that surround us;
because it may sometimes happen that, that harmony is
too loud and frightful, or that beauty, too terrible. No; if
insensibility were better than this nature, which is so
delicately interwoven with all the crimson labyrinth of
our blood, the ten thousand delicate fibres of our being,
tangled, as they seem, wandering as they appear,
without
order, through all their offices and appointments;
thrilling
,
to agony, when the finger of the Almighty hath
touched one of them, in rebukesending his electricity
through the whole web:no, if insensibility were better
than this state of exquisite being, death were the
consummation
of happiness. But what have I done?---fallen into
the same errour, which I have so often reprimanded in
you....fine writing....but no matter....it came,
spontaneously
from the heart; unstudied, unpremeditated---and, I
trust, will so appear.
But, let me return, for a moment, to Molton. My
suspicions are all awake again. I have just arrived at the
whole truth of an affair, which I once hinted at, in one of
my earlier letters. I am now mistress of the whole, and I
give you leave to take what steps you please, for your own
satisfaction, in the case. If the stories be, as I have no
reason to doubt that they are,
irue
, they, alone, will be
sufficient to establish the deliberate and settled wickedness
of Molton's character.They are as follows. Let him
reconcile them, if he can, to aught that is less than
devilish
.
The disclosure is confidential from me. A strange
accident brought me acquainted with the whole. I believe
it; and, the only anxiety I have, now, is, to discover my
anonymous correspondent, and ascertain in what
country
Molton was born. I used to think him an American;
but I have many reasons to doubt that, of late. But,
whoever it be, that gives me the information, that I now
have, there can be no doubt of his sincerity and truth,
for I hold his address, under seal, with permission to
open it, whenever Molton can be fairly confronted with
his accusers.
When a mere boy, he was surprised, at noon day,
attempting
to enter a lady's bed chamber. She was much
older than Molton, and knew so little of him, that she
was willing to believe, whatever he would say, in
palliation
of his audacity. He told some story, I know not
what, to a friend of her's, and she affected to believe him;
but, it was only affectation. Her blood will run cold, to
this hour, at the mention of his name.
The next, is an affair, yet more atrocious. He was
deeply indebted to a family, every member of which, had
loved him, almost to veneration; and trusted to him,
when he was friendless and alone. He felt grateful;
and they, who knew him well, do say, that he would
have died, at one time, to prove it. A beautiful little
girl, a mere child, innocent and unsuspicious,---(Cousin,
I know not what may be thought of this plain dealing with
a man, on such a subject; but you know that I have been
accustomed, from my earliest infancy, under the
direction
of my departed mother, to think, and speak too, at
proper seasons, of many matters that seem to be
prohibited
to the women of the world. Yes, to them, that are
to be wives and mothers, it is forbidden even to think of
the sacredness and obligation of such offices!---I have
been taught better. I have been made to understand,
that the duties of marriage, and the education of children,
are things of awful import and solemnity; involving all
K
that is religious and responsibe, happiness and virtue,
life and immortality. But the fashion of the time is
different
;
women are mothers, now, ere they have thought
of infants, in any other way, than that of babies and dolls.
Children are bearing children, educating children; and
boys are fathers, nurturing spiritualities, ere they have
learnt the commonest principles of self government.
Cousin, forgive me---the subject is one, that will always
carry me away with it; and I have touched on it now,
that you may not be astonished at my using the freedom
that I do, with a man, in communicating certain affairs,
that relate to the arch imposter, Molton.
I was proceeding to mention his unspeakble
wickedness
toward that child. She was the pride and darling
of the family, to whom he was so deeply indebted;and
the chief sustenance of a widowed mother. Molton used
all his power to corrupt that child, even in her blossom;
persevered for years, and finally went so far as to
enter
her room at night. The poor little creature was
terrified
almost out of her sensesshrieked; and, in her
terrour
,
had so little suspicion of the truth, that when she
encountered Molton, as she opened the door, she threw
herself into
his
arms, for preservation. Heaven!what
was his heart made of, that it did'nt stop forever on the spot!
Judge you, cousin, of that man's address. He was
scarcely suspected, even by the child. Nothing of his
whole life was known to resemble it; and even they, who
felt
some
suspicion of the truth, had not the courage to
whisper it to their dearest friend, still less to
him
. And
such was
his
hardihood, that he spoke of the whole
adventure
,
as of a dream;and with such an air of
innocence
,
that he was never asked to explain, why
his
door
was left open, that night;for he slept in a room near
the child; and a servant, in passing by it, had observed
her light flash in upon the opposite wall of his chamber;
stopped, and found Molton's door ajar.
The third case of this nature, now in my possession,
(but I am assured that there are many more)is the
following. He met with a school girl of high enthusiasm,
and promise. He was kind and friendly to her,
speaking
freely to her, of her inadvertencies, more like a
brother
,
than aughte else;and this, it would appear, is a
common
artifice of his; for, to such perfection has he carried it,
that, while he censures and chides, there is a deep
flattery
in his manner, which he insinuates, like a poison,
into the heart that listens to him. All speak of thisand
all wonder how it happens, that they, who are rebuked
by Molton, often feel proud of it, and colour with a
pleasurable
agitation. But I am in no such doubt. They
are off their guard. He appears to them so frank and
sincere, so incapable of flattery, that they rejoice to
believe
all
that he says. And in all that he proffers in the
way of admonition, there is forever somewhat which is
racy and spicy, somewhat of that which all love, after
having once tasted it, as the very aliment of their being.
Another cause may be, that he never compliments one
directly
,
and as if premeditatedly; but, always, as if by
surprise
;as
if he were taken, off his guard---and had
spoken
the whole truth, from his very heart, by accident,
without intending it. Againhe never pays the
compliment
of his censure, to a fool; and, generally, it is
apparent
,
that, in them, whom he most censures, he is most
interested. And finally, all grant to him, a remarkable
discrimination. He treats no two human creatures alike.
By his very tone, look, and language, they, that know
him well, can perceive the exact degree of estimation, in
which he holds all that he has any knowledge of. I have
wandered again, cousin; but, I hope, not widely from
the subject. We will now return, if you please.
After exciting some interest, it is said, in the heart of
this unexperienced child, he went abroad, and did not see
her again, until she was engaged to be married, to an
excellent
and altogether proper young man. He then
visited
her, again;used all his art; attempted to poison
her affection, excite her distrust, not of her lover, for that
were a vulgar stratagem, but of
herself
. You smile; but
so it was, and the poor girl was seriously indisposed, in
consequence of the agitation, that he kept her in, by
painting
the disorder and agony that would follow her who
married, without a
certainty
that she loved. But he
failed
.
The destroyer was touched with the spear of
Ithurial
,
and he stood suddenly, before that innocent
creature
,
in all the terrour and hatefulness of his true
proportions
.
I have finished for the present. It matters little what
Molton may say about all this;---his word will not weigh
with me. There is a deliberate baseness,an
essential
,
constitutional wickedness in his character, that would
neutralize the fairest appearances, the most plausible tale
in his favour, were he not, what I am assured that he
has been, the greatest liar in the world. It is said, to
be sure, that he is now as remarkable for his scrupulous
regard to truth;but I do not believe it. A habit of
lying is not so easily, nor so soon overcome. It is one of
the most inveterate that can be formed; and will always be
seen in the shape of exaggeration, concealment,
distortion
,
subterfuge, or duplicity, long and long after it has
abandoned a more alarming countenance. The heart
remains the same; and the mind is doubly dangerous.
Tell our beloved Juliet, that I have cried over her dear
letter, and the lock of hair, till my eyes are sore, and till
there is a pulse all over my body. Your last intelligence was
as welcome as unlooked for. It is possible---
possible
,
dear John, that;but no, I will not indulge a hope so
desperate. I would have written to her, but we are to go
away to-day---immediately, I find, instead of to-morrow.
I shall write from the first room that I can sit down in,
with any comfort. Farewell. Keep me informed of
Frank---and BEWARE OF MOLTON. Let that ring in
your ears, night and day.
The two men---take care how you interfere. They
are ministers, who are not to be thwarted. Beware!---
the blow is only suspended awhile;---but it will fallit
will!
---Be discreet and silent.
SARAH RAMSAY.
JANE CARTER TO MATILDA.
My dear Aunt
,
I should not have deserved your reproaches, I am sure,
had I been left to the dictates of my own inclination; but
so much sickness, so much mortification and
disappointment
;
so much of, I know not what, have happened, to
perplex
and thwart me, that I am really sick at heart. O, I do
wish you were here. How incensed you would be!
Juliet
is still the only subject of all the care, and all the
tenderness
of the house and neighbourhood. Nothing but
Juliet! poor Juliet
, is to be heard. If I want any thing
done, the servant is in
her
chamber, or watching at
her
door. If I send my own girl on an errand, she is sure to
loiter; and, when my patience is utterly exhausted, and I
could sit down and cry with a good heart, home she comes
with a malicious account of some stuff or other that she
has heard about the sick baby. Indeed, aunt, I know
not what restrains me; but the people here do act so like
fools, that often and often, I am on the very point of
telling
them so, in plain English.
It is just as you said, after all. I don't believe that the
child is in any danger. To be sure, she looked very pale
and thin, but she is quite too etherial to perish, to
die
even
with that most sentimental of all complaints, the
consumption
O
no, it would be quite too vulgar for
Juliet
R. Gracie to
die
, outright, like a common mortal;
and it has often puzzled me, to conjecture how she is to
be managed, when her time comeswill she pass off in a
vapourthe exhalation of a dew-dropa tear? ha! ha!
ha! her lovers, I take it, would be confoundedly puzzled,
since the doctrine of transmigration is done away with,
and translation, and vanishing, and transfiguration, are
gone by.Shall she go like Numa?Elijah?---or what?
or whom?the fools!
Indeed aunt, I had well nigh hinted it to her, in the
presence of one of her fellows too, that she had gone
quite far enough. The patient creature!What think
you she didshe opened her languishing dull eyes at me,
with such a spiteful appearance of resignation, I declare
that I was ready to laugh in her face. But what the
men see in her, to do at on, and fuss about, as they do,
I cannot imagine. There was your favorite Omar, this
evening, on one side of her, with his mouth open; and
that precious devil, Molton---Lord, I can't help
laughing
now---to see one of those chalk-faced puppets, in such
K 2
a taking, with a fellow, that has debauched more women,
than any other man of his age, in America. She pretends
not to know this. But I know it, well;---and if John
Omar were not such a fool, in this thing, I mean; for, in
other matters, he seems not at all deficient, I would tell
him the whole truthbut I dare not. I am afraid of him,
now; for he knows, by some means or other, that it was
by my management, that Molton was twice admitted.
Accursed folly, it was too, in me---the shock has only
given new life to her! But for that!no, aunt;---let us
leave this subject, only I did not look for
this
result---I
confess,
in her weak state
.
I want your advice. What is to be done with her? She
will get well again, I am sure, if it be only, saint as she
is, to plague and torment
me
, into a consumption. Alas
aunt, I know not where to look, or whom to call my
friend. All that loved me, Juliet has enticed away. I
am nothing, absolutely nothing now, in the house of my
own father. Nay, I had not an evil spirit; I wished her
well, I am sure, till many days of intolerable humiliation,
and many and many a night of shame and sleeplessness;
till
out
of them, a devil had birth. Sometimes I am
sorry for it. Sometimes, I could lie down and weep
nay, go down on my knees before Juliet
herself
;
andwhat!I!I!I kneel to that child!
a pennyless, wretched, sick, helpless child; an orphan,
destitute
and houseless, but for the foolish compassion of my
foolish father!to her, who has thwarted all my
schemes of happiness in lifesoured all hearts against
me; turned love into a poison, and friendship into hatred!
But for her, I might have been a wife, a mother!blessed
God! a mother!with my own babe, naked and
beautiful
,
nestling in my bosom; beloved and respected by all
the world. But for her
her!
--accursed be that witchery
which has impoisoned and alienated all that loved me
but for her, I might have been the wife of
thou
knowest
whom, aunt; but now, oh my heart will burst and
shiver at the thoughtall is not yet knownit may
beit will be, perhapspity me then, pity me aunt,
if there be any thing of humanity left in theeyea, thou
wilt
pity me.
But for her, too, I had been the friend, the bosom
friend, of that haughty, cold, implacable yankee girl
that Sarah Ramsay. But what am I, now? Shunned, hated
not absolutely,
despised
Oh, no!
that
they hav'nt
the courage to express;nay, nor to
feel
. They dare not
cannot despise me. Yet she pretends to piety
she!
to piety.
What shall I do? Really, aunt, there are terrible
thoughts in my heart at times. Come to me. I never
wanted your assistance so much. This step-mother of
mine is a good natured idiot;doatingly fond, as she is of
her neice, she has such a clumsy way of showing it, that,
I am sure, Julict is oftener distressed than relieved, by her
manifestation of it.
Let us reason for a moment. Suppose Juliet
should
die. Then it is highly probable, with my fortune, and
the remains of what, you know to have been a remarkable
fine person, and countenance,that I may regain the
elevation
,
which I have lost, by the continual sickness of my
family, and the perpetual contrast, of my showy manner,
with the quiet, sweet, obedient, and domestick habit of
Juliet. I am not made for the fire-place. She is. I
would to the saddle, if I might; but as that would not be
permitted, in the way I wish, in tilt or tournament,I
must abide by such distinction as is accessible to me. If
I cannot command armies,I can give laws to fashion.
If I cannot be the champion of our rights, in the Senate
Chamber,I can, in the ball room. If I cannot cry to
horse! to horse!I can call for, hob or nob, and money
in both pockets. But suppose that she should recover.
This, I expect;not, because there is any such
opinion
here; nobut simply because
that
would be just
exactly
the awkwardest, and most unpleasant thing in the
world for me. For this reason, I look upon it as a
matter
of certainty. Well then, we are to suppose that she
is well. What will she do? If she would marry
marry any body, I don't care whomshe might have her
choice of all the world;there would be enough left for
meafter she was served. You see how humble I am.
My tears scald me while I writebut my lips smileI
can feel them smile, as if they were convulsed and
writhing
.
Wellif she will marry, all will go right.
I will live and die, on the civilest terms in the world
with her; send her my cards regularly; and take her's in
returngo to
her
christenings, and let her come to
no, the thought is frightful to meBut I will go to
her funeral, with the best bred air in the world.
But suppose that she won't marry. What shall we
do then? You know her art. Under that appearance
of meekness and gentleness, she has a devil of a temper,
when roused. Mine, aunt,
mine
itself, is less terrible.
I've seen it up once, only once;her eyes flashed fire, and
Molton stood quaking before her, as if blasted to the
very
heart, by the brightness that issued from her. The
fool!she was in his powerand he forbore to use it.
He trembledyeaNed Molton, Ned Molton himself,
trembled and weptaha thought strikes me. She
loves him yet. Juliet, beware!he is no trifler a
second
time. Yesaunt
yes!
I want none of your
counsel
now, my mind is made up.
Juliet shall marry
somebody
;
she
shall;
or, she shall go to her grave dishonoured.
ThereI have told the secret now. The horrour with
which my heart laboured, is before thee. I am tranquil
now. Ah!it grew suddenly dark, just then
and I stopped. Was the moon in travail, aunt? Did
some spectre pass between me, and the light, just then?
Or was itpoh, pohit
was
---it was merely my own
blood that blinded me, as it arose and boiledI feel it
retreating again, and my temples are easier, and I see
perfectly clear again, now.
Farewell
,
JANE.
MAD. MATILDA TO JANE.
Jane, are you mad? What a risk you have run! Your
letter came to me,
unsealed!
What miracle has
preserved
you, I know not; but all my examination satisfies me,
that there has been no time
here
, for it to be read in the
office. Do you make some inquiries
there
. Do be more
careful. Your passions will destroy you. I must see
you
I must
, you say. There is a
meaning
in your
letter
,
that freezes my blood. Beware!Hold your hand.
Stir not, to the right nor to the left, 'till I am by your side.
You are on a precipice. A single step may shatter you,
everlastingly. But stopthat is dangerous to write
about. Your thought, fairly carried into execution,
may
prevail. She must be married. She shall be. Many
reasons conspire to render it indispensable. The expense
of her maintenancethe sympathy that she excitesthe
necessity that there is, of disguising our hostility
toward
her;and yet, poor innocent, I could almost weep,
when I think of her. But no, it must not be. It is too
late to relent, now. She must be sacrificed. She
must;
for, if you live together, Jane, it is in vain to disguise it;
she will keep all the men, that are worth a thought, in
a state of perpetual hope and anxiety about her; and
you
will be overlooked, except, (where captivation is only
for an hour,) in the fashionable world.
Indeed, the more that I think of it, the better I am
pleased. There is a man, too, exactly in the humour, for
our purpose. Do you remember Grenville? He still
thinks of Juliet; and you know that, but for Molton, she
would probably have given herself up to him. I think
that I can manage the matter here. I am his confidant;
and if we can compel Juliet to marry him, what harm
will be done? She will get a tight young fellow, with a
plenty of cash, a good heart, and a good profession.
Yours, my dear niece
,
M.
P. S.Don't forget to
seal
your answer. Oby the
way, you are under a mistake; Miss Ramsay is not a
yankee
girl. She has only the yankee temper, with a little
southern heat, superadded. Her mother, however, was
altogether a female yankeecold, insensible, handsome,
and sober.
EDWARD MOLTON TO GEORGE STAFFORD.
I cannot reply to your kind letter as it deservesfor,
just at this time, I happen to be very busy; but, in a
brief way, I will try to answer some of your enquiries.
What do I think of our literary journals, authors,
reviews
,
and editors?you say; and what are they about?
In answer, I say, that by and by, I shall enter more at
large, into their characters. At present, I can only
relieve
you, by saying, in general terms, that they are a
cowardly, mercenary set. Not one in a hundred of them,
has the courage to take a decided stand, in pronouncing
any judgment. They content themselvesand by
they
,
I mean now, such men as Robert Walsh, junior,
Esquire
;
they content themselves in retailing the imported
literature, and the imported criticism toowould you
believe it? of your unprincipled journals. Even he, who
has the impudence to set himself up, as one of the
guardians
of American literature, as one of them, to whom it
is authorized to look up for countenance and protection,
is consuming his strength, in the manufacture of a daily
paper; and in the monthly
compilation
of a museum, made
up, God help our patience! of the refuse haberdashery of
Great Britain.O, that such men, with the present
editor
of the
North American Review
at their head, were,
for a little time, held up to the indignant rebuke of the
American people, as they deserve! What do they
pretend
to do? What have they undertaken? And what
have they done? What have we permitted them to do?
Stafford, my blood is all in a tingle, at the thought of
their presumption, and our abjectness. I tremble, all
over, when I think of what they have dared to undertake,
and dared, in the desperation of their audacity, to do.
But, I am ashamed, and could weep, for vexation, to think
how tamely a great people have submitted, to whatever
they have chosen to do, with them, and for them.
Robert Walsh, for example, is put, by his friends, in the
first rank of native criticks. The others publish, what
they call a
North American Review
. But of whom do
they writefor whom?Not
of
Americansnot
for
Americans. They abound, chiefly, in
original
reviews of
works that are forgotten, merely, because it is the
fashion at Edinburgh, and London, to deny our
erudition
;and
to be very pedantick, where there is the least
danger of exposure or contradiction; or they, now and
then, enter the lists with the English and Scotch
reviewers
,
in praise of some poem or novel of the day
published
in
your
country, not in
ours
which never makes
its appearance here, or perishes in the first editionand
then fancy that they are establishing the reputation of
American literature!---Blockheads---what care we for
the present race of English writers? Are
our
reviews
to be made upon that side of the atlantic, and republished,
under the title of Walsh's Museum?---Or, as in the
North American, are they to be confined to the works of
another people; and now and then, as it will
sometimes
happen, of a
native
writer, after they have been
amazed at meeting with his name in some European
journal. There was Brockden Brown, for example---
and the Federalist. Our American reviewers took up
the cudgels in their favour, most gallantly---but when?
how?---when there were no longer any body to
contradict
them; when there was nothing to apprehend---and
when it would have been infamy, to forbear.---Stafford,
I am an American---I glory in the name. Were I an
Englishman, I should glory in the name of an Englishman.
But then, as now, I should lift up my voice, in
unqualified
denunciation of such conduct in my countrymen.
What!---shall these men be paid, by our best people, for
a continual violation of their duty, their avowed duty?---
Shall they be permitted to transgress forever? to set their
very title page at naught? to sneak away from all
accountability
?
to lie by, and cower, and skulk, under one
pretence
and another, when a new American work appears?
to shuffle away from a decided opinion, on
any
American
work, until the publick have pronounced their judgment?
No Stafford! I say thisand, Englishman as you are,
you cannot but agree with me. I say that it is the duty
of an American reviewer to take some noticelong or
shortfor, or againstevery work that appears. If he
cannot do it himselflet him get somebody elseor
abandon the name of an American reviewer. And I say
that, to nothing but cowardice or incapacity, should a
failure to do so, be attributed. Can you wonder at my
warmth. Our press, young as it is, abounds in the
bright prodigal issue of authors, that only want to be
taken notice of, to become competitors with the best and
proudest of yours. You smileI can forgive youfor
one who has been accustomed, as every American of my
age has, for twenty years past, to the more insulting
doubt of his own countrymen, cannot be angry with a
foreigner, for doubting that we have common sense.
Take up one of our last numbers of the
North
American
or
the
Museum
or Port Folioanother paltry
counterfeit. Look at them. What do you find in them?
Remember that they are
American
publications,
professedly
written, or compiled by Americans, in the hope of
advancing the reputation of the country! Heaven, what
a bitter sarcasm upon our quackery and pretension; our
yankee tricksand all our honesty and intellect, are
the mere title pages. One, you will find made up from
Campbell's cast-off Magazinesand the newspapers of
the day;another of stupid reviewsstupidly remodelled
the other, a body of prize essays, written, one would
be tempted to think, to prove to the people abroad, that,
barbarians, as we arewe are able to translate the
title
pages of very learned works, in Italian, French,
German
and Latin;but let me explain myself. First you
come upon a review of somebodyan Italian;whose
name
it may be, that the editor of the North American
while upon his travels in Greecewithout an allusion to
which, he cannot blow his nosehappened to hear. The
title page, of course, is given to you in
Italian
. The
next will be a mass of eruditionhaving about enough
to do with the subject, to make you believe it a transcript
of some student's common place bookdiligently copied,
and adroitly tacked togetherprobably with a running
title in German or French. PshawI have not
patience
with such foppery. If we are ever to obtain a
literary character, it must be by a bold, high handed
carriage of ourselves. The Scotch have been trodden
into coalitionlike muscles in the mud;and, after a
time, if kicks and cuffs won't do, we may have the same
good luck.
But, by the way, I would not have you utterly
misunderstand
our literary character. The
North
American
Review
, as it is
now
called (in derision, one would
think) is no longer what it has been. Time was, when
the hands of mighty men were to be seen, even in the
clumsiest of its decorations. It has been (if you will
allow
me to amuse myself for a moment) a great Banking
Housea Treasurywhere you were sure to find
ore
,
and ingotsand bars, though the former might not
always
have been purified, nor the two latter coined or
stamped. Then there were the most powerful, rich, and
beautiful issues from it, whenever the pressure was
greatest. It could have withstood then, the
run
of all
North America. But how is it now? Not much unlike
the Bank of Amsterdam, after the eruption of Napoleon
a place of subterranean darkness and emptiness: a place
of discount and deposit for bad paper (which were better
fitted for any other
place of deposit)
drawn by bankrupts
who live by overdrawingcountersigned by Mr.
Everett
and
endorsed
by him, when very questionable
upon the patience, folly and good nature of a publick,
who only want to be
run
upon for five minutes, to
become
sensible of their own precarious situationto
check
100 per cent. at least, off hand; and to dishonour, forever,
every future draft of the concern. In shortto say all
in one wordThere
were
such men as Daniel Webster,
Justice Story, Mr. Dana, and Mr. Sparks, among them
and there are now, only the Everett and
company
, to
manage the institution.
But there are nevertheless, two or three scientifick
works of great merit in our countryat the head of
which we may place, Silliman's Journal. More of him
anonand of Cleveland too (an honour to our country)
and of Hayden, a devilish clever fellow in his way.
Good by, StaffordGood bybut, in mercy to our
reputation, do not believe that either Mr. Walsh, or Mr.
Everett, or their solemn retinue of essay writers, form
any part of our natural born Americans. Nothey are
creatures of another element, unworthy of breathing the
same atmosphere. Where is their manhood? They have
none. They are always in the rear of publick opinion
always hesitatingalways qualifyingso that, happen
what may, they are never in a great perilof being either
remarkably right, or remarkably wrong.
L
But is there nothingabsolutely nothing, to commend,
in the North American? Yesnow and then---by some
strange accident, they do get a sensible essay into their
paper, which smacks of America; and not unfrequently,
you find a page or two, that seem to have something to
do with the subject. But---farewell---farewell, for the
present---hereafter I shall put several of these gentry in
training. They deserve it; and, if you please, you may
publish what I say---and give my name, on
demand
, to
all who have the heart to ask for it.
MOLTON.
JOHN TO SARAH.
I have just returned from Molton's, and we have
agreed upon a time, when he will be as little occupied as
possible. He does not suspect my object, I am sure; but
I am determined, whatever be the peril, to bring him
directly
to the point, on the subject of your letter. The
interview
is to be this evening. He is darker and sterner than
ever; and, yesterday, when I called, for the first time,
since Juliet and he met in my presence, he refused to be
seen. But I saw herhis wife?yea, his
wife
. She
was wasted away, almost to death; and, when I entered,
she started, as if the tread were hostile; nay, during the
whole of my visit, for I desired much to see Molton,
unsocial
as he is--and was not deterred, until she went
herself
,
to get permission, and returned with a promise from
him, to see me in the eveningher eyes were glancing,
vividly, and continually, toward the door, the court-yard,
and the high road, as if something evil were at hand.
She is a majestick creature;and the tone of her voice,
went to my heart. We spoke of foreign parts, and she
manifested, at times, a remarkably familiar and apt
acquaintance
with every thing of interest; at others, it was
less so, evidently from her confusion and anxiety. She
must be very young, yetI should think not more than
eighteen; and, for an English woman, you know, that is
little better than childhood. The servant brought her a
folded paper, while I was there;her hand trembled
as she read it; and the colour flew into her face, as she told
him, tearing it in pieces, and returning it, to bear it back
to the person from whom he brought it, with her
compliments
.
I wish that you could have seen her. She is
more sinned against than sinning; yet the fierce spirit of
her eyes; the quick movement of her beautiful lip, when
agitated; and the white lustre of her hands, when she
put aside her redundant black hair, somewhat angrily,
while she tore the billetindicated a disposition
compounded
of fiery and strange elements; one that I should
tremble to encounter, in its wrath. Farewell!The
moment that I have done with Molton, I shall write you
the particulars.
A singular affair happened night before last at Jane's.
Somebody attempted to break into Juliet's room, but
was frightened away. A pistol was fired, and it was
then discovered to be a womansome mad creature, we
suppose. Juliet was inconceivably alarmed, but it is all
over now.
JOHN.
P. S. I open this to say that yours, from
New-Haven
,
is just received. I have no time to read it nowand
have put it aside, to be read and answered, to-night, after
my return from Molton's.
SARAH TO JOHN.
In a letter from Mr. Grenville, whom you may
recollect
,
to my father, that arrived just now, as we sat at the
breakfast table, is one for me, from our dear Frank. I
have scarcely time to scribble a word; but have
determined
to keep a sort of journal; and, when the sheet is full,
to send it.The carriage is at the door.Frank is well
when I have read it, at leisure, I will tell you the
particulars
.
We left New-York about two hours since, rose
very early, and are just recovering from the depression
and desolateness that followed. The air is yet wintry.
Four o'clock
.We shall not reach New-Haven to night,
and father begins to wish that we had taken the steam
boat, as he recommended at first, and sent the carriage
round by land. He is quite distressed about the horses;
and I am tempted to laugh, sometimes, at my own
insignificance
in comparison. We have just dined; and, when
we stop to-night, I shall make it a point, to say a word
to Juliet.Heaven bless the dear creature.
Nine o'clock
.It has rained all the afternoon; and I
am in quite low spirits. My good father, minding his
habitual reverence for regularity, rain or shine, gave me
a very broad hint, a few moments ago, that I must not
think of sitting up any longer than
ten
, in the parlour;
and, after complaining, with much emphasis, of having
been jammed up in a close carriage with all sorts of
trumpery, cakery, band-boxes, and girls, in his good
natured waywhich you know there is no resisting,
he signified that, when travelling, one ought to go to bed
at least one hour earlier than usual. I looked at the
clock, and smiled, but I was obliged to go. It stood at
nine
, and was the Q. E. D. to his proposition; a proposition
that, more simply conceived, would have stood thus
Come Sarah, pack off! give me a kiss, and pack off.
Nay, at this rate, I shall never begin to make up my
despatch for Juliet. So, I will leave off here; write
what I can to her, and enclose it, when I can.
New Haven
.At last we have arrived. Really, it is
a beautiful place, and I have been all over it, I believe.
We drove in, over a pleasant road, just as the people
began
to get abroad, in the morning, and have been
constantly
occupied since, in racing over the colleges, and
examining the fine cabinet of professor Silliman, whose
travels in England and Scotland, you have reason to
remember
,
for their beautiful, unpretending simplicity;--and
whose travels to Quebec, &c. just issued, I take to be one
of the most egregious, and ill-judged pieces of
book-making
,
that was ever perpetrated by so worthy a man.
But the cabinet is truly magnificent. The professor is
a man of science; and a work conducted by him here, I
am told, is thought very highly of, by our arrogant
friends abroad.The reputation of the college is on the
increase; and the library here, is one of the most
respectable
in America. There are three or four very beautiful
churches too, all in a cluster; and, if I may be allowed so
to speak, of different orders; one, at any rate, seems really
Gothick
, and the others, I have not quite pretention
enough to give a name to, but they are very pretty. An
object of considerable curiosity to strangers, too, is a
grave yard. It is full of native marble, of every variety,
found, they say, at Middletown, close byoh, I must
not forget a trivial incident, that occurred in our
rambling
there. It is a traveller's privilege, you know, to be
startled, with the commonest thing, when he has
nothing
else to do.I was reading an epitaph, when my
father
touched my arm, and pointed to a figure at a
distance
,
that was leaning against an urn;it was twilight,
and his person could not be distinctly seen, but there was
something uncommon, and even striking in his attitude.
My father took my arm, and, as we returned, we passed
near the place, but the stranger averted his head, folded
his arms, and took another path.
Did you not observe him, before, said my father,
carelessly. There was something in his tone,
nevertheless
,
that startled me. I turned and looked in his face,
and it instantly flushed across my mind, that there was
some
suspicion
there. I stopped. I laid my hand upon
his arm. I remembered how he had resisted, longer and
more earnestly than he was wont, my importunity to
visit
the church yard.
No, sir, said I, I never saw the man before, in my
life, to my knowledge.
I am glad of it, was the reply.
But why was he glad of it? Who was the man? Some
student, probably, who chose to saunter after us, or
rehearse
his attitudes, under the affectation of melancholy,
(for such was his appearance) and settled despondency,
before us, because he saw that we were strangers.
He has followed us a long time, said my father.
Followed us!whothat man!I exclaimed. It
now occurred to me that there
was
somebody near me, as
I came through a long entry, rather dark, from the
cabinet
of Mineralogy.Was this the same person? My
L 2
blood thrilled at the time, and I turned and caught at my
father's armI remember, but he took no notice of it,
whatever, or whoever it was; for it had passed very
quickly.
Yes, answered my father, I believe that I have
seen him, twice before to-day; both times, he seemed to
be observing
us;
and once, I am sure, he avoided us, as
if he were unwilling to be seen.
There
cousin; if I would stop just there, a very pretty
effect might be produced; but unfortunately, the matter has
become quite intelligible, since our return. We happened,
at tea, to speak of two tremendous rocks, that can be seen
from almost any part of the city;---one, in particular,
which rears itself up, as from the midst of a plain,
blackening
,
with its shadow, a vast extent of blue water and
green turf below. Our landlord heard us, and, as is the
fashion here, I find, entered into conversation with us,
exactly as if we were in his bar room. My father was
mightily pleased with this; and, in his blunt way, kept
him in conversation, till the whole mystery came out.---
It seems that there is an asylum for the deaf and dumb
here; and the pupils are perpetually playing some mad
prank in the neighbourhood;not long since, they built
a great fire upon the top of one of these rocks, at
midnight
.
The effect was terribleit looked like a furnace
in heaven; and the people were all thrown into
consternation
for awhile. There are several exceedingly
interesting
creatures, among the helpless association,gifted
beings, whose intellectual faculties seem but the brighter,
for the darkness that abides upon their physical organs.
How providently are we fitted for such deprivations. If
we lose our sight, our feeling becomes all the quicker
for it. And so with all our other senses. Have you
forgotten our blind friend, Dr. , the lecturer on
opticks
,
at Edinburgh? Did you ever hear him maintain
that it would be better to be born without eyes? He does
it, something in this way. I believe. First, he proves
that
his touch
is better than
our sight;
for he can discover
the most delicate scratch, made with an etching tool upon
a polished steel plate, with the end of his finger, honed
for the purpose, when the naked eye cannot. The sense
of sight, he goes on to say, is confined to one organ,
so delicate, that the least thing destroys, or impairs it;
subject to many peculiar, unknown, and distressing
diseases
;
and always impaired by age and sickness. Once
gone, there is no help for you. It is too late
then
, to
cultivate
the sense of touch. But if you were born blind,
you would get the same exquisite sense that he has. And
that
cannot be destroyed. Lop off that finger,it still
exists in another. Lop off the hand, the arm, the body;
yet while there is one spark of life left, the faculty of the
touch remainsit still
feels
. Therefore, it is better to
be born blind!
Othere is one thing, that I had well nigh forgotten.
My father, you know, is little curious, or suspicious,
about what concerns me. Therefore it is, that, feeling
proud of his confidence, I cannot conceal anything from
him. Be careful then, hereafter, of what you say; for, if
he should desire to see your letters, I shall certainly
show them to him. I mention this because, lately when
I received an anonymous note (relating to Molton,) his
pleasant eyes grew serious, and he remarked, with some
little petulance, that I seemed to be rather too full of
negotiation
.
Sobe wise in season, and, whatever you
write of your own, take care not to put that which concerns
another
, in the power of accident.
Farewell
,
SARAH.
P. S. O, there is no doubt that the stranger
is
one of
the poor deaf and dumb creatures of the asylum.
SARAH TO JULIET.
Juliet, my sweet Juliet!would that I were near
thee!I might then prove to thee, how deeply I have
been affected by thy counsel. I wanted but that, it would
seem, to know thee, perfectly, as thou artthe most
patient
of human beings, the most benignant, the most
forgiving
.
If my heart were not the better for thy chiding,
I know not what could make it better. Am I humbler, in
reality? I do believe that I am, dear; but I cannot
declare
it yet, until I have had my humility more fully
tried. They tell me that there issome prospect of
thy
restoration
, I was about to say;but no, it would
be cruelI ought not to say it. Do not believe me;
disregard itI pray thee: continue as prepared as thou
hast been; as resigned, as lowly, and if aught
can
help
thee, that tranquillity and submissiveness will. I meant
to have written a long letter, but I cannot.
My spirits are heavy; and there is a strange
perturbation
at my heart, that I cannot attribute to aught but
my distress for thee, dear, patient, Julietheaven be
with thee!forever and ever; and, if we must part, all my
prayer is, that thou mayest pass away, as thou hast lived,
in purity and quiet; and, that I may follow thee,
as
purely
,
and
as
quietly.Farewell!but with all my effort,
all my apprehension, I cannot bring myself to realize
thy danger.What!but yesterday, my companion at
the school, so beautiful, so full of health, and to day
O, no, it cannot be.Thou art
not
so very frail.Ah
what have I done!Juliet,
dear
Juliet, do not regard
me! Do not let me delude thee. Expect death
expect
nothing elsefarewell.
My father has just sent up to inform me, that the
gentleman
and family, whom he was expecting to meet at
Boston, have actually arrived within a few miles of this
city; and that, instead of going to Boston, now, they will
join their forces, and proceed, directly, to Lake George,
or to Niagara, while the water is at the fullest, with the
melting snow, and spring rains. I shall continue to
write thee, at every stage, and send, as I can. In the
mean time, my friend, my sister, my beloved Juliet, let
nothing disturb thee;
think not of the past
and O, think
not ofnay, I must not name himand write me as
thou canst.
SARAH.
EDWARD MOLTON TO JAMES HARROW.
I pray you, my dear Harrow, do not address me again,
with the title of
Esquire
. I do not like it, and am not
authorized to assume it. Nay, to speak seriously, it
offends me, when a man of sense, knowing me to be an
American
, calls me
Esquire
.
Your affectionate letter came to me in a good time. Some
circumstances, of a nature too serious to explain, have
kept me, for a long time, nay, ever since we parted, in a
state of continual agitation. The natural result of
which, is, exactly what you predicted. I am not long
for this world. My body is worn out. It may be, that
my mind hath shattered it. But, be it what it may, the
fulfilment of my destiny is rapidly accomplishing. Yet,
nobody knows it. I would go quietly, if I can.
Can
you
believe that I have forgotten you? noyou knew well,
at the moment when your pen traced the words; or you
would have known it, had you stopped your hand, and
asked yourself the question, that it was false. It was
one of your
habitual
phrases, Harrow, and said without
any meaning at all. Were it not so, I should have been
mortified and alarmed. You know that I do not easily
form an attachment; that my heart is barren of late, of
fruit and blossomironthat its germinating principle
is extinguished; that it never will be in flower again
Can you believe then, that it has forgotten the time, the
spring time of its power, when it loved and was beloved;
when it chose
you
for its friend, andnonono
Harrow, you
knew
that I had
not
forgotten you. It
was unworthy of you, and of me, therefore, to say so,
even in pleasantry. It was worseit was childishthe
coquetry of a man.
You tell me that Clinton Howard is dead. I am glad
of it. My blood leaped in my veins, when I saw the
name. Being deadI forgive him. It might have been
otherwise, had we met. In sickness and death, we are
forgivingbut the current of hostility flows in, with the
flow of the blood, again. I am not used, you know,
to carrying my sword away, without a heart stain upon
it, where I am so wronged, accursed, so irretrievably
accursed, as I have been, by the machinations of that
man. Tell him that I forgive himtell him. But I
forget.Ah, HarrowI shall
meet
him, before you do; and
I will tell him so, with my own lipsyestear open my
bosom before him, shew him a heart, a noble
heart---reduced
to blackness and death, by his infernal sorceries;
uncover my side-- shew him the serpent that is feeding
there; and then, while the hand of the Judge is upon us
both,I'llno matterno matter. Time
enough, when we meet.
The husband---Harrow, is it true? Beware how you
trifle with me. I am in no humour for such things. I
have just come to that passage again. Can it be that he
survived? Do
you
really believe it?the tomb empty;
perhaps it was done by the surgeons, Harrow. Such
things have happened. At any rate, hear me, hear me,
as thou lovest me, and O, if there be one pulse of that
gallant nature that thou hadst, when we parted, go to the
bottom of this story. See if he be really and truly, a
living man. Then see where he iswhere is her
brother
?
Spare no expensenone;go to the bottom of the
ocean---the ends of the earth---but let me hear the result
by the first vessel. Nay, send a duplicate by every
vessel
that comes to America. Do this, and I will bless
thee, Harrow, bless thee, with my latest breath. O, if
it be true, indeed, what a load will be taken off my heart.
Then, I shall be happy---
then
, Harrow, I shall care not
how soon he may strike his dagger into my side. I shall
die contented.
Would you believe it? The people here, do not even
know that I was ever in your country. One or two have
said it, but they have always said it, doubtfully. And
my own mother, even she does not know that I am other
than what I seem to the whole world; stern and solitary.
No! she does not suspect that there is blood, blood,
Harrow
,
upon these hands. They call me a Scot, too!
excellent
!
I was interrupted. Harrow, nobody knows me here.
I sit alone. I walk alone. I hold no communion with
aught that hath life in itexcept . Have I said
enough? What has she not endured for me?and
can
I
leave her? No, no!though the heavens were to pass
away, this nightthis very night, in thunder and smoke,
I should not be alone---I should not know it---if Helen were
near me.
Harrow, my hand shakes so, that I can scarcely see
the paper. The whole atmosphere is reddish, and full
of bright characters. Do you believe in ghosts? I am
serious, Harrow. Do you believe it possible that a dead
man may return? If such a thing be possible, then have
I seen a man that I once slew. He was at my elbow this
moment. Can you read what I write? I cannot. But
still I go onononseeing nought, hearing nought,
determined to bear up to the lasta
I have been sick, Harrow. Something has happened
to me. I know not what;but when I come to myself,
just now, it was totally dark about me, and I knew not
where I was. At first, I had some confused notion that
the day of judgment had come;and then, that I was at
sea, and had been thrown out of my birth, as I once was,
when the ship was struck by a squall, and rolled over.
At last, however, I recollected myself perfectly. I arose
rang the bellwaited for lights to comeand have
set down again. Am I afraid? Yes, mortally afraid;
but I dare not acknowledge it. One person might be
deceived, Harrowthe guilty one;I can conceive of
that. But, how happens it, that this supernatural
shivering
this
horrour and chillinessat a certain hour, is
common to all that inhabit this apartment, or the next?
How is it that strangers are unable to sleep here? No! I
dare not confess that I am afraid. Poor Helen!it is only
last night that I was awakened out of a sweet, O! a most
sweet and refreshing slumber, almost the first that I have
had, since we entered this accursed mansion, by a quick
cry, and a dead weight falling upon my naked breast.
I awoke. Poor Helen was lifeless. Her cold hand
embraced
mine like that of a drowning creature. The moon
shone through the red curtains with a sickly strange
lustre, and the whole room was bright, in all but one
spot.
That
was dark,but even
that
soon became bright;
and then, I awoke my sweet Helen. God of heaven!
how cold she was. I shuddered as if I held a corpse
another
corpse, Harrow, to my heart, and was carrying
it, in the starlight, to burial. But why do I tell thee of
that?
Thou
knowest nothing of it
thou
oh, thou art
as unsuspecting, as they that are about me. They see
me, know me, talk to me;but little do they dream of
what I am capable, or of what I have done. We lay and
conversed, nearly all the night; and I was chilled by the
contact. Her arms enfolded me, like frozen serpents.
The affinity between us seemed suspended for awhile.
O, Harrow, how bitterly have we suffered!how cruelly,
how inconceivably, have we been slandered! By heaven,
there never was a righteous movement of the hand or
heart of man, which might not be represented to his
destruction. Well, we lay and talked of the apparition.
I ridiculed her fears;---but her cold cheek was close to
my heart; and, I am sure, that its palpitation was a
distressing
subject of doubt, to her. She wept---and I
embraced
her, chilly and damp as she felt;---while her
redundant
hair swept over my arms, as if the spectre were
there. Yea, I embraced her in his very presence! I
know that he was standing over us. I felt it. It was
in defiance. Were it aught that would have appeared,
at my bidding, Harrow, naked as I was, weak as I was,
I would have summoned it again, and put my
questioning
home to it!---I would! by my everlasting soul! What!
have I lived to this age, to be the sport of malicious
shadows. What business has it here? If
here
why does
it trouble Helen?why, my friends? Have I not seen a
shadow, blacker than all the surrounding darkness,
again and again, at my bedside? Why was it there?
O, Harrow, pity me. There is some terrible delusion
in this. I know it. I am sure of it. Yet, I would give
my right arm to understand it. The cause is a natural
one. I do not doubt
that;
but my flesh creepsyes, even
now, it creepsat the creaking, perhaps, of the door
Harrow, my friend, give me thy hand! It dare not face
me! It dare not take a shape to itself, and appear before
me! No!it is the shadow of a dastard! I have called
to it!---dared it!---cursed it, on my knees, in prayer and
blasphemy, but it would not appear.
It dared not!
Perhaps
I have been mistaken. It was only for a moment,
that I ever saw anything; and that was in the great
mirror
,
before which I am writing; and sometimes, God
forgive
me for my pusillanimity, I get so appalled and
crushed by the weight of terrour and desolation, that was
upon me, that I dare not lift up my eyes to it! No,
Harrow
,
it dare not face me!
But it went by me, in the wind.
It was
his
whisper, too. I could swear to it. I felt it.
It was evil. It was no friendly visiting.
Evening
.
Two days have passed. I am still very weak, and
subject to such frequent fits of derangement, that I dared
not take out the sheet on which I have been writing, lest
I should be too suddenly seized, and it
might
fall into the
hands of Helen, or of some one that I would not like to
know me. But I am more cheerful, now. She is sitting
opposite to me;her beautiful eyes lowering upon me,
continually, in all their ravishing brightness. I am
every
hour expecting a young man, of whom I have a high
opinion. He is romantick in his temper; and the dark
grandeur of my habitation, and, perhaps, the mystery
about its master, have captivated him. Till he comes, I
must do the best that I can, to finish this long letter; but
you
deserve
a long one, my friend;and I shall try to
give you, page for page. My nerves are exceedingly
shattered, and I have no confidant but youjudge of my
situation.
Apropos, of Baltimore. I do not wonder at your
prejudice
;
but the worst story that you have heard is
mightily
exaggerated. That murder happens now and then,
is true;that boys have gone upon the highway,and
deliberately thrust a knife into a poor fellow's heart,
when he was bound hand and foot, is true; that many a
privateer, during the late war, has become a pirate, or
slave trader since; and, probably, under the countenance
of some of our great men, is extremely probable, to say
the least of it;that there was a mob here not long since,
in which a dozen respectable citizens where nearly
murdered
and hungand one old man, an officer of the revo
M
lution
was
murdered outright, by a rabble, whom a single
company of horse would have dispersed; and that the
murderers
escaped on trial, is also true:but, after all, there
are as fine and free spirited a set of fellows, in Baltimore,
as any where else on this earth. They are frank, and
hospitable,and
honest
, I have no doubt, in the main,
notwithstanding the bank-robberies of some respectable
scoundrels,and the unparalleled commercial gambling;
and consequent failure of another part of the community,
as any body of people to be found
out of Edinburg or
Botany
Bay
.
[3]
[3]
The yellow fever, and all such matters, are attributed to the
establishment
of a church in Baltimore, where they worship but
one
God.
These last words are by Helenseeing me
stop, for a phrase, and knowing that I was writing to
you
she made me read what I had written, and then
added
that
. Hereafter, I shall make it a point to set you
right in several matters relating to this country, and the
state of literature and the fine arts, here; at present, I
must content myself with replying to your story of the
pirates. I shall tell it, as it was, without favour or
partiality
.
As it is told abroad, I admit, that it looks serious.
There is little difference, to be sure, in the
facts
, but the
colouring is, in general, too like substance.
The story, if I understand it, with you, is, that we are
a nest of pirates,scarcely better, in Baltimore, than the
Barbary powers:that, it is almost impossible to bring a
pirate to justice here; and that, when you have overcome
all the tricks of law, the partiality of the judges, the
ability and eloquence of counsel, the reluctance of the
jury,and obtained a verdict, and a condemnation:that,
after all this, the chief magistrate is sure to be beset for
a pardon, or commutation of the punishment;that he
almost always, in his covetousness of popularity,
fearfulness
of offending , and from a few other equally
worthy and dignified considerations, does pardon them.
But that, when he refusesand these pirates are
actually
hung, the citizens cut them down in form; go, in
procession
to the burial, just as they did to that of
Washington
and Lawrence (a naval captain herecommander
of the Chesapeake)and deposit their bodies in
consecrated
ground.
All this is too true. The case did occur once. Two
men were, formally, deliberately, and reluctantly
condemned
as pirates;suffered as pirates; and should have
been buried as pirates. But no, some well meaning
citizens
petitioned the presidentwho, merciful and weak
as he is, would not pardon them, nor commute the
penalty; and therefore, to show their respect to him and
the
law
, they went in procession to their graves;
honoured
them as
martyrs
as the
victims
of the lawnot as
pirates;not, as they really were, of that remorseless
band, who traverse the ocean, and make war upon the
poor mariner,the most defenceless of God's creatures.
But it is said that they were innocent. Innocent! How
is that known? How dare you presume such a thing in
the face of their condemnation, under the deliberate
wisdom
of your laws? Do you believe it? On what proof? Is
there any? NoNo. You have listened to their own story,
and who cannot tell as plausible a one? Who, if his own
story be believed, will ever be found guilty of any crime?
No, Harrow, it was a mistaken thing,rash and
unthinking
,
got up in resentment to the President of the
United States, because he refused, wisely refused their
pardon. Suppose that they were innocent of bloodshed.
There was still enough left to make them guilty of
piracy
.
And piracy is not to be forgiven, by a commercial
people. Noif there be aught to complain of, it is the
clemency of our chief magistrate. He should be
inflexible
.
I would divest him of the power of pardoning.
What then? The jury would be less likely to condemn.
No more criminals would suffer, and the majesty of the
law would be vindicated.
Were they innocent? So much the better for
themselves
.
The drunken man, who commits murder, may
not have intended to kill;the man, found in possession
of stolen goods,
may
have found them, as he declares,
when he was alone;
but there is no help for himthere
should be none, except in his general character. Both
may
be innocent; but if you pardon the former, you invite
men to the commission of murder, under pretence of
inebriety
;
and could never punish one, merely from finding
stolen goods in his possession. Nay, the law ought to
examine
rigorously the plea of insanity, itself. It is easily
counterfeited;it were very easy, for one who meditated
some tremendous revenge
I know it, Harrow
to betray,
for months before, by his extravagance, enough to startle
the jury, when on trial. But let him perish. If there
be the slightest doubt that he was truly mad
let him
perish!
God will do him justice. We cannot:---and the
policy of society commands us to judge of men, by
appearances
;
and of actions, by their consequences.
I stopped, on looking at my watch, for the time is
close at hand; and I feel a growing inquietude to know
why I am so seriously interrogated. The unclouded
moon shines beautifully in upon us, now. How mildly,
strangely expressive, is her face. I see shadows passing
over it, as she goes onward, onward, forever onward, on
her sweet, quiet pilgrimage;---the light itself grows dim;
and the loveliness of Helen is truly spiritual at this
moment
.
She remembers you;---weeps, now and then, in
thinking of old times;---andbut farewell. It is time
to part, indeed. Farewell! Don't forget that the
Baltimoreans
are a generous, warm-hearted, noble people,
and cruelly slandered, not only by you, but by their
countrymen.
Yours, truly and heartily
,
ED. MOLTON.
James Harrow, London
.
JULIET TO SARAH.
Sarah
Fall down upon thy knees, to our blessed Father in
heaven! He hath had compassion upon me; my
complaint
is not that of death. The crisis hath passed;
several
consultations have been heldan operation
performed
,
and I have come out, again, from the chamber of
darkness; from the very tomb, I might say, like one
rejoicing
from the sepulchre---among the flowers, and wind,
and sunshine of another world. O, Sarah, in this calm
evening, with the dear blue sky, floating dimly up there,
where I might have been at this monent, in His mercy,
had he not forborne a little while; and the cold air just
stirring the myrtle leaves, there at the windowO, what a
horrible sense I have of the past---the loneliness and
desolation that I was hastening to.---Stay---one word
more.I am forbidden to write, even to thee; and they
are shutting the windows, at this moment, as if the breath
of God, were not the breath of life to me. Where is our
friend John? I have not seen him for two weeks.
Nobody
knows where he is. And I would have told you,
Sarah, with my own hand, earlier than this, what the
prospect was, of my recovery, but I waited to have the
hope confirmed. I was willing to die.Was I?O, I
know not. I could not die now. How strange it is. I
look back at that willingness, with wonder and
amazement
.
I ask myself, if it be possible that II, a poor,
weak, trembling creature, was so well prepared, as it
seemed, to go before the judgment-seat. Sarah, I can
scarcely breathe, when I think of what I have escaped.
Was I nerved by desperation? Criminals, they say,
are so, sometimes; and stand firm to the last; when, at
the slightest whisper, or murmur of compassion, or hope,
they are agitated to convulsion. Nay, have I not heard
my father say, that, in the battles of the Revolution, he
did his duty, like a man(no, like a brute;)
without one thought of fear---one prayer to his Maker,
when the balls poured in upon them, like a storm of hail
from the sky; and afterward, when alone in the dim wood,
journeying with no other companion, than Him, whom he
had forgotten in his greatest need, that he has fallen flat
upon his face, at the recollection of his tremendous
insensibility
?
I would not add another word, for it is unaccouutable
to me, how I have had the strength, to write so much, in
the flutter of my heart, at breathing the fresh air, once
more, with none of that warm, sickening earthiness, that
fills the death chamber and which, in my old horrour of
being buried alive, has made me fancy, more than once,
M 2
that I
was
buried, and breathing in a charnel house.
But I must desire that you never mention a certain name
to me, again; nor remind me, henceforth, in any way, of
it, or of him, or of aught that hath ever passed. His
time has gone by.
He is lost
. Your opinion of him, is
nearer the truth than mine was. And above all, never
disquiet
yourself
more, about
him and me
.
Farewell
J. R. G.
SARAH TO JOHN.
Near the Falls of Niagara
.
We are now within two miles and a half of the
cataract
.
I can hear it roar, distinctly; and the earth
appears
to tremble under my feet. I do not say that it
does
actually, tremble, but only, that it appears to.
Perhaps
it may be the agitation of the air; or, it may be that
there is that sympathy between these elements, which
makes one correspond to the movement of the other, as
the most inert things will, to the sound of
musick
. You can
hear this, you know, in a room where it is all silent, and
two instruments are in perfect unison. If you touch one,
the other will answer; nay, have you never heard of a
gentleman in Philadelphia, whose voice is so powerful
and clear, that the glasses on the table will ring, if they
be put together, half a dozen, or so, when he is singing?
I can answer for its truth, for my father knows him,
and has heard the mysterious reply; or, (one more
illustration
and I have done;) have you never felt the wood
tremble, when you have been at church, and your hand
rested on the pew, while the organ was playing?
Perhaps
the earth answers here, to this organ of the waters.
What a conceit!but is it worse than that of the
poet, over whose pages we have so often laughed, and
scolded, and held our breath, by turns, while he described
no, he did not
describe
it, the tempest hymning of
these falls? And this reminds me of a question that I
dare say has occurred to you and others, time and again.
Why was it called the
Battle of Niagara?
What has
Niagara to do with it? or the falls? or the battle?
Nothing
absolutely
nothing. Yet, having chosen the
name, he probably thought it rather too barefaced, not
to
mention
either of them, in the poem. But how does
he mention them?precisely as a man would, who had
never seen, or cared for either.Good byethey are
all ready. The sun is shining out, and we are
sure
of
having a delightful time.
Well!we have returned. We have seen the wonder,
and I am entirely out of breath. Shall I tell the truth?
I am giddy and blind, but very much disappointed. What
exaggerated pictures the imagination will form of such
matters. The poet was right;he has never been there,
they say;and it is well that he has not. Had he been
there, and studied the whole in detail, there would then
have been none of that indistinctness, shadow, and
darkness
,
in his picture, which provoked all my powers of
thought to contention. Yes, I am disappointed;and
this, notwithstanding my caution. It reminds me of
Harper's Ferry. Mr. Jefferson says, it is worth
crossing
the Atlantick to see. Fudge! I went there, and, at
the hazard of my neck, clambered up Mr. Jefferson's
rock, where, it is said, that he sat, manufacturing his
notes; looked about me for the war of the rivers and
mountains, about which he made such a fuss in his book,
and came away, mortified to the soul, that so great a
man, should have been so intemperate. But he, himself,
is ashamed of it now, I believe; and speaks of his past
enthusiasm, as rather that of the blood than the brain.
So, too, my father once went somewhere up the
Kennebeck
river, in the District of Maine. It was said, in
Morse's Geography, (and Dr. Morse is the man, you
recollect
,
that speaks of
brass
mines,) to be the greatest
fall, in height, not in quantity, to be found in the United
States, not excepting Niagara, itself. My father took
a guide, wallowed some miles, up to his middle, in snow,
(no very light matter, he used to say, for one of his
habit
and temper,) and knew not that he was near the
awful
place, till his guide called to him, to
stop! or he was
lost!
My father was near a tree; and, in his horrour,
caught at a projecting limb. The snow, upon which he
had stood, caved in, at the same moment, and my poor
father owed his preservation to the tree alone. Being
extricated from this, his guide called his attention to the
falls. They were said to be about two hundred feet; but
some idea may be formed of their
descent
, from the fact,
that a horse went down them once, and came out alive
below. My father looked about him, for the signs of the
water, but none appeared. There were a few holes, here
and there, in the snow---and the broken crust was whiter
in the middle, and heaped up, in a narrow and glittering
ridge, as if water ran aslant under it. But these were
the falls
these!
And it was very probable that their
descent
was about as great as Dr. Morse had been told; but,
unluckily, he had forgotten to mention the
distance
included
in that
descent
. It might have been from the source,
to tide water; or, to the ocean itself, for aught that we
know.
But my disappointment, here, was not so great. I was
stunned and awed for a time;and I grew frightfully
dizzy in looking at the frail contrivance, by which so
many precious creatures were accustomed to descend,
into the very whirl of the waters. Nay, were I not afraid
of being laughed at, I should say that one person, whom
I saw there, under the very arch of the cataract, was the
deaf and dumb man that we met in the grave-yard! His
dress was different; but his manner, an indescribable
something, that was about him, makes me believe it, yet,
in spite of probability. Is it the love of the marvellous?
or the romantick? or, am I possessed? What should he
do here, poor wretch?I ask myself again, and again;
and then, I feel a sensation, nearly allied to terrour,
when I think of his danger. Can it be that he has
followed
us? If so, let us be gone. I cannot endure the
thought; yet it constantly obtrudes itself. I have taken
no notice of it, here; and my father, I am sure, has not
seen him, or does not perceive the resemblance. Indeed,
when I began this, I did not mean to mention him; for I
was rather angry at something that had occurred. At
first, I felt compassion for him; but his pertinacity has
provoked aBless me, cousin, I am speaking exactly
as if it were
he
, the deaf and dumb man, beyond a doubt.
O, this reminds me of some of your nonsense, John.
What meant you, some time ago, in one of your long
letters
,
where you reasoned, for a moment, quite seriously,
about the existence of spirits? Were you in good earnest?
If you were, my resentment, which kept me from
replying
,
was just. Were you not in earnest? Then were
you most unhappy in your pleasantry;for it has given
my father an authority, that I am sorry for, for believing
what, I am sure, was a deception of the senses, the very
night before my blessed mother's death. What shall I
say to you? Should I be indignant? No!and my
advice
is, neither to believe, nor disbelieve, in such things
on speculation. There may be wisdom in what is
unintelligible
to us;but I cannot believe that the vilest
creatures of the earth, all that are about us, are made
eloquent with prophecy, which is utterly unintelligible.
Is not their superstition excessive, always, in proportion
to the rudeness of a people? Does it not, always, keep
pace with ignorance? Assuredly, it does. So, let us say
no more about it. But, if you should see fit to renew the
subject, at some future day, do not let my excellent father
get to the knowledge of it. It troubles him, I can
perceive
,
more than he is willing to confess.
And now, let me return to the falls;but no, I cannot
speak of them. I hate putting ones self out in
description
.
People enough have described them, and all have
failed; they, probably, the most, who have most studied
to be fine. Some paintings, and one, in particular,
by a lady of Boston, in oil, gave me some notion of the
smoke and thunder that I was to encounter. The sky
and the water were all in agitation, as with a great
battle
.
But all descriptions are mockery. They either
want indistinctness; are so minute in describing the
parts, as to prevent your obtaining any notion of the
whole
, like Belzoni's account of the scratching and
chiseling
in the pyramids;or they are inflated and
ridiculous
,
to an insupportable degree. There
is
a person,
one who was never there, too, but who has been
supposed
to have been there, by another, who sat with
his
testimony
in his hand, and compared the poetical
description
with the reality; and then, came away, wondering
at the faculty of
observation
in poets; and their power of
seeing and touching out, what is passed over with
indifference
,
or utterly unseen, by others!and(but I
cannot
finish the sentence)I.
OI have just caught a glimpse of the stranger's face
it is noble; not in feature, but in expression. I shall
never forget it;he has just past my window, (on the
most beautiful horse, that I ever sawall in a foam.)
To return.I do not know why it is; but, from these
lines, particularly the four last, my imagination had
taken a more faithful picture of the cataract, than from all
else that I have seen; and yet, they contain no picture,
not even an outline. All is general, dim, and
tumultuous
.
Were the poet a painter, I suppose that he would
give us Niagara somewhat after this fashion. A glimpse
only, of the sky; no landscape,no, he would scorn to
copy a single line as it is; but the whole atmosphere
would appear in commotion; and about the rocks, there
would be a vivid, quick, tremulous outline, as if they
quaked and shivered, incessantly, in the uproar; the
spray would be insupportably bright; great birds,
dashing
hither and thither through it; and the water would
go up, like breakers, to the very top of the picture.
Home of the waters!where their strength
Rolls in immeasurable length;
Or, tumbling from their cloudy thrones,
As thundering from a battlement,
With marshal hymning, like the tones,
Of battle-shout by warriours' sent,
Go, rioting in foam and spray,
With rainbow-streamers o'er their way,
Beneath the precipice they've rent;
Exulting, as they burst their cloud,
As high, as dazzling, and as loud,
As sheets of light, in their descent
Through midnight's parting firmament.
I believe, cousin, if you had stood where I did, and
seen the thick cloud abovethe blazing brightness of
the water, shooting, all at once, out of it, into the
sunshine
,
with the tremendous musick of its roaringthat
you would have clasped your hands, as I did, and
acknowledged
,
that the madman, (for, I am told, that the poor
fellow, who wrote that,
is
mad,) was singularly happy in
the four last lines. The first part would have been
better
relished by me, if there had been a rainbow, when I
was there;for, I declare to you, the noise of the
thunder
was
martial, like the ringing of ten thousand
trumpets
the
rolling of ten thousand drumsand artillery
in proportion! Really! What do you think of that?
Should'nt I make a pretty poet, with a little
encouragement
?
One moment more, and then, good bye, to the poet and
the poem the waters and the thunderreminding you
that it was impossible to visit Niagara, without recalling
somewhat of a work, put forth with such a pretending
titleDo you remember this? It struck me very
forcibly
.
Above, where the torrent is forth, in its might,
Like an imprisoned blaze, that is bursting from night!
Or a lion, that springswith a roarfrom his lair!
Bounding off, all in foamfrom the echoing height,
Like a rank of young war-horses, terribly bright
Their manes all erect, and their hoofs in the air!
The earth shaking under themtrumpets on high
And banners unfurling away in the sky
With the neighing of steeds, and the streaming of hair!
No wonder that the man is mad, cousin, is it? I have
followed his own punctuationhis
own
indeed;
for there is nothing more peculiarly his, than his
dashing
.
But, let me be done. That poor deaf and dumb man
cousin, I can't get him out of my head. He haunts me
like a spectre. Turn which way I will, the first object
that I catch, is a shadow like his, that, as it cannot be
where I see it---must be in my own brain! Well. well.
He'll have to walk fast, if he keep up with us, after
tomorrow
.
We shall go the battle-ground next.
SARAH RAMSAY.
EDWARD MOLTON TO GEORGE STAFFORD.
The curiosity that you express, my dear fellow, is
altogether natural. You feel, toward our American
writers, just as I do about your English ones. In return,
therefore, for your sketching of Byron, Campbell, and
your
study
of Wordsworth (whom I can see, with his
smooth hair, at this moment,) Hunt, Coleridge, &c. &c.
with glimpses, of their conversation and hand writing, I
shall give you something of the same kind, and as much
after the same plan, as I am able. I will begin with
them as they come to me.
Paul Allen
, of Baltimore.He is rather below the
middle sizesay, about five feet sixdark eyesdark
hairface, deeply markeda plain looking, nay, an
ordinary
looking man; about forty or forty two, I should
think, with a character of sluggishness, slovenly
inaptitude
and moroseness, all about him. Yet, there is not a
better natured fellow on the earthbating a momentary
petulence, here and there, with a far-off politician, in the
way of trade; or a little fermentation at home, when he
has been pestered by poppinjays, a little too long; nor a
man that will write more, with less substantial
information
,
on any subject, in the same time. He is
near-sighted
;
reads with his nose on the paperand such reading!
Lord!I can imagine nothing more dismal, than the
reading of his own poetry, by Paul Allen. It is a
continual
whinenasaland barbarous, beyond all
conception
.
No man would take him for any thing above a
hard-working tradesman, should he meet him, away
from his daily occupation; he is full of simplicity,
credulous
too, as a child, and very irresolute; and yet, how he
writes! He has a strange face, strongly moulded, unlike
any that I have ever seen, in your country; but very like
that of Mr. Jarvis, the painter, in ours. He has a fine
dazzling talent; a penetrating fidgetty eloquence; and
great pungency, all which are continually to be seen in his
prose. But he has a bad notion of poetry; he is too easily
satisfied with bad rhyming, inadequate expression, and
ordinary, simple thought, which he endeavours to touch
your heart with, after the manner of Wordsworth, of
whom he is a devout admirer; but their simplicity is
totally
unlike. That of Allen is never so simple, so
affecting
,
or so awful, as that of Wordsworth; nor is it ever so
feeble and childish.
Paul Allen is no imitator; or, rather, no imitator of
any
one
man; but he is of many:and there is nothing
beautiful, sarcastick, eloquent, strange, touching, or
sublime
,
in another, which, when he encounters it, will not
instantly beget a correspondent expression in him. I can
always tell what he has been reading, when he comes out,
on any uncommon occasion. He is very like Burke, at
times; and throws away more genuine poetry, without
knowing it, upon the daily transactions of commercial
and political gossipping, than any living writer; and
this, too, while that which he husbands and hoards for
poetry, is often the very refuse of an exhausted mind;
the dregs and dross of a crucible, where the gold and
fire, of earth and sky, have been undergoing the most
beautiful transmutation, for the entertainment of
children
.
He is a man that would throw pearls and diamonds
into the furnace, to see what colour their smoke would
be; and then gather up the ashes and cinders; put them
carefully by, in a golden urn, write thereon; with all his
might, a deep and sad inscription to the emptiness and
mutability of all earthly enjoymentand fall asleep with
it in his arms. He has no colloquial poweryet the
company of few people is more pleasant, to them that
know him intimately.
He has written, successively, for the United States'
Gazette
;the
Port Folio, before it was dead and damned;
the Baltimore Telegraph, of which he was the Editor
for many years, when it was in the zenith;the
Portico
;
---a poem, called
Noah
;and volume after volume, of
editorial
matter, for the
Journal of the Times
, and the
Morning Chronicle
.
N
He was born in Providence, Rhode Island, and
educated
for the bar:writes a sort of jumping, up and
down handwhich nobody but himself, and his
compositors
,
can read.
Washington Irving
.He is about thirty-nine, now
about five feet, six or seven inches in heighta little
clumsyvery palefine blue eyes, continually shifting
through shadow and lightvery white teethand a
charming smilevery black hair, and heavy black
eyebrows
;
with all the air of your old fashioned, high bred
gentleman;by that, I mean not, that he is
old fashioned
,
in the common meaning of the phrase; but, that he is a
gentleman, without being a puppy. He is neither a
macaroni
dandyexquisitenor
corinthian, names which
mean the same thing, through all the successive changes
of folly, from the time of Queen Anne, to the present.
His manner is full of composure and gentleness. He was
educated for the bar;was born in New-Yorka few
miles from the city, I believe,made two or three
attempts
at the barand abandoned the profession, in
despair
,
from a total inability to undergo the coarse, and
continual exasperation of conflict and rivalry. His
friends have thought his modesty and timidity a
disqualification
stuff!
The profession of the law is the best
market
in the world for both; and, to my notion, it argues
no great degree of modestywhatever people may say
of CowperCurranGarrick, before the court as a
witness
Mr.
Bayard of Delawareor Mr. Irving of
New-York
that
each and all of them, were overwhelmed
with confusion in their first attempt at speaking, in a
new situation. To my thought, it looks much more like
the natural effect, of entertaining too high an opinion of
one's self. He, who believes that all eyes are upon him
that every thing is expected from himthat no
allowances
will be made for inexperience, embarrassment and
alarmmust fail.But he, who is modest enough, not to
attempt a
miracle
nor to expect that others are looking
for one, will be likely to succeed.
Washington Irving is, emphatically, an amiable man,
without being a weak one. He takes every thingshort
of what would darken the heart of any human creature,
disappointment in love, or fame, or ambitionall in good
part; and even the rest, he takes like one, that is too good
not too proud, to repine. In early life, I have heard it
said, that he lost the woman of his heart, by death. That
were enough to account for the beautiful shadow that
abides, forever and ever, upon the landscape of his
affection
.
His manner and style are his own. He is precisely
among authors, what your Westall is among painters. I
cannot imagine, and do not know a truer parallel.
He has written part of SalmagundiKnickerbocker's
New-YorkBiographical Sketches of the American
Naval Commanders, during the last warthe
Sketch-Book
,
and Bracebridge Hallwith sundry little things,
Recollections of a Student in the New Monthlyand
some criticism on Campbell, in a very sensible way.
Paulding
.A little, slender, sharp, dark-looking
man, with an expression of habitual discontent in his eyes
strong natural talentand a happy, though not a fine
turn, for sober irony and sarcasm. You would swear
that he was forever fretting, and quarrelling at the heart,
with all the worldfrom the very countenance of the
manand that it never could be otherwise. He is the
very opposite of Irving, with whom he was associated in
making up Salmagundi; and not at all companionable,
or social. There is an air of constitutional disdain of
the worldwith a great deal of artificial disdain, for
that very world, which he is continually courting,
indirectly
,in
all that he does and says. Yet I would
trust to his heart, I think, rather than to Irving's, if I
wanted a friend that would go to the devil for me. He is a
fellow of strong mindwithout brilliancyand a little
a very little playfulness: but a homebred talent
vigorous
pure
and lasting. He has written a good deal
only a part of which, I can now call to mindthe
Backwoodsman
(a poem) a satirical novel, telling the story
of our revolutionpart of Salmagundiand Letters
from the South. He was born in Connecticut,
New-England
.
Neale
.It is impossible to know this man well. I
have taken a good deal of pains to understand his
character
,
from those who have seen him, every day, for
many
years; but no two of them seem to have the same
opinion
of him. By some he is thought to be all that is bad
short of being an outlaw; by others, all that is noble and
high of heart. The majority, by a thousand to one, are
of the former opinion. I confess, that he is continually
baffling me, in my estimate, not only of him, but of his
talents
,
they are so various, contradictory, and capricious.
Yet, I do believe that he has great power, and a good heart,
which, if it be not dampened by continual disappointment;
and kept down by a mighty pressure, at the hazard of
crushing all its principles of vitality, will either purify
itself, at last, in its own fires, or be consumed to ashes.
Naythere are those who expect to see it fall in, every
hour, alleging that it has been for many years, inwardly
consuming. He is a yankee tooa self educated man
born in Massachusetts or Mainewhose whole life has
been a tissue of wild and beautiful adventure. He was
born of poor parents; put apprentice to a shopkeeper,
without educationran the gauntlet, it is said, through
half a dozen professions; and, finally, at the age of
twenty
three or four, sat himself down to study the law,
without
,
at that time, understanding the rudiments of
English
grammar.
He is about five feet, eight or ninewell madelight
brown hair, light complexion; small, clear, serene, blue
eyeslarge mouthvery high foreheadstooping in his
gait;about thirty now, with a settled expression of
haughtiness, and proud discontentin his very tread-look,
and tone. His eyes are full of ithis forehead is full of
ithis voicenay, every thing about him, gives note of
an unquiet spirit, continually at her incantations. Rouse
him, and you hear his voice, like an alarum in your
blood. He is certainly unamiableand, in the opinion
of women, very ungenteel;exceedingly positive, loud,
abrupt, and imperious; and yet, I am told that no human
creature is gentleror fuller of frolickor more of a
boy, than he, when he is at home with them that have
long known him. His contempt for the world is more
natural than that of any other man, whom I ever knew;
yet even his, I am sure, is partly affected. Else why
that continual effort for the notice of the world? Why
so ambitious?studious?headlong? Men may say
what they will about being above the opinion of the world.
They cannot be so. Such men would instantly die.
They could not live for a moment in a world, about whose
opinion they cared nothing; they would be like some
animal
in an exhausted receiver. They would ascend to
the skies by their own levitytheir own impalpability.
The law of attraction could not operate upon such
spiritualities
.
Nonothe flame of ambition cannot burn for
a moment, where the breath of the world cannot reach it;
and, wherever you see an ambitious man, you may be
sure, that you have misunderstood him, or that he lied,
when he talked about a carelessness of the world's
opinion
.
They say that he is overbearing and quarrelsome;
and, if so, of course, he is cowardly. The public
opinion
is very much against himso far, I mean, as mere
popularity will go;but, the most that I can learn of
evil in his character, except what is to be inferred from
general prejudice, I should be inclined to think had
grown out of his haughty temper; his vanity; his
unwillingness
to soothe and conciliate, what he calls
the rabble;
and a wounded and impatient spirit, sore with continual
buffetinggored into warfareand determined never to
yield. I ask them if he is melancholylow spiritedor
troubled with ill-health, like other men of a literary or
poetical habit. But I am told that he is never melancholy;
never low-spiritedthat he is never more than serious,
angry, or stern;sustained by unexhaustible animal
spirits---and
never sick.If such be the case, he may do
something to redeem himself, after all. Let him learn a
little discretion---subdue his hot temper---hurry less, in
his manifestation of feeling, and---who knows if he may
not die a very decent sort of a man.
He has written more books, I believe, than are either
known or read. He can write a variety of hands---
and, in a variety of styles---but does, generally, write in
a fluent, illegible, positive, perpendicular scrawl;--and in
a style overflowing with start and turbulence. I have
N 2
seen a few pages, I confess, of his, that were full of a deep,
quiet beauty; but, in general, I would as soon think of
amusing
myself, with a regiment of your horse guards, each
blowing his own trumpet with both hands, and galloping
about me, continually over a cast-iron pavement, as with
one of his furious
set-to's
, in what I dare say, he thinks
fine writing.
He wrote
Keep Cool; Niagara; Goldau; Otho
; and
was editor of the
Telegraph
, and one of the editors of
the
Portico
, I have heard, for a long time. Some other
works are attributed to him.
Everett
.This young gentleman, with a
countenance
like a boy, and the ambition of a giant, is about
five feet, seven; reddish brown hair, smoothed aslant over
his forehead; and fine eyes. He is at the head of the
Everett schoola body of foolish young men, who have
counterfeited his gesture, tone, carriage, and manner of
wearing his hair. He is a man of fine talent---great
pedantry
;--a
rambling sort of imagination, and a sickly
taste for the ancient and obsolete. He is now the main
conductor of the North American; or, rather, the head
of a class, made up of rich young blockheads, whose
fathers
were rich old blockheads; patricians, graduated and
patented, by the lump, at the University of Cambridge,
who have been
endured
by the publick, in the high places
of literature, till they really believe that they have a
right there.He was a clergyman, and would be a
politician
.
I know nothing more of him. His works are
brief essays on
Architecture---Theology---Greece---Himself---and
matters and things in general. He is a yankee,
too, about thirty. He has a brother, who, I am told, is
quite a poet---and an adventurer, in the most heroick
meaning of the term.
Pierpont
.This man is six feet highthinblack
hairbushy eyebrowsdark, expressive eyesabout
thirty-eight or fortywrites a hand like copperplate
talks remarkably wellbut rather too sensiblymakes
poetry in the same way, generally:an imitator of
Campbell, Beattie, and Darwinwith a talent equal, if
not superiour, to eitherand has been satisfied with
doing
about a thousand lines of very pure, agreeable, quiet
rhyming, with, here and there, a magnificent burst of
light, or a vivid picture, sparkling with regular vivacity
as much out of place nine times out of tenas an
eruption of rockets would be, at a concert of flutes and
pianos, where people look rather for bottled velvet,
than Champaigne. He is a clergyman, nowwas a
merchantafter practising as a lawyer;born in
Connecticut
,
New-England. Thus you perceive that our
literary men here, are nearly all New-Englanders, or
YANKEESand, generally, under the middle size.
Dana
.Here is another of the amiable school, who,
of late years, have made pure poetry so very
commonplace
;
and all the pestilent inquietudes of life, so
beautiful
,
in their patient yielding to them, that we have no
heart to pity a man, though he be dying in a
consumption
,
when we have once heard the comfort and
consolation
,
attendant upon such a death, described by Percival
or Dana. He is a yankeelight hairlight blue eyes
middle staturefeeble of healthand author of the
Idle
Man
, a work of uncommon merit. He
was
the editor
of the North American:and was turned out, for writing
the best thing that ever appeared in ita review of your
Hazlett on the British poets. Dana is a poetbut not
one of them that dazzle and confound you, by their eagle
flightsrushing, headlong, through the skiesnestling
among the starsand roosting with constellations. He
is more swan-like; contented with floating over the blue
waters of the wilderness, through sun and shadow,
starlight
and cloudgathering wild flowers with his bosom,
while he is drifting down the currenttill he falls asleep
in the ambush of his own nestan entrenchment of water
lilies and flowering weeds. He too, was educated for
he bar.
Percival
I don't know. But I hear that he is
feeble
of healthhas been a doctora lawyerand is about
to be an editor. He is a Connecticut man, too.
Walsh
---Is a small, cold, sober, quaker-looking
creature
,
having a good deal of unaffected simplicity about
him, with a face well characterised; and, I should think,
from the expression, a very good sort of a man. But
more of him, by and bye. He is about five feet, six
rather deaf---pale---dark hair and eyes---wears
spectacles---talks
like a book, but without passion---and seems,
generally, a good deal dissatisfied with all the world.---
I do not know him well---personally, I mean. He is a
Marylander; and was intended for the bar.
Walter
.---This young man was little known. He
had a brilliant, but confused beauty, at his heart;---a
great deal of downright poetry, and was one of the most
elegant
men, in his manners, that I ever saw. I met him
once in Boston. He was educated for the ministry; but
there was more of the man of the world, in all his doings
and sayings, than of one who should be set apart from it.
His character was not fully developed when he died,
although
it was at the age of twenty-six or twenty-seven.
He was five feet, ten, at least---light brown hair---large
hazle eyes---and a fine melancholy face. He wrote
Sukey
,
and some smaller poems. He was born in Boston, and
educated at Harvard.
Good bye---I must throw by my pencil.
E. MOLTON.
I have opened this again, to add a P. S.
P. S.A friend of mine, (I am sure that I know the
fellow, for nobody on earth dares to talk like him,) has
just been giving your counsellor Phillips a dressing. I
happened, accidentally, as I was about to fold this, to
cast my eye upon the breakfast table, where several
papers
and letters had just been left, by the penny post; my
eyes were attracted to a newspaper, by a column, that
appeared to be made up of dashes, and exclamations.
I took up the paperread it(it was the
New England
Galaxy
a newspaper, of which the editor, a precious
chap---is one of our best and bravest, although, to be sure,
they do call him a blackguard.) I knew the article
immediately
,
and enclose it, herewith, for your amusement.
Tell me, if you do not think the said counsellor, and the
said counsellor's letter to the king, fairly treated.
Phillips
,
I hold to be a compound of effort, imitation and
pretence
.
Look at his imitations of Curran's playfulness,
and pleasantry; sarcasm and sublimity. What monstrous
carricatures they are. If Curran happen to be guilty
of the possessive case, or of alliteration, Phillips will never
be contented with less than a speech-full of both. If Curran
speak of a buoyant pestilence, Phillips, on the first
pretence
,
gives one a particular description of it, with the
harbour regulations, and quarantine laws; all in superfine
poetry. If Curran happen to quote a line of an old song,
in some case of
crim. con.
we are sure tohear, line after line,
song after song, from the counsellor, on the first case of
crim. con. that he has the misfortune to be retained in;
and that, too, with an inaptitude of illustration, so
miserably
conspicuous and obtrusive, that one cannot help
pitying him. If Curran, roused and inflamed with
indignation
,
discharges his great heart, in one volley of
tempestuous heat, which terrifies and confounds us, like
an exploding thunder-bolt,
the counsellor
is sure to
lighten
at us, all day long, when ever the
title
of the cause is
the samefor
any
resemblance is precedent enough for
himyet,
his
lightning is never the sudden combustion
of a great bosom, devoutly conscious of being inhabited
by the Divinity, and exasperated with the goading and
heat of its continual presence, into an unexpected
eruption
but
it is what we may call, a genteel illumination
a transparencynot the battle itselfbut a picture of
it, beautifully illuminated, with coloured gasnot the
flash of the firmament, darkened with evolving thunder
clouds, but set thick with glow worms and Chinese
crackers. If Curran but take up the naked heart of
some scoundrel witness; prepare to penetrate and explore
it, even to the place where the
black drop
is lurking;
dazzling and blinding us all the while, with the
incessant
play of a weapon, whose unspeakable brightness
and edge, makes our blood tremble, counsellor Phillips
will be sure to get hold of somebody's heart, no matter
whose, nor when, nor whereand all the while,
flourishing
his dainty fingers about, like a lecturer upon
nose-gays
,
set it all round with surgical instruments, and fire
works---'till it look like a cutler's shop, on a birth night;
a steel porcupine; or a barber's cushion, in a new
establishment
.
Counsellor Philips always appears to me, when he is
in a transport of eloquence, to be transported,
secundum
artem
. He has persuaded himself, I am afraid, that
losing one's subject in a speech, is equivalent to losing
ones-self. I never can get the notion out of my head,
when I hear him, (you have not forgotten the dinner at
Brimstone Hall, and his oration, in reply to a toast from
Carter) that he has committed a speech to memory---
and that, happen what may, he
will
be delivered of it.
And yet, say what he will, and how he will, I am always
in a sort of perplexity about his design;---and troubled,
too, with a kind of insupportable gossipping pity and
compassion---that wants the dignity of interest---just as
if I were listening to a human creature, who was
continually exposing himself, without suspecting it; to
some poor fellow, who, having no command over
himself
,
his thought, language, or organs of utterance, in
publick, comes into a place where he is not wanted, after
having prepared himself, brimful, of the wine and
brightness
of a great speech, for a great occasion---has begun to
deliver it---exactly as he did
not
intend to---saying just
what he meant
not
to say---and, in a tone of voice
entirely
different from what he intended---so as to give to
sarcasm
the force of explanation; and to playfulness the
accent
or outcry rather of a belaboured heart---jumbling
all together--pell-mell---pump or no pump as
Salmagundi
says.
Such are my notions of this man. I have often
expressed
them---and, allowing a little for exaggeration, I
think that my good friend here, in rubbing down the
counsellor, has had an eye to some of my extravagancies,
at the same time. What think you, Stafford? Is it not
a good deal in my manner? A little caricatured,
perhaps
;
but, nevertheless, very like me.
Counsellor Phillips
.With feelings of
indignation
that we cannot suppress, and that no honest man,
who looks earnestly to the growth of a sound judgment
among our young men, ought to suppress, even if he could,
have we risen from the
Letter of Counsellor
Phillips
to the king
. Who can endure such stuff? Some
may, but who can listen to the shameless, tasteless,
unthinking
and profligate applause that is lavished upon it.
What is it? What are all his speeches?Nothing more
nor less than thisSplendid rigmaroleentangled and
glittering rhapsodywithout argument, without sinew,
without bone, muscle or arrangementa shining and
fantastick
assemblage of rattle-traps and pastework.
Do we deny Charles Phillips genius? Nobut it is
the genius of delirium and infatuation. He is merely
merely a geniushe is destitute of
talent
. There is the
bloom and the incense, but not the stamina of the true
flower. He is a poet tooand his poetry is prose, and his
prose poetry.
Has he passion? NoHe is only an actoran actor
too, who, were he playing the very Lears of the drama
sweating in agony beneath the load of his humiliation
aye, in the very tempest and whirlwind of his passion,
would be completely disconcerted, if a feather swayed
awry, or the moon went up the heavens
un
-picturesquely.
He has been compared to
Curran!
He! to Curran!
Hyperion to a Satyr. Powers of Eloquence! What has
he of
the
Curran? of his wit! his genius? flashing its
irradiations
forever and ever?What of his all-elevating
eloquence? What of his passionate and tempestuous
enthusiasm
,
that lifted up and swept away, as with the
overpowering
authority of inspiration, all hearts and heads,
all judgments, spirits and intellects.
Curran was a LAWYER. Phillips is notand cannot
be. He wants the edgethe adamantall the powers of
analysisand decomposition. He wants other faculties.
Curran's, it is true, was not the lawyer-like attitude of
a colossus; eternalimmoveable; but it might have
been. It was not, because he smote, and toiled, and
battled for a nobler, higher and more glorious elevation;
for that of the advocate.
Curran was an
Advocate
. The explosions of
his
eloquence
unpremeditatedunlooked
forwere, as if Paul,
in the midst of Mars-Hill, or where he shook
Agrippa
upon his thronehad stretched forth his arm,
and cried, behold!and as if, thenin the east, or in
the west, or wherever he had pointed, some apparition
had suddenly stood up, with its forehead in the skyor
chariots and horsemen were thundering in the air.
But Charles Phillips!could
he
do such things?
Never. The most fearful charm that he ever wrought
before the heart of man, in mystery, passion, or
enthusiasm
,
was the sickening, baby incantation of the
nursery
,compared
to Curran:the contemptible trash of
the witches of Macbeth, divested of its ferocious truth, and
sparkling with conceit, compared with the wizard
summoning
of Prospero, in his cave, when the moon stands
still in the skyand the round earth quivers to the
centre
.
Curran always forgot
himself
. Phillips
never
.
Curran
was an oratorPhillips a rhetorician. Curran could
hold you, in spite of yourself, till all your faculties were
gasping. Phillips never even intoxicates younever
elevates
younever makes you forget, either him, or
yourself
.
And yet Charles Phillips has been classedyes,
yes!Charles Phillips!with John Philpot Curran. As
I hope for mercy, the only thing I know in favour of
counsellor Phillips is, that John Philpot Curran used to
permit him to sit at his table.
Curran rode the thoroughly trained war-horsehoof,
muscle and limb for the
trial
husbanding his windhis
great heart quaking to meet the battle. Phillips frisks
about upon an ill-broken colt, eternally kicking up his heels
and entangling his hoofs in his trappings and fineryor
running himself to death, like Bucephalus, from a
shadow
.
Curran is an eaglebreaking through the
thickest
cloud, with one clap of his resounding pinions
washing
purifyingdrenching
himself in the fiercest element
of heavena spirit baptized in firePhillipsO, what
is
Charles Phillipsa hair brained poeta humming bird,
a glittering insect, bathed in dew, revelling in perfume,
sparkling from head to tail, with twinkling ornament
and buzzing and blundering about, without aim or object,
except to be heard and seen.
And yet Charles Phillips's speeches are spoken of, as
the creation of feeling and eloquence. God of heaven!
what a profanation. Feeling!the man never felt
except
for a mis-printed sentenceor an unmusical
termination
.
His
feeling is mawkish sentimentalitythe
whimpering
,
lack-a-daisical stuff of song books.Not the loud
pulsation of a heart suffocating in its own thought
festering
in its own indignation, or dissolving in the
sympathy
of godlike natures. His eloquence!it is froth and
flummery. His style of writing holds about the same
relation
to
Eloquence
, that the tones of a Cremona do, to the
rolling organ or the rattling thunder.
Look at the effect. Hear Curran for a momenton he
goes, fearless and proud in his stepping, his heart gushing
out with the pure element of his thoughtsuddenly his eye
quickens! it flashes fire! his form contractshis action is
hurriedan overwhelming burst of eloquence succeeds!
filling all hearts, shaking all bosoms, thrilling every
artery of your frameas if a cloud had passed over your
heads, for a moment, charged with the electricity and the
reverberation of heaven. You look back upon your
feelings
.
You are on a dizzy and perilous heightbut you
can trace your courseyou can see how you got there.
You are not ashamed of your natureor of yourself
you are proud of the transport that you have felt; glad that
you were capable of acting and thinking with such
generous
madness:and glorying in your relationship to a
creature, so capable of moving heaven and earth, as it
would seem.
But how is it with Phillips. You rise, heatednot by
overwrought enthusiasmbut heated, and feverish,
ashamed of yourself, emasculated, dastardly; with a
general
sense of weariness, lassitude and oppression, as of
excessive indulgence, satiety and self dissatisfactionas
one would feel, who had broken a tedious fast upon
sweetmeats
,or
been imprisoned all night long with singing
birdsin some milliner's shop.
Let
Curran
be summoned from his grave. Bid
him
walk into the council chamber of his sovereign, and lift
up
his
voice in behalf of the woman of sorrow.
Would you hear any of this endless sing-songsee any
of this eternal twinklingof metaphor and foppery? No.
You would not see a creature decked out in tinsel and
O
paste work, from head to foot, perpetually writhing
himself into attitudesand flourishing his arms, and
nodding his head, merely because, when he nodded, there
was a scintillation of spangles about his baby brow
and because when he tossed his arms upward, his robe
threw out a few changeable corruscations, for the mob to
wonder at!No!But you would hear a deep voicean
awful silence would surround youevery pulsation of
your heart would be counted. You would see a man,
standing
like the prophet when he rebuked the waters; and the
kingly tides went rolling backward, encumbered with
horse and horsemen, banner and chariot. You would see a
hand-writing upon the sky---and you would believe, whil
you heard in imagination, the Angel, the Exterminator
placing his foot upon the East and upon the West, and
preparing to pour out his vial---you would believe that
already
the kingdom
had
departed from George---and
the sceptre from the house of Hanover.
You
would stand
too---like him of old---who saw his fellow man swept
upward to the everlasting skies, in a whirlwind of dust
and fire---you would be prostrate and breathless---bowed
down, and blind with apprehension and dismay. Thus
would you feel, were Curran to address his sovereign.
But how feel you now, when Phillips does this? Oh, it is
sacrilege to compare such men!
JOHN OMAR TO SARAH RAMSAY.
I have been away ever since the night when I saw
Molton
;
and I have just left him again, having heard the rest
of his story. Will you hear it? You say, if I
remember
right, that his first offence wasstay, I will refer
to the letter itself; lay it open before me, and answer it,
in my usual way, line by line.
Sarahyou must wait. I have lost your letters,or,
what is worse, left them in Molton's study. What if he
should see them!I will go this instant.
Heaven be praised! SarahI have them again
untouched
unprofaned.
Molton had followed me out, it
appears: and there lay the letters, folded, one within the
other, just as I left them, on the table. I beg ten
thousand
pardons for my carelessnessbut I was afraid to leave
them at home, and have carried them always about me.
I took them out there, merely to see how
his
story, and
that which you have heard, would correspond; and that
I might refer to them, if necessary, to refresh my
memory
.
But let me proceed. I entered, abruptly, upon the
subject
of my visit. I told him that I would not be his friend
at halves,that I respected him, and desired to respect
him. It was later than I intended;and he took out his
watch, with a serious air, and laid it upon the table
before
him. I asked no questions, but began, and went
through, without flinching, the whole that I had heard.
His countenance never changed,---once, only excepted,
when I thought that he smiled inwardly.
Do
you
believe the stories? he said calmly.
What could I say? I did
not
believe them. I told
him so. He smiled. Mr. Omar, said he, this will
be a lesson to you. What you have heard, is from good
authority;yet, you have dared to believe it untrue. On
what evidence, I do not ask you. It is enough for me
that you believe me innocent. Had you believed me
guilty, you would have gone home as you came. I should
have disdained to reply. Do you fully acquit me?
I bowedI know not why; for I saw something
sarcastick, in his manner, such as I would use to a
petulent
,
inquisitive boy---to one that I was making a fool of.
There was a dead silence. His face grew more
solemn
and pale. He looked me full in the eyes;laid
both of his hands upon the table, and pronounced these
words, deliberately, in a low voice, that I shall never
forget, never, to my dying day
The stories are true
.
Was he mad?I looked at him in amazement. Was
it his voice? I know not. It did not sound like his;
nor had I ever heard aught that resembled it, from
Molton
.
Mr. Omar, said he(at the sound of his voice
then
;
I recovered instantly from my consternation.) He took
no notice of my surprise; and I began to doubt if my ears
had not deceived me.
Mr. Omar---the stories are true
.
I started from my seat. NayI was on the point of
striking
him. I raised my arm,but he struck it down,
lifeless, at my side. Boy, said he, sit down. Had
that blow alighted on me, you had been a corpse, at this
moment. Sit down, and hear me. The stories, even as
you have them, are from my own lips. I betrayed
myself
.
The secret was my ownbut I chose to betray
it.
I shudderedmy whole side was numb. And I sat
before him, like something helpless, and at his mercy.
I shall now endeavour to give you a faithful account of
all that passed between us, at this interview; and I would
have you reflect on the character, that he betrayed in his
reasoning.
Yet, you
must
listen to my account of the same
transactions
,
said he. You
shall
. But beware how you
lift your hand against me.A blow, I cannot
endure
.
I have sworn never to endure it, again; and I
never will. If you are angry with me, strike me to the
heart. There lies my sword. There are my pistols.---
I am weary of life. I will uncover my breast to you. I
will not defend myself. But, again, do I say to you, John
Omar, as you value your own life, do not lift your hand,
to give me a blow. It has cost more than one man
dearly
,
already. But, to the point. I thank you for putting
your question home, without circumlocution or apology.
It shows that you have a good opinion, at least, of my
temper and self command.
Nay, said I, interrupting him, even more than that;
it shows that I do not believe what I have heard. No
man, if he believed that another was a villain, could speak
to him on the subject, without hesitation. He would
falter
.
You
did
falter, rejoined Molton. But, no matter
for that. You have, on the whole, dared to tell me, what
the world has thought proper to say of me. And, although
it is very true, that, by asking me, directly, if I be guilty
or not guilty, you manifest
much
confidence in me; and
much more than you would have done, by coming at me
with a side wind; yet, after all, your very question might
have been an insult.
An insult! how so? I do not believe what I have
heard.
Not
entirely
, you should say, he replied; but, to a
certain degree, you must believe it, or you would repel
the whole, at once, with indignation. Would it not be
an insult, think you, to ask a woman if she is
virtuous?
Why----to be sure----itbut I do not ask you any
such question. I only tell you what they say of you,
abroad.
True. But do you not watch my countenance, all the
while; and do you not look to hear me defend myself,
indignantly
,
with the vehement courage of an injured and
insulted man.
To be sure---but then, I do this, that I may be able to
defend you, myself.
To defend me! What would a modest woman say to
a champion, that would throw down a gauntlet in the
same way, in defence of her reputation? Would it not be
an insult?
Not, if her reputation were attacked.
I beg your pardon. The highest and most
unapproachable
purity, is only dishonoured by it:---a second
rate purity may be honoured by it. Were I, in your
estimation
,
utterly
guiltless, you would mock at these tales;
and deride them, as the clumsy invention of idle and
wicked
gossips. But being, what I am, not utterly guiltless,
in your own estimation, but only guilty in a less degree,
you have had the courage to tell me what people say, in
a manner that convinces me of your respect. Not
mentioning
it at all, would have been the
proof
, that you held me
to be wholly guilty, or wholly innocent.But what is
the matter? You look puzzled.
I am puzzled; I confess it. And yet, an illustration
occurs to me thatbut illustration is not argument.
O 2
I beg your pardon: illustration is analogy; and what
is analogy, but argument? But no matter about that, for
the present. Let us hear your illustration.
Well then---it was to this effect. Suppose that I had
heard George Washington charged with habitual
drunkenness
;
and suppose that I was intimate with him, as I
am with you. I should scorn to reply to such a charge. I
should
never
mention it to him, at all, in all probability;
and, certainly, never, as I have mentioned these matters
to you,
watching his countenance all the while
. You smile.
You are preparing to overthrow me entirely. I see it in
your eyes;---and, I believe, unless I very much mistake
your character, that you would not care what became of
your own hypothesis, while you were demolishing my
illustration
.
Is it not so? What say you?
Never mind. Go onfinish your illustration.
Thank you. I feel it like a reprieve. I was about
to say, then, that, if I had heard Washington charged
with having been, on some
one occasion
, drunk, instead of
being habitually so, I should, were I his friend,
probably
enter into a defence of him, with great warmth; and,
probably
,
on some occasion or other, ask him about the truth
of it. And why? Because I might believe the latter
charge to be
possible
. This confirms your doctrine. I
believe, that you are
possibly
guilty in some degree. But
did I believe you altogether guilty, or not at all so, then
I should never have mentioned the matter to you. In the
first place, I should not dare to mention it; and, in the
latter, I should scorn to.But, what are you
musing
about?
I can hardly tell you, said he, after a pause. A
strange hypothesis, that I cannot immediately master, is
disturbing me. At some future period, we will have some
talk about it. It is an alarming paradox, and, if I am
right, will explain certain operations of our mind, that
have been, for a long time, unintelligible to our
metaphysicians
.
Pray, what is it?
In one word, then, it isbut we cannot, well,
discuss
it, now. It is, that the more
improbable
a story is,
the more
probable
it is. I am very serious. I state it as
a paradox; and, at present, omit all its qualifications and
exceptions. People that lie, are often, nay, generally,
more plausible than others. You will hear a man of
veracity
tell a
common
story, so as to look suspicious;----
while an habitual liar will
make up
a very uncommon
story, that shall appear probable. The former disdains
all trick; he has never been doubted; and he never
troubles
himself to ask, if what he relates be
probable
. But
the latter seeks to make whatever he may tell, probable
in the minutest particular. He is full of circumstantiality;
he gives place, time, and language. It is a well known
mark of suspicion, in courts of justice, that the story of
a witness is very particular, consistent, and
circumstantial
.
It looks like a prepared thing. And men of
experience
know, that a witness upon the stand, if he be very
scrupulous and honest, is much more liable to contradict
himself, and to become embarrassed, than the perjured
scoundrel. The former will hesitate, and qualify, and
weigh; where the latter swears it out, roundly, promptly,
and without any embarrassment.
A man that makes up a lie, then, will make it
probable
.
To my notion, then, a story is more likely to be
true, from the very want of plausibility upon the face of
it. Liars are ingenious and ready. If a man should
say to me, therefore, that Washington was habitually
intemperate
,
I should be more apt to believe that he was
telling the truth, than if he should sit down and tell me
a long and
particular
story, about having seen him drunk
on some
one
occasion; and how he was dressed; and what
he said and did; and when it was, and where; and who
was there, &c. &c. So that, to despatch this affair, at
once, it would seem, that a story may be the more
probable
for its very
improbability!
There, Sarah, I think that I have given you a fair
sample of Molton's manner, when he trifles, with that
air of earnest pleasantry, for which he is so remarkable;
and, now, I will attempt to repeat the remainder of our
conversation. After a few moments, he turned toward
me, again; and addressed me, as nearly as I can recollect,
in the very words following.
The first story that you heard is true. When I was
a boy, between 16 and 17 years of age, I was a kind of
under-strapper in a large store; and lived at the house
of my master. A very pretty, or rather, a very
good-looking
girl, a relation of the family, was on a visit there,
at the same time. For a week or two, when we were
alone, she was rather condescending; and used to talk
to me, very graciously, about novel-reading. At last,
she prayed me to borrow one, called
Ariel
, from a friend
of her's, promising to lend it to me, when she had done
with it. I borrowed the book, and was very impatient
to read it; for I read with exceeding avidity, whatever
came in my way. She read very slowly, and I, with
uncommon
rapidity.
One evening, after tea, there came a barrel of
Medford
crackers, to the house; which, for some reason or
other, was put into the closet of this girl's room. I held
the candle, I remember; and while they were stowing
away the barrel, I saw the novel lying on the
mantle-piece
.
The next day, while I was at the store, a sudden
desire
took hold of me, to eat one of the Medford
crackers
.
I cast about, for some time, to see how I should
manage the matter; and at last, determined to run home
for a moment; go up to my chamber, which opened into
the same landing with her's; and, if I found her door open,
as it generally was, in the day time, to slip into her room,
and get a supply. I am too old, now, to laugh at such
things, or to wonder at any thing; or else, I should say
that I never knew an example of childish infatuation like
mine. I was not hungry. I had enough to eat, and of
the best quality. Yet, so it was; I had a longing, such
I suppose, as women have at times, and green girls for
blue clay, chalk and charcoal; and I determined to
gratify it. I went home; and, as I passed the parlour, I
saw somebody, whom I took to be the girl in question,
with a baby in her arms. I was certain that it was she. I
saw her as plainly as I now see you; and I would have
sworn that it was she. I hurried up stairs, stepped
softly
through my room, and found the door of her's,
contrary
to what I had observed, whenever I had occasion to
go to my chamber in the day time, shut. I attempted
to turn the handle very softlysucceeded; and was
opening it, gradually, inch by inch, for fear of being
heard; when, somebody, a woman too, about half dressed,
sprang toward it, and shut it violently in my face; but,
unluckily, not without seeing me.
And here, by the way, I have a hint to give, which
may be useful, one day or other, to some unhappy fellow,
in a like predicament. Doors are apt to creak;there
are two ways of preventing itlift, or bear down upon
the latch; and open or shut it, swiftly. But, if neither
will do, follow my examplemew faintly, like a cat;
or make a noise like a sleeper, snoring; do this, and you
will be safe, any where, provided you
keep time
with the
creaking of the door. But let me return to the crackers.
My heart, itself had well nigh exploded with shame. I
was innocent, but appearances were enough to hang me.
What could I do? My trepidation was excessive.
Not that I feared any living creature, in the way of
personal
chastisement; but I was terrified to the heart, at
the thought of what the poor girl might imagine. I
returned
to the store, in a strange state of consternation
and perplexity;I knew that I should be questioned
about the matter; and I knew, too, that the plain truth
would be vastly more improbable, than a lie, which I
could put together in two minutes. It turned out as I
expected. The good woman of the house, after stuffing
me to the throat, with dainties, to detain me, till all the
rest had left the room, at dinner, put the affair home to
me, at once; asking me, while her own face coloured and
shook, and mine burnt as if a furnace were before me,
what I wanted in Miss Harriott's room?
I was afraid to tell the truth, as I have already said; I
knew that it would'nt be believed: and I was ashamed to
mention the crackers. So I told her a story, of which this (I
do not, of course, remember the words) was the substance.
I went there for a book, Madam. Miss Harriott
promised
to lend me
Ariel
, the other day; and I did not like
to keep asking her for it, continually. I could read it
through, in a few hours; and, last night, when I went to
hold the candle, while the crackers were put into her
closet
,
(or, to put them into the closet, while somebody else
held the candle) I saw the book lying over the fire-place.
To-day, while I was up stairs, having little or nothing
to do, it occurred to me that I could slip into her room,
if I found it open; take away the book; read it; and
return
it, before it was missed. I saw her below ma'm, as
I thought, when I went up to my room; and, it was for
that reason, that I ventured to open the door, &c. &c.
This story was believed, this
lie
, I ought to say, when
the truth would not have been. They knew that I was
passionately fond of reading; but they did not know that I
was at all, fond of Medford crackers. The account was
probable, from my pride, age, and manner; for my pride
and manner were those of a man. I had no more
trouble
about the matter; but, I dare say, that it is
remembered
;
and I am glad of an opportunity to tell the plain
truth. It is a relief to me.
I believe him, Sarah; it appeared to be a relief to him.
Buthe continued, the next affair is one, that I am
unwilling to talk about; and I know not if I would
condescend
to exculpate myself, were it not that an elder
brother, of the poor little girl in question, has thought
proper
to put her reputation at issue. He told one person,
at least; and perhaps more than one, that I was a
dependant
in the family; under great obligations to every
member
of it; that his sister was a mere child; that I took
advantage
of her innocent nature, so far as to go to her
bed-side, at night, and kiss her.
He is a liar, and a fool
.
He is a liar
, for I was never, in any way, a dependant
of the family. They are all under greater obligations to
me, than I to them. I laboured for them; and, in the
wreck of extensive commercial dealing, the profits of my
labour went to the support of three of their families at
least. I came out of the concern a beggar. So did this
brother, to be sure. But his mother's family were
greatly
benefitted; made, in a measure independent, by an
application
of the partnership funds. I do not say that it
was dishonestly done. I know that it was not. ButI
know also that I was alone; and that my family were not
benefitted; but that I lost, and, that they lost, all that both
were worth, while the family of this very man, grew
comfortable
by our labour.
He is a liar
. I was not in a state of
dependence for a moment. I paid my board, at the
highest
price too, continually and regularly; and was
generally
in advance, to the very family where this transaction
happened.
He is a liar
. His sister was not a child,
when the affair happened. She was fourteen years
old, (I believe) and large of her age. She had the
appearance
of a fresh, healthy girl of sixteen.
He is a liar
.
I did not kiss her.I never kissed her in my life. I did
not take advantage of my situation; if I had chosen to,
nothing could have saved her. I do not say this, out of
disrespect to her, or unkindness; but, because it is the
truth. No young, careless girl could have withstood me,
if I had been a scoundrel, with the opportunities that I
had.
He is a fool
for he knows me. He knows that I
will not bear, very patiently, with such presumption.
He knows that I am not to be trifled with; or, if he do
not already know it, he and his whole family shall know
it, in a way that they do not apprehend.
He is a fool
;
inasmuch as he has told a secret, that would have been
untold, but for him, and one other man; as mistaken as
himself; a secret that concerned his own sister. Fool!
mad man! who will believe him! who, that knows
me
,
will believe that I contented myself with
kissing
a
woman
,
whom I had found in bed, at midnight; who will
believe that the hostility of the family grew out of an
incident
so trivial? Nobody. But for me, then, where
would be the reputation of his young and innocent sister?
It would be, at this moment, irretrievably blasted, by the
tattling of her own brother, were it not that the man
whom he has attempted to ruinby poisoning his
reputation
,
at the very moment that he was intimate with
himis willing to bear testimony to
her
innocence.
And who told the truth, at last? How came the
brother to know it at all? I was not suspected. The
family
treated me most kindly and affectionately, long after
it had happened. I visited the mother; I lived with her
for weeks; I took up my abode with her brothers and
sisters
;
and yet I was undreamt of. Aye, who told the
truth at last? It was I. Yes!Iand what object had
I to gain? Nothing but thisI was determined to give
the last and greatest proof, of my repentance and
reformation
.
And what was the consequence? How was it
received
?
I'll tell you, Omar. It will teach you caution. It
will convince you that, with
men
, it is safer to
be
a
villain
than to
appear
so; that it is easy and advantageous to
deceive, but very perilous to undeceive; that, while a man
is a scoundrel, if he be not a fool, he can escape
suspicion
;
but that, the moment that he proves himself
honester
than his neighbour, by acknowledging his most
hidden
transgression, and turning witness against himself,
he is a banished and ruined man; banished from all
hearts, and ruined in all opinions.
You are a young man. I call you so, because,
whatever
may be the number of years that you have lived,
you are altogether younger than I am. It may be well
for you, to understand how continually, yet how secretly,
our self-love is at work. A thousand contradictory
phenomena
may be traced to that little passion. We
cannot
endure to think humbly of our own judgment. It is
painful to acknowledge that we have been deceivedand,
therefore, we persist against all evidence, frequently, in
maintaining any opinion that we have once been heard
to express. How reluctantly do we listen to, and how
unwilling we are to believe anything
against
a favourite.
It is amusing to see how ingenious we are in escaping
convictionhow industrious and sensible, in accounting
for all that he may have done, said, or thought amiss.
Now this would be very amiable, and ought to make one
in love with human nature, a man would be apt to think.
But hearken a moment. The same benevolent creature,
who will not hear you open your mouth
against
a friend,
will not hear you open it in
favour
of an enemy. And
why? Is it that he is too generous, too like a
philanthropist
in the former case? Or that he is too wicked in
the latter? No such thing. It is an impeachment of his
own
judgment, against which he braces himself. He is
only withstanding the overthrow of his own opinion, and
nothing more. It is humbling to be convinced, that he
has been a fool or a bad man:a fool, if he have acted
without
evidence, in his love or his hatred; and a bad
man, if he have acted
against
it. Such is the character
of man. I know it. I knew it from the first: and,
therefore
,
I strive not, to convince men that I was not so bad
as they believed; because, if I succeeded, which would be
a
miracle
, for it would involve their
own self
condemnation
what
should I gain by it? Nothingnothing
but the hasty acquittal of men, whose condemnation were
hardly worse, than their praise.
In a few moments, you will be master of the whole
story. You will wonder then, at my infatuation. You
will ask if I repent of it. I shall answer youno! I do
not. What I told then, I would tell now. I did it to
recover
my own respect, not that of other men; to make
peace with a troubled spirita proud and unforgiving
nature;but it was no other nature, and no other spirit,
than my own. I had no one to appease, but myself;for,
to no one, upon the earth, was my transgression known.
I told the truth to my friendto my dearest friend.
What did he? Did he ask leave to communicate it? No!
But he did communicate it. And why? Could it make
them wiser, or better? Could it do any good? Yes! he
told themand without letting me know of it; so that I
was subjected to the chance of continual insult from them.
And yet, this very brother, of whom I have just spoken,
he, who, in his gossipping, childish confidence has put
the character of his own sister in jeopardy, met me, and
journeyed with me, day after day, with the most cordial
expression of good will,
after he knew the whole story;
and was scoundrel enough, and coward enough, to assail
my reputation, secretly,
at the same time
, by falsehood
and misrepresentation. Nay, I might have been led to
visit the family, without any suspicion of the change, by
the concealment of the first person, that he had betrayed
me; and by the abject duplicity of the latter; and then, in all
P
probability, there would have been blood shed;for, by
the living God! I would have struck to the earth, any of
the sons, or brothers, who should have dared to treat me,
to my face, as they have treated me at a distance.
And now, to my defence. The poor girl, I shall
spare; but, I shall spare her for her own sake, not for
theirs. I never think of her, but with respect and
emotion
.
I shall prove that, bad as I amI cannot injure
her, as her brothers have. My wickedness will
not
do,
what their folly would, if it were not neutralised by me.
I am charged with attempting the deliberate
seduction
of a child. That is the substance of the charge.
Omar, it might be a full reply to this charge, were I
to appeal to my life. It has been a long one, and full of
self-denial, in relation to women. I have led many into
peril; but I never availed myself of it. Yet, of this, I
have no witness; and I disdain to use asseveration.
When I first saw this child, she was a pretty little
creature, about eleven years old, I believe. She became
very fond of me; and I loved her, as I would have loved
my own sister. She had an innocent and caressing way
with her; was remarkably affectionate; and, to my
thought, felt, even at that age, with more of the feeling
of a woman, than of a child.
Some years afterward, I met her again. She had
grown tall and ugly; was careless in her appearance,
awkward, hoyden-like, and slovenly. I remonstrated
with her; I taught her to write and draw. I had
continual
opportunity to profit of her unsuspicious, grateful
temper; but I forbore. I never toyed with her. I never
trifled with her; I never romped with her; I never kissed
her; and I never attempted any liberties with her. I will
not say, that, while directing her, in her drawing or
writing
lesson, I may not have laid my hand over her lap, or
half encircled her waist, with my arm, as she leaned over
me. She betrayed her feeling toward me, in several
ways; once, when we first met, after a separation of two
or three years, by catching my hand and kissing it, as
we both stooped, at the same moment, to pick up
something
that one of us had dropped; and, many times, by
coming into my chamber, which was opposite to her own,
and challenging me, by her countenance and hilarity, to
a game of romps: not by wordsthat she never did; for
she was afraid of me, and more afraid of my opinion.
For a long time, we lived together in the same house.
Her chamber and mine were so situated, that I
continually
passed her door, when I went to bed, and when I rose.
She knew this, of course; yet, so neglectful was she of
propriety; or so indifferent to it, that I have seen her,
again and again, dressing and undressing, night and
morning, often, when the door was ajar; and, once or
twice, through the key-hole. You look indignant; look
soI do not blame you. I am no listener at key-holes;
but I hold it to be something brutish and insensible, to
pass by any opportunity of seeing a beautiful woman,
(nature's masterpiece,) naked, without profiting by it.
More than once, have I seen that child lying, in the
moonlight, almost naked; or, of a warm summer
morning
,
in her quiet, untroubled innocence and security; and
I have stood and contemplated her, with a feeling more
nearly allied to religion, than to impurity.
One night, she was terrified in her sleep; and left her
bed, precipitately; ran into a neighbouring chamber,
and crept into bed, with an old negro woman, to whom
she declared that a black man had been attempting to
strangle her. I heard the story at the time, and laughed
at it, as the dreaming of a child. But, at last, I learned
to avail myself of it, in my own defence. It was nearly
a year after her fright; and happened somewhat after
this fashion. I had seen her naked, no matter how nor
where; and I had good reason to believe that she knew
it, at the time. Nay, I still believe so. Some other
suspicion
entered my heart, about the same time; of what
nature
,
I need not declare, since I am perfectly satisfied
that her thought, like my own, was
innocent
. As I lay
meditating on the whole of my acquaintance with her, a
strange curiosity arose in my heart, to ascertain the truth
of my conjecture. My plan was immediately formed, and
deliberately executed; but, with no disposition to injure
the poor girl; far less, with any thought of her dishonour.
I meant to give her, as I have given more than one
woman
,
a lesson, that she would never forget
. I did not mean
to sacrifice her; but I meant to place her in such a
situation
,
that she would have been in my power:---what I mean
by, being in my power, is only, that she should not dare,
on her own account
, to call out, or resist me.
I went to her bed. I lay down by her side, and put
my arm, very gently, over her, so that it rested upon a
little child, that slept with her at the time. And this
reminds
me of another of her little imprudencies. While
she was in bed, the uncle of the child used to go up, and
take it out of her arms, and whip it; and this uncle was
a young man, and no relation of her's, either by blood
or marriage.
She awoke, and asked
who's this?
I did not reply,
because I thought that she might mistake me for her usual
companion, a woman who grew somewhat accustomed
to familiarity, before she married the scoundrel, who has
driven me to this defence.
She was terrified, and repeated the question. I had
no other object to answer. I had ascertained that she
neither wished for me, nor expected me; and I assure you
that, till I had tried the experiment, I did believe both.
Her friends ought to thank me for having ascertained
the truth, and vindicated her purity from all suspicion.
I arose, immediately, and returned to my room. But
hardly had I thrown myself into my own bed, when I
heard her cries. They alarmed me. For the first time,
I began to tremble for the consequences of my own
intemperate
and wicked curiosity. I opened my door, and
she threw herself into my arms, gasping for breath, and
shaking from head to foot. I asked her what was the
matter. O, there's a man in my room! there's a man
in my room! she kept continually repeating. I
pretended
to search the room, while she ran down stairs, and
jumped into bed with a man and his wife; and there lay,
poor creature, quaking all night long. The search for
the man was in vain,
of course
.
It is wonderful how accident will oftentimes befriend
the villain. My door I had purposely left open, two or
three nights before, under pretence of carrying off
the smoke and smell of the charcoal, which arose from
the wood that I was in the habit of burying every
night, in the ashes, that I might have a good bed
of coals in the morning; but, in reality, to facilitate my
escape, if there should be any outcry. On this very night,
it so happened that one of the servants, in passing my
room, saw the light of her candle flash upon the further
wall of my chamber, opposite to the door; and
mentioned
it. To this, my practice, of late, to leave the door open,
was a complete reply.
I had taken care to shut the door of the girl's room,
when I entered, lest some person might pass, while it
was open, and suspect something. The consequence was,
that I had to open and shut it, on returning; two things
that I foresaw might give me trouble, if any alarm should
happen before. But mark my good fortune. Nobody
could open the door without making
some
noise; although
he should open it, as I did, softly for a moment,
and then, very swiftly. A lady who slept below,
maintained
,
that the whole was another
dream
of the poor
girl's: and declared that she had been wide awake all
the while; that she heard her cry out,
who's this;
and all
the subsequent confusion; but that there was no door
opened
or
shut
. Of that she was positive! The poor
girl, on the contrary, maintained that it was opened and
shut, with some violence. She was mistakenboth were
mistakenbut, in the mean time, I escaped. Their
contradiction
neutralised the testimony of each. I was
particular
in shutting it, though she was at my heels, lest
she might see me enter my own room, which was
exactly
opposite to her's, but I shut it very softly.
There was another fact. The poor girl said, that she
felt the beard of a man, when she put up her hand, and
touched his face; and that it was very strong and harsh.
I remembered that she had touched my face, and took
care to shave, very closely, the next morning, before I
appeared. My
smooth
chin I dare say, was observed. Then,
if you add to this, that she had been just as badly
frightened
before, by
nothing
at all, you will not wonder that,
after all, considering the infirmity of human testimony,
P 2
I was not even suspected, except, perhaps, by the
girl herself; who, I believe, regarded it, if she did
suspect
me, as a
frolick!
The affair, as I tell you, passed over, without any
attention; and no living creature could ever have known
the truth, but for me. At length, I began to feel some
distress about the matter. I was afraid that the poor girl
might be troubled all her life, to determine whether the
whole was an apparition or a reality. I was unwilling
to let her suffer in that way; and equally unwilling to
tell the truth. And why? Because the plain truth would
be less
probable
, I knew, than a lie, such as I could
readily invent. I chose the latter, and told it to her own
brother-in-law, my most intimate friend, a good and
wise man. He knew me, and believed me; and pledged
his own faith for my veracity. The family continued to
treat me as usual. I visited them all, and was beloved
and respected by all. This pained me. My blood was
troubled. I felt that I did not deserve it; and I could
hardly
refrain from telling the truth, many a time, when the
thought came over me. Was that man to blame? No!
He was deceived; and deceived by a man who never
attempted
to deceive, in vain; by a man who could, and can
deceive any human being; by one, to whom many years
are but as a single day, if his purpose be deception---
by
myself
.--The story that I told, was this:I
acknowledged
that it was I, myself, who visited her in bedbut I
told him, at the same time, that it happened in my sleep.
You have not forgotten, said I, that, when I was
in love with Mary-Ann, (one of my early flames,) that
Joe (the blockhead who is the author of all this mischief)
endeavoured, continually, to discourage my affection for
her, chiefly by ridiculing my confidence in her; nor have
you forgotten, that I tore her from my heart, forever, in
consequence of her having permitted him to kiss her. I
never forgave him for it, of course, although the attempt
was made with my own approbation.
You know, too, I continued, that his present wife
slept in the same bed, frequently, with the girl, of whom
we have been speaking; that, on the very night when this
affair took place, Joe was married to her.
Now, these things were all true, Mr. Omar, and he
knew them to be so:but listen to the remainder of my
story.
This same Joe, by the way, I may as well give you
some notion of. He is the most unprincipled and
contemptible
profligate, that I ever saw; and, either the
greatest liar, or the most successful villain, among
women, upon earth. I know not how he used to succeed
as he did; but that he
did
succeed, to a certain degree,
sometimes, I know, of my own knowledge. The sum
of his fascination; and his manner of fondling and
whining
himself into the hearts of women, I am perfectly
familiar
with. He danced prettily; wore pomatum in his
hair; affected to be quite miserable, and sentimental, and
very
affectionate; quoted poetry; and particularly a
versification
of Sterne's Maria, and some lines from Camoens,
in that devilish lackadaisical manner, which to some
women
is perfectly irresistible;a part of the last, I can
remember.
For I was made in joy's despite,
And meant for misery's slave;
And all my hours of brief delight,
Fled, like the speedy winds of night,
Which soon shall wheel their sullen flight,
Across my grave!
You have no idea of the effect produced upon the women
of his intimate acquaintance, by the occasional repetition
of these lines. Those who could not understand the
poetry
,
understood the toneand all were deeply affected.
They wept with him, pitied him, either sobbed upon his
bosom, or let him sob upon theirs; nay, some of them went
into a melancholy; one grew very thin, to my
knowledge
,
and another very fat; the latter of whom, he
secretly
married; and that too, after swearing to me, that he
would not think of such a thing, without consulting me.
It was that man, who first reconciled me to the company
of abandoned women. Thus much for his character,
Mr. Omar; and now, for the tale that I told, in my
own defence, interweaving much truth, with much
falsehood
,
merely that the poor girl might not be under a
delusion
all her life, in the matter; and that I might not be
utterly reprobate in their opinion.
I lay that night, said I, (the night of his marriage,)
ruminating on my past life; recalling my early love,
which he had turned to bitterness; I remembered the
pang that it gave my heart, when he told me that he had
succeeded; and, while I remembered it, I fell asleep; for
so vividly and strangely interwoven were the imaginary
and the real, throughout the whole of the adventure, that
they cannot, even now, be separated in my recollection. He
came to me, I thought, and I reproached him, for having
drugged my wine-cup with poison. He defended
himself
on the ground, that he had done it with my
permission
.
We wrangled for some time, until he, himself, as
I thought, proposed that I should make the same attempt
upon the woman of his heart, who lay in the next room.
I arose, and went to her bed, and lay down by
her
side,
as I thought; nor did I awake, till I heard a loud outcry;
which, when I first awoke, and found myself in bed
with another person, in a strange place, was more like
a dream to me, than any thing that had passed. At length,
however, I remembered enough to assist me in
recovering
my own room, &c. &c. &c.
That, Mr. Omar, is the substance of my story. It
was believed, as I have already told you, and by one,
who knew me, most intimately; and why? because it was
probable
. He knew that I had never taken any liberties
with the poor girl; that I had never corrupted, nor sought
to corrupt her; that I was not a sensualist nor a
profligate
;
that I had lost my early love, in the way that I
mentioned; that Joe was married in the night, when the
affair took place; and that his wife did sleep, frequently,
in the same bed with the girl. Therefore, as I have
told you, he believed me. But, had I told the
truth
, he
would not have believed me. It was too improbable.
Do you doubt this? I appeal to fact. I did tell him
the truth, the simple, unadulterated truth, afterward,
freely, and of my own accord; yet, he did not believe me.
Yesthe account that I gave, was believed. But,
what of that? my conscience grew uneasy. I had told
a lie. That was nothing; I cared little for that,
then
.
I regarded it as a legitimate and lawful exercise of my
imagination, like writing a novel or a poem. But, the
thing that pained me, was, a doubt of my own motive.
I had deceived one, that loved and respected me. It lay
heavily at my heart, until I had added two or three
more deceptions to it; when, all at once, they became
insupportable. They would have crushed me; but I
arose, with a convulsive effort, and threw them off,
forever
.
I told the truth. I turned self-accuser, before a
mortal tribunal. I disdained to parley with dishonour.
I denounced Edward Molton, with my own mouth.
Who thanked me for it? Who thought the better of me
for it? Nobodynobody!John Omar, look at me
if I would, I might be ten times the villain that I am,
or ever have been, and pass through life, unsuspected.
You look upon me with amazement. You wonder at my
infatuation. You would ask what I can hope to gain, by
laying bare my whole heart, before the uncharitable and
distrustful; before them, whose very self-love will
prevent
them from respecting me, when they find how they
have been deceived. My answer is a very simple one.
I have done my duty; and whatever I hold to be my
duty
,
that will I do, whatever happen. I have learnt to
disregard all other considerations, of late.
Can it be your duty, said I, after a pause, to
publish
the shame of a family, with whom you have been so
intimate?to put in jeopardy, the peace of a woman,
who, whatever might have been the character of her
husband
,
is now tranquil, and respectable, and
unsuspected
?
Yes.It is my duty. Her husband has driven me
to it. He has presumed too much upon my patience; and,
not only he, but his whole family. He, in particular,
has, almost while I held his hand in mine, sought to damn
my reputation, secretly. Let him take the consequences.
By showing that he is a profligate, and a liar, I can best
defend myself from his aspersions. I feel no
hostility
to many of the females; butwo to the
men
, if they
provoke me. My character shall not go down to my
children profanedwo to them that compel me to stand
at bay. I will execute justice upon them.
I was alarmed at his countenance; it was full of
unsparing
denunciation.
Justice! said Iit is vengeance.
Be it vengeance, then. Call it what you please. My
own heart tells me that I am doing rightly; that I have
forborne too long;so long, that, unless I awake and
prostrate my assailants, I may be bound down, and
imprisoned
,
forever, like Gullivar, with cobweb; which,
had I not slept too soundly, might have been broken
asunder, by a breath.I.
He stopped suddenly.I looked up. His eyes were
rivetted upon the clock. It wanted five minutes of
twelve. Not another word was spoken, till it struck
twelve. Never did I endure such an awful silence. His
eyes were shining and motionless; and his lips open, as
if he were some criminal, a waiting his doom, and feeling
its approach, in every beat of his pulseif his pulse did
beatfor mine stopped;and the clock, too
that
appeared
to stand still, for a time.
He then turned slowly toward me, and demanded if I
would take a bed with him. Your room is just as you left
it;you are our only guest,our only
material
guest, I
should say;dare you sit with me for one hour longer
no more?
Dare
I? I do not understand.
He did not appear to heed my reply;and I repeated
it.
Yes, sir
dare
you?
Dare
you sit up, face to face,
with awith a mortal man, when his countenance,
looks like mineat this moment;moves like mine
is bleached and blastedstained like mineSir
my friendOmardo not leave me alone, to
night. Do not. If you are a man, you will not.
I was terrified with the horrour that his face expressed.
I knew not what to say. I could not comprehend his
purpose. But I said, as coolly, as I could. No,
Molton
I
will not leave youI
He sprang from his chair;he seized my hands;he
almost embraced me;nay, I could swear that there
were tears in his eyes. But he shook in every joint.
Very wellI have your promiseI.
The most astonishing fixedness followed, as he said
this;his lips movedbut his voice died away, in a
hollow
,
inarticulate whisper;and his eyes were fixed upon
the terrace that passed the window,with an intentness
that made my blood run cold.
Why was
I
affected in this manner?
I
saw nothing
heard nothing; but the atmosphere grew chilly, all at
once, about me,and my chair rattled against the table.
He breathed aloud. The blood rushed over his face
again:he wiped off the clammy sweat, that adhered to
his brow; arose, and walked to the terrace,---opened the
door, and was gone for a few moments. When he came
back, he was entirely composed; a faint smile, but a bitter
one, was upon his lips, and his blue eyes were
unnaturally
glazed.
Let us continue our discussion, said he. We shall
not be interrupted again, to night. He looked at the watch
---No, the hour has passedthat was the third time.
Interrupted! said I, inaudibly---how? Interrupted!
Hushhush! This is no proper place, for such
questions
.
You are young. Beware, lest you bring it back;
would you have
your
lips dry
your
throat scorched
your
heart turned to cindersyour.
I obeyedless, I am sure, with any apprehension of
spiritual things,than out of respect to the tremendous
agitation that I saw in him. Cousin,if ever there was
a man on this earth, supremely wretched, that man is
Edward Molton. No matter whence it arisesI care
notI ask notit is our duty to pity him, and pray for
him.
He resumed, as followswith a tone and manner,
of such perfect unconcern, that one would have thought that
nothing had happened, or that
he
had no interest,
whatever
,
in the matter.
The third charge, is, if possible, more serious. Ye
it is trueI do not deny it. I did attempt to win a
woman
away from her solemn engagement to another,
and I failed. Why? Perhaps I could give a better
reason
than any that you have heard;but one that I have
ever loved, I cannot speak of irreverently. Her own
heart must judge her. But the facts are these. I saw
her by accident, when she was a school girl. I thought
little of her, at first, until a circumstance made me believe
that she had a better mind, than I had ever suspected.
I saw her in tears,shaken with ungovernable emotion
and shame. I soothed herand her manner, afterward,
was that of deep interest, not of tenderness, so much as of
awe. She was afraid of me. SirI am not a man to
be deceived in such things. I have had too much
experience
.
I have done with falsehood,for I am not long
for the only place where falsehood is permittedthis vile
earth. The devils are true to each other. You may
believe
me, then;and I declare to you, solemnly, that
this
girl
loved
me;loved me, as passionately and as
truly
,
as any child of her age (for she was only 15 or 16)
ever
loved a man of mine. I knew this,felt this,
and there was two other persons, at least, who saw
enough, in her manner, even in their presence, to justify
them in saying, as I do, that
she loved
me. Yet I took
no advantage of this. We were often alone, and once, in
particular, when we had little hope of ever meeting again.
Yet I forbore to signify any other than the solicitude of
a brother, for the true welfare of a young, and beautiful,
and innocent sister. She expected morebut she was
impressed, I am sure, with more reverence for me. Why
did I forbear? I loved herindeed I didnot so much
for what she was, as for what I believed that she would
be; and I cautioned her, with all the feeling of a lover,
but with the manner of a friend, against many things of
vital importance to her,her sudden and enthusiastick
prepossessionsand prejudices;the consequence of
flattery
,
for she was much sought after, and, I have no doubt,
truly beloved, by several young men of good talent, and
respectable family, at the time. But why did I forbear?
From principle. I believed that she loved me. Grant
that I was deceived; grant that my vanity, which was
inordinate in some matters, though I believe not in
these, had deceived me. Yet I loved her;in
that
, I
could not be deceived,but I forebore to communicate,
by the slightest touch, or tone, or look, one thought of
what I felt. Was there no forbearance in that? I
treated
her as something hallowed,I used no caressing
manner:no squeezing of hands;no embracing;no
touching of lips or forehead. No!never did I attempt
either. Why?
She was a child
. I was afraid of
familiarising her to such things; afraid of
corrupting
even the atmosphere of her thoughtafraid of
breathing upon her innocence;---afraid of dashing
the tremulous dew from the flower---of brushing
the soft blue from the grape. I was poor. I saw
no likelihood of being otherwise, for many a
weary
year. I was but just entering a profession, perilous,
and uncertain. Many years were to be spent in my
novitiate
,
for I had no education. I was taken from school
at twelve,my mother was a widow woman,poor, and
kept a school for a living. And many years more must
pass, before I ought to think of loving. What then? Was
there nothing noble? Nothing of self denial? Nothing
heroick, in this sacrifice? I leave you to answer it. Did
I not know that the heart once touchedlike the lips, with
a live coal,is forever callous to all but the like touches,
again;that the uninhabited heart, will have a
substantial
tenant, evil or goodrather than be haunted by the
shadow
of a departed loved-one? Yet I left her
left her, in silencein ignorance of my feeling.
Well---I returned to my homeentered upon my
studiestoiled day and night, as no other man ever toiled,
in America. What was my reward? I heard that she
was to be married.Did I repine? No. I heard that the
affianced man was worthy of her; that she loved him
and I was happy. NayI had no wish to disturb
heror
him
.
Q
It happened, however, that one who knew them both,
gave me good reason to believe that I was remembered
yet;that he, the lover, was uneasy, when my name was
mentioned; and, from another quarter, from a man of
honest
and substantial principle, who knew her well---I heard
this, perhaps incautiously. I do not believe that she
loves Mr. G.(the name of her lover)Nay, the same
man advised
me
to see her. Perhaps it was only a piece
of pleasantry in himbut I thought that there was
some significance in his manner. But I refused. Why?
I trembled to disquiet a young heart, in its pleasant
dreaming;for, if it awoke, what had I to offer it?
Nothing
?I
was poor and prouddestituteand with a
prospect of being so, forever.
But, nevertheless, we metmet, just where I had seen
her before. Twice were we visiters of the same place
at the same timeleagues and leagues from our home.
I treated her as a married woman. I spoke of her lover,
as her husband, for some days. At last, however,
something, I know not what, set me upon the suspicion
that she did
not
love him, as she could lovenay, as she
had loved, even in her childhood. I trembled for her.
Did she love me still? It were too much to imagine that.
But that she felt a deep and sincere respect for me, I
was sure. I was afraid to trust myself with her. Two
or three weeks had passed, during which, the letters of her
lover (who was at a great distance, and in the habit of
writing every week,) did not arrive. I studied her
countenance
.
There was some concern in her eyesbut it
was not that inward, that profound, quiet agony, which
true love would feel; the love that I would inspire. Other
circumstances occurred to strengthen the suspicion, one,
only, of which I shall name. I was walking to church
with her. I spoke of the power that a woman has, to win
whom she pleases. I said, emphatically, that it was in
her
power. She replied, in a manner that, had we been
alone, it is probable I should have profited bythat
if it were true, she knew whom she would win. She did
not mean her lover, by that, I am sure;sure, from her
voice;sure, because she was not a fool;and there was
a mysterious meaning in her manner, that would have
been ridiculous, had she meant Mr. G. for what need of
mystery with
him
every body knew that she was
engaged
to himNoshe meant
me
.
But I took no notice of it, either then or afterward.
The time was now at hand, for my departure. It had
been unaccountably delayed; and I was really anxious
to be gone. My nights were troubled and sleepless. I
retired early, but it was not to sleep. If, said I, she
do not love him; or, if she do love mewhat a fool I
am, not to speak; should I ever forgive myself, were she
to marry him, and be wretched? but would it not be
dishonourable
to break such an engagement as theirs
asunder
?
Noit was doing as I would be done by. That
was my rule of action.
The next day was a sort of religious festival; and I
had determined to stay no longer than, till
that
was over.
In the morning, therefore, after breakfast, contrary to
my usual custom, which was, to read to the women, a
great part of the forenoon; or, at least, to sit with them, I
retired to another apartment, and began writing.There
is the letter, sir. Read it at your leisure. It expresses
all that I felt. It occupied me, in writing and copying
it, nearly all the forenoon; and when I came down, I
learnt, to my astonishment, that Emma, (let that be her
name; it is sufficient for
our
purpose;) had gone to bed,
sick. I was alarmed; but my vanity, which, like that
of all others, I suppose, will find aliment, in
unsubstantial
thingscolour and fragrance in the very airmade
me suspect the cause. I determined to try the
question
fairly. I came down, and sat below;and she
soon made her appearance; full of dignity, expression,
and loveliness.
The letter was in my pocket. But how was I to give
it to her?when?I determined to keep it, till I was
ready to go; and leave it, beyond the reach of accident, in
her possession;for, you will perceive that I took no
advantage of her situation. Had I been the scoundrel
that some affected to think me, would I not have assailed
her, in the heat of her resentment against the supposed
neglect of Mr. G? Would I not have demanded, at least,
an immediate answer? Would I have put myself, as I did,
into
her
power, without demanding that she should put
herself at all in mine? Would I have left it in her power
to take me, when she pleased, as a sort of Hobson's choice.
These are rational questions.Let the rational answer
them. Nothat woman may not know it, but I paid her
a greater compliment, than she will ever receive again,
should she live a thousand years. She maybut no, I
do not believe itI was about saying, that she
may
think
me base and unprincipled. But noshe knows me better.
Her own heart will aquit me. I am willing to submit to
that. And however she may find it expedient to revile
me, or my memory, I shall forgive her, and attribute it
to necessity. She dare not do me justice. But her heart
will awakeit will, am sure, one day or other; and she
will feel sorry, and ashamed of having written me such
a note, as you will find in the letter that I gave you.
But let me proceed. In the evening, as we sat together,
in a mournful and distressing, yet sweet silence. After
all the company had goneno, I am mistaken.It was
beforeit was early in the evening; we had not yet come
to the moment, when, about to part, perhaps forever, the
approaching separation took its most touching and
mysterious
movement and expression. I wrote upon a
little
card, something like thisand gave it to her. I
have somewhat to communicate to you.Where shall I
leave it?It is written.Shall I put it in your little green
work bag, in the sitting room? She assented, with
considerable emotion. I placed that letter in the bag.
She secured it, and returned.I sat by her, until I was
sure that she could not
read
it, before I was gone;and
then, I bade them all farewell; and departed the next
morning, at day-light.
One year afterward, having good reason to believe
that she really would be married to Mr. G.and being,
I confess, rather anxious to set myself free, from so
unequal
an engagement, I wrote to her, and demanded,
rather
cavalierly, I am sure, a definite reply; and a return
of my letters.Nayto tell you the whole truth, I had
already began to think of another woman. But, would
I have married
her
, had she claimed my promise?Yes
By my hope of heaven! Yes! though I had been
miserable
forever, in consequenceand sheand
she
should
never have suspected, to my dying day, that she had not
always been the dearest idol of my heart. You will find
her answer in the same letter. (both of which, I enclose
to you, Sarah; and shall direct to Boston.) She never
wrote that answer, without advice. Nor is it true.
Her lover, or some friend, was probably at her elbow;
and it is rather her
own
vindication, than any thing else.
I do not believe that
she
destroyed the letters
immediately
;
nor ever, without first taking a copy;and I
know
,
that she entertained far different sentiments of my conduct,
while left to herself; for her own aunt says, in a letter,
which is in my cabinet at this moment, and was written
some days after Emma had received the papers, at
which she affects to have been so
incensed
, that Emma
speaks of me with venerationno, that she
reverences
me.
That is all. Good night, Sarah
JOHN.
By heaven!I have discovered the cause of Molton's
horrour. Last night was the night of William's murder,
just two years ago;no wonder that he was afraid to be
alone. O, Molton!
EDWARD MOLTON TO EMMA RANDALL
L,
2d Dec.
181-.
Read this alone, and where it is not possible for you
to be interrupted. I hardly know how to address you,
and yet I feel an insupportable anxiety to be thoroughly
understood, before I leave you, perhaps, forever. You
will be surprised, I know you will, at my
writing
you;
but how else could I communicate with you? You are
Q 2
too narrowly watched---by your friends, I admit, those
who are, and ought to be most dear to you, but still, you
are too narrowly watched, to afford any person, and
particularly
me, an opportunity of unreserved and
uninterrupted
conversation with you, upon any interesting
subject
.
I had determined, when I came here, to observe you
closely---narrowly, but secretly;to make myself
master
of your character; and, if possible, of your most
hidden
thought. In some measure, I have succeeded, and
yet---on the very point, where I feel the deepest interest,
I am still in doubt.
You
only can satisfy me---to
you
then, I appeal.
I did intend, too, to be watchful of myself; never to be
thrown off my guard; to be discreet and reserved. But
I could not---I cannot be such a hypocrite. You have
prevailed; I am about to leave you, and I cannot, will
not lose you, forever, without making one effort to
preserve
you---without first proving to you that I know your
value.
You
think that I overrate it. You are mistaken.
I do not. I know you as you are---as you were, and as
you will be. I cannot be deceived. For more than two
years, your character has been my study---my companion
---my support and impulse.
[4]
[4]
A lieby the way
M
.
This is the truth.
I am frank---perhaps too frank;---but you must not be
offended. It would be unworthy of you. I should
deserve
to be despised, derided, trampled on, were I the
dastard to conceal such a passion as this, where I have
so much at stake; and you will not, from affectation, the
miserable prudery of your sex, feel offended at the
declaration
of one, who, whatever may be his faults, has
manhood
enough to speak as he feels.
Another thing, I had determined on, not resolutely,
but in some measure. It was to treat you as the wife of
another. It was in vain. You are not the wife of
another
,
and I cannot so treat you, until you are so indeed,
and beyond, forever beyond, my reach.
I did determine too,and I mention these things, that
you may understand how feeble, how very feeble our best
resolutions are, where passion is not prevented from
laying
her hand upon themI did determine never to say
I love
, to any being on earth, until I was
certain
that
she would reply---
I love
. That too, is done with.---
I shall break my promise, and when I do, I know that I
shall have risked enduring the keenest, the most deadly
humiliation, that such a spirit as mine can ever endure.
You, my dear friend (you must permit me to call you
so)---regarding yourself as already engaged, are
struggling
to believe that the man, to whom you
are
engaged, is
your husband. Emma, I tremble for you. He is not---and
possibly
never may be. And what is the engagement?---
is it marriage?---no. It is an understanding, that, if
your affections are unchanged;---if both
continue
to find
none whom they love better;---if both
continue
to feel, as
during the first impulse of youthful affection, then---
both
shall be married together. And that is all. Therefore,
if you love Mr. G. and he be, indeed, the man who
deserves
you;---if he be the creature, not of romance, or
poetry, but of that towering elevation in real life, which
must be the characteristick of your companion;---if he be
so made, so fashioned, as to receive and communicate
impulses
,
that shall outlast this life;---in short, if he be the
man, who is to be
your husband
, and who deserves to be,
then must he glory in exposing you to competition. If
he tremble---he is unworthy of you. If he complain,
though his heart break under the disappointment, he is
not the man to whom you must look for counsel, comfort
and greatness. For, is it not better to lose the woman
of your heart, than to have her marry you, with abated
affection, merely from a sense of duty, or propriety? Yes
---he who wins you, must be willing to prove his
confidence
in you and himself, by arraying himself against
the whole world, if it will enter the list for you.
Emma
!---this
is not declamation. It is what I feel. I could
do all this;---nay, I would do it.
I am doing, therefore,
as I would be done by
; and if Mr. G. be the man that I
delight
in believing him (for I would have no humble com
petitor,) he will be gratified, and proud, whatever be the
result.
Now then, I give you a proof of it. I throw myself on
your generosity.I forget all my prideI declare to
you that
I love you
that I have long loved you;that I
have never so loved any other womannever felt for
another, so much of what I would pray to feel, for the
future companion of my life, here and hereafter
tenderness
,
admiration and respect. You are already what I
would have you be, so far as your character is
developed
;
and you
will be
, all that I would hope to deserve. I
am sure of it. For myself, I am, whatever I am, chiefly
on your account.
[5]
[5]
Another lie.
M
.
I would be worthy of you. There is
my proof. I address you as my equal. Do not believe that
I am about asking any sacrifice, on your part, at this time.
Indeed, I am not. It is all on mine. All that I ask is this.
If you believe that I may become worthy of what I aspire
to, think of me, and direct me. What I can be, I will be
for your sake. Mould me to your purpose. I know
what I say. I do not fear to say, that I will become
what you
would wish me to be; because, I know that you
would never humble me in my own eyes; that you would
never request, what it would be unworthy in me to grant,
or you to receive.
Again, I sayDo not believe that I am aiming to
entangle
you in contradictory engagements. NoI would
sooner perish. Nor, would I, were I
sure
that you loved
another, were I
convinced
that you so loved him, as with
all your boundless capacity of devotion, you are qualified
to love, would I open my mouth to you on the subject.
Indeed
,
the hour that so convinced me, would be the last
of our communion. I would leave you forever; I would
never meet you again, never!
As it is, then, I have my doubts. They are not the
doubts of others; they are my own, firm observation of
my own. I care not what Mr. Stonebridge says, or
others. They cannot understand you, or me. You are
not made for an ostentatious display of affection.
Yours is silent, holy, unobtrusive and mysterious.
Therefore
,
have I my doubts, and they are terrible.Your
happinessI care little for my own, in comparison, your
happiness, here and hereafter, is at stake.
Now, all that I ask of you, is this. Remember me.
Think of me, sometimes. Betray this communication to
no human being,
till you are married
. I know that I may
trust you; and you know the value of the trust. You
have that generosity, that made me love you, not at first
sight, (for I was not a boy, when I saw you) but when I
first made myself master of your character. This then,
is all that I ask. Betray this to nobodyto no living
creature
,
without my consent. But, when you are married
whether to Mr. G. or another, for I feel that though
he
may not win you, it is equally possible, and more so
perhaps, that I may notyou may show him (your
husband
)
this letter. If I am alive, at that time, it will be
the surest marriage portion that woman ever gave to
man. Nothing ever after will shake his confidence in
your loveif he have a noble spirit.
Do not charge me with vanity here. I am vain. I
know it, and am sometimes weak enough to glory in it.
It is a diseased ambition, I verily believe; and I hope
to outlast it. Still, in this case, I do honestly and from
my soul, believe, that I
shall be
a man, whom your
husband
,
whatever
he
may be, will be proud to have had
sacrificed to him.
In the mean time, I shall hold on my course steadily.
You will hear of me, but not from me, unless you should
indeed, be all that I could wish;andbut no, I must
not dream of such things. Yet let me be understood.
Your present engagement
may
come to an end. Men and
women are changeable; our affections run riot sometimes,
and will not be restrained. If thenI say it with
trembling
if
such an event should take place; if, by
any
event,
you should discover that you cannot so love your present
contemplated husband as you
ought
, to be able to trust
all your happiness to himall that I beg of you is, to
let me hear of it. I shall understand you. You need
fear no change in me. My constancy is not that of boys.
It is that of experience and examination. When I love,
it is not, though my character would justify a different
opinion sometimes, it is
not
precipitately, without
examination
.
Here is an example. I have never loved but
two women. To only one, have I ever said so much.
The other, and you know her, thought that she did not
love me. She was mistaken.She is now going
married
,
and broken-hearted, to her grave. I did love that
woman; I did, and confess it; but not, as I have loved you.
There was tenderness in it; but, very little respect. I
never saw the time, when I would have married her, even
if I had been justified by my circumstances. But, were
I so justified, I
would
marry you; I would come to you
then
, not in the language of common love, to throw
myself
at your feet, for you would dispise me, were I so
abject
but
to meet you as a man should meet a
woman
,
with his heart in his handin fearless equality,
remembering
that I was paying to you the most unequivocal
homage, that I could pay to any creature under heaven;
and, though grateful, to suffocation if you received me,
still erect and confident of my equality. Such would be
my conduct, were it allowed to me, so to behave.
Adieu!farewell!I am already tedious, I fear, and yet
I have said but little that I would say. Farewell! may
heaven bless you, Emma. May you find your equala
companion made to
govern
, not obey others.
EDWARD MOLTON.
One word more. You will hear of my ficklenessthat
I am in love with others. Do not believe it. I am not.
I have been. I have compared you with many women,
in all parts of our country; and I am, nevertheless, more
resolutely attached than ever. For my dispositionit
is fiery, I know. But it is capable of becoming
whatever
you please to make it. I am rash, to be sure: but,
when the happiness of others, of them that I love, is at
stake, I can endure anything. As for what I
am
, you
already know me. But I ask not your answer to what I
am
now;
but to what
I shall be
. Hereafter, you may
compare me with whom you please. If I cannot abide
the trial, cast me off, abandon me, leave me. I shall be
unworthy of you. If you go to Boston, you will hear
much against meand much in my favour. Believe
neither. Judge for yourself. I know my own character,
and what I am capable of. No other human being does.
When you desire it, you shall know it, as it is
enthusiastick
impassioneddevoted
and ambitiousdoing
whatever it doeswith all its heart, and all its soul.
Some interest, it is possible, you may feel, respecting
my family. Much you
must
feel, at some future period,
if I should ever meet you as I hope to. In the mean
time you may believe me, when I say that it is,
altogether
,
unexceptionable. All are respectable and honest.
And some are higher in the estimation of the world than
mere honesty would place them.
[6]
[6]
Another lie,
meant
, but not expressed
M
.
They are not
fashionable
people, but they are good.
As for my attention to other girls, and falling in love
with every girl I see, that is altogether unfounded. I
trifle with, or treat with respect, as they happen to
deserve
,
coquettes or fine women, when I see them (and you
do the same, with men)but as for lovenever! That
is a passion of no common seriousness with me. It is
inappeasable. I never felt itas an enduring passion,
but for you.
Remember me. I shall never forget
you
and
be not
precipitate
.
M.
(Answerreceived nearly a year afterwardalluded to
in the conversation of Molton.)
MR. MOLTON,
I was this morning much surprised by the reception
of another epistle from you; and extremely disappointed
and chagrined at your interpretation of my silence, with
regard to the paper (that) I found in my possession, after
your departure from Leister. On the perusal of those
letters, I was greatly shocked and incensed;
A
fib
ladies never
lieM
.
still they
would have been answeredcould I have hoped it would
be believed;but how could I hope for any
such
respect,
from a man, who believed me capable of engaging myself,
to a man (that) I did
not
lovewho could presume (that) I
might be influenced in a matrimonial contract, by any
other consideration than that of
love;
and this, your
letter
most unequivocally expressed you to presume and
believe
.
No person, entertaining even a tolerable respect
for me, could have supposed (that) I would engage to
repose
myself and all my future prospects, upon the bosom
of a man, to whom I had not extended all the boundless
devotion of my soul. No; every new reflection that I
bestow upon the subject, confirms me in the persuasion,
that I never could have received your papers, from a
person
of honourable and virtuous feeling; or who could
have formed a just estimate of my character.
Could you know me, and suppose (that) I would preserve
long, the letters alluded to? I assure you (that) the
impulse
to commit them to the flames, was simultaneous
with their perusal. I regret now that I obeyed it, since
you request the return of them.
[7]
[7]
Well managed. There is no convicting one of falsehoodwho
talks in this way. It is
lawyer-like
but may she not have had
professional
advice? The mortal antipathy that appears to the relative
(that)
would justify the belief that she hadand that her counsel was a
lawyer
an
Americanand a Yankee.
M
.
I can assure you (that)
I regret as sincerely as you can, the moment that
induced
you to write them, for it compelled me to consider
you in a different light from what I had always hoped to
that of a friend.
EMMA B. RANDALL.
N,
Oct.
23, 18.
(Postscript, by John, to Sarah, in the envelope.)
P. S.Mistaken girl! Where was the mischief of that
letter? I pity her, Sarah. Tell me, does it not speak
well for Molton? And can you believe that her answer
came from her heartunaided, untortured? No! She
was wrought uponsuspicion was infused into her pure
natureshe was made to believe that Molton had
insulted
her
or she never would have charged the writer of
that letter with aught that was not virtuous and
honourable
.
What did he do? Admit that he was deceived
in supposing that she did not love G.or that she
did
love
him
. What did he do? Nothing but this, in effect. He
said to herYour happiness is dearer to me than my
own. You are about to be sacrificed. I may be
mistaken
.
I hope that I am. But if I am right, call to me
when you will, where you will; and lo, I am ready to
save you, at the peril of my life and soul. And this
this
she has dared to call dishonourable and unfriendly.
Mistaken
woman!her own heart rebuked her, when she
wrote it. Nay, it was never written of her own free will.
Her judgment was turned aside by the powerful hand of
some one, who never had seen, or never had known, the
author of that letter.
Her
manner is more simple and
direct. What advantage did he take of her? None. Did
he even attempt to steal into her heart? No. Did he
offer any endearment? No. Did he break in upon
another's
love? No!another broke in upon his. What
did he, then? He attempted to restore a woman to
him
,
whom
he
believed, to have been
her first love!
Was this
sinful? It matters not, whether he was mistaken or not.
If he was mistaken, there was no harm done. He did
not hurry her. He took no profit of her anger, or of his
opportunity
;
extorted no promise;nay, avoided even a
reply
,
that
she might have nothing to accuse herself of, if she
married G.
and yet, that she might have a steadfast
hold on
him
. By heaven, it was the noblest, the most
disinterested, and heroick evidence of love,
unquestionable
love, that I ever met with!
I think, as Molton does, that she will come to her
sensesthat she will repent of having written that letter.
Nay, if she have any heart left, she will weep, to think, how
unkindly she requited the greatest offering of a proud
spirit
itself
. I observe some pencil notes, in the
handwriting
of Molton; but I have no time to read them.
What a packet I have made of it! and yet, I am
strongly
tempted to add another that I received, this morning,
R
from my dear brother. He is going to New-Orleans
writes in good spirits. But there is something in it,
which I cannot put in your way. I am rather alarmed,
too, about him; and shall go on, I think, to Charleston.
Adieu
.
JOHN
.
Molton has just sent me a letter. I enclose a copy.
Read it. What does he mean? If my brother have any
blood left, he will return, and bring
him
to an account.
Yes, I shall go to Charleston this very day, and leave
direction, with Jane, to forward any letters that are left.
FRANK TO JOHN.
Charleston
,
May
10
th
, 18.
My dear Brother
,
I am ruined. Send me a thousand dollars. I have no
time to relate the particulars; but, if you would save me
from dishonour, send me the money. I shall wait only
one post over the time. I am in good spiritsvery good
can laugh, and talk, and play, and drink, andyes,
yes! I am in
very
good spirits.
We talk of going to New-Orleans. A passage thence
to South America, or the peninsula, I don't know which,
will be the next step.
Isbrother, dear brother, for God's sake, write to
me, immediately. Tell me, how isno matter for the
name.
Tell me
. Let nothing prevent you.
I like this city. My letters have been of service to me,
and I am, continually, at some entertainment or other,
given in princely style, by some of the reigning nabobs.
But thisO, curse this affectation. Brother, I
cannot
trifle. That day has gone by. I am too heavy
here;
too hot about the temples, for laughter. What is festivity
to me?the carousal of a charnel house?the feast of the
sick chamber? Dear,
dear
Juah, no!the pale,
lovely shadow went by me, last night, in my dreams;
and, I am sure, that, thatno, no! I cannot speak it.
If it be all over, seal your letter with black. No matter
for the money, then
that
will be sufficient.
Go where I will, I hear something of Molton. A
gentleman
boards here, who knew him in Philadelphia. He
says that Molton
courted
a girl for several years, there;
then persuaded a friend to take her off his hands;that
the friend discovered something, just at the critical
moment
of marriage;that the affair was broken off;the
girl fell sick, and Molton, himself, went into the country
with her, and his
friend
left the city:that Molton
renewed
his addresses;introduced another man to her;
affected
to quarrel with her;was turned out of the house
by her father;that she married the man that Molton
introduced
and died in childbed a few months afterward.
John, is this true? Can it be? Enquire into it. I give
you the names. Love to Sarah.
Her
name was Marion,
M. P.I find that I have known her. Her story made
many a heart ache.
FRANK.
EDWARD MOLTON TO FRANK OMAR.
I owe you no courtesy, young man. But, you have
dared to love Juliet Gracie; and you cannot be
entirely
worthless. Are you a man? Awake, then.
Were you presumptuous enough to think of
her
, and yet,
so feeble of spirit, as to throw away your life and
faculties
,
like a foolish boy, at your first disappointment?
You do not respect me. It is your own fault. Come to
me, and I will make you respect me.
You cannot support adversity. How then, could you
calamity; humiliation; poverty, and deathwith a
helpless
womana family, perhaps, dependant upon you?
For shame, Omar.I know your brother. He is younger
than you; but, on some accounts, I would rather trust
the happiness of Juliet to his keeping, than to yours.
Do not be startled;do not threaten me;do not distrust
me. It would be idle. There is not time to lose.
Come backcome back. Juliet is at my disposal. Do
as I bid you, and she may be yours. A plot is working
for her destruction. Come quickly, or you will be too
late. You are poor. No matterI have enough, and
to spare. Are you jealous of me? Come to me, and I
will satisfy you, that you have no causethat I cannot,
will not see her again, while there is life in me. Do you
tremble for the past? Then, you are unworthy of her.
If her face be not a guarantee that you cannot doubt, you
are too base of spirit, too base indeed, for her happiness.
I make no professions. I say nothing of the past. Once,
I loved her. I love her yet;but we can never be
married
.
And it will be your fault, if she ever know that I
love her. Her happiness is dear to me. I have made
some inquiry about you; and I believe that you are better
fitted for her, than any other, whom I know. Dare you
come? nothing else can save her. The conspirators
are at the work of death.
ED: MOLTON.
I fear that you are a gambler. If you areSir
beware
.
Do not approach me. I would rather
encounter
a murderer. I would rather put an angel into the
arms of one, reeking with the blood of his own father.
What is
he
, but the murderer of soul and bodywife and
childrenfather and motherpeople and kindred?
MOLTON TO ASHTON.
Rev. Mr. C. AshtonLondon
.
For the work which you have sent me, sir, please
to accept my sincere thanks. I have not yet been able
to
study
it, as I could wish;but I have
read
it, with
some diligence; and, when I have a little more leisure,
which I hope to have, after a few weeks, I shall make it
a point, to go over the whole again, carefully and
deliberately
.
I did not flatter myself that I was remembered by the
author; or even by yourself; for, though my acquaintance
with you, was short and accidental, that which I had
with him, was still more so. But it would be in vain to
deny, that I feel myself flattered, by your remembrance,
and notice. Perhaps, indeed, my pleasure is not a little
enhanced, by the recollection of what would otherwise,
have been a subject of pain; the extremely short and
unfrequent
opportunities that we had, of becoming
acquainted
.
They left me no right to hope for your remembrance;
and therefore, I believe, that it is the more flattering.
You were one of the very few men, whom I saw abroad,
that seemed to entertain an enlarged, and understanding
sense of the American character. You, I have heard
defend it, in a manner that brought tears into my eyes.
I was an American. You did not know it. I was young;
unknown; and, whether from constitutional coldness,
and reserve in me, hindering or rebuking all advances;
a deportment too dark and unbending; or a countenance
too haughty and repulsive, to each of which, I have
heard the consequence attributed;
I had no friend;
none, certainly, among men of my own age. There
were a few, a very few of the wise and experienced, who,
at times, condescended to make use of me;nay, there
were two or three, and God will reward them for it,
older, and better, and greater, than the mass of mankind,
who loved and respected me;made me their companion
and their friend. Mr. Ashton, I have a proud heart.
I would sooner die, than be the cause of humiliation, to
one human being, that truly loved me. And, therefore,
though they
were
my friends, the world knew it not.
There were but few, whom I ever permitted to see us
together. I never spoke of them. I never boasted of
their affection or reverence;no, for it would have been
discreditable to
them
. The world had its prejudices.
For myself, I scorned them. I knew that the time
must
come, when those prejudices would be forgotten. But I
was unwilling to associate another, with me, in the
mortal
R 2
desolation that encompassed me, till then. On this
account, when a stranger gave me his hand, it was
received
with a swelling of the heart; a choking, that
none but men who have my feeling, and have been as
cruelly misunderstood, can have an idea of.
He
, I knew,
could have no light motive for the movement.
He
could
not be reaching after popularity, or influence.
He
could
not be seeking for an
acquaintance
, merely; for there was
that, I trust, in my face, little encouraging to such men.
I could not flatter. I would not. If a man were good,
I could think well of him. If he were religious, I could
respect him. But he must be
more
than either; more
than both: more than a good and religious man, too;
for me to remember his face till the next day.
You did this. You dared to single me out. I knew
the risk that you run. The most charitable thought
that you were mistaken and infatuated; many wondered
at you; and some scrupled not to think you a
bad
man,
because you associated with me. What had I done?
nothingnothing. They were my enemies; and they
knew not why. They have since become my friends; and
on just as good a foundation. They then thought too
humbly of me. Now, they have gone to the other
extreme
.
They think too well of me. I look for a change
of tide. I expect it;it will not ebb quite as far as it
did before:but if it did, it would not move me. I wish
that I had met you again, after our last conversation.
I intended it, but my sudden departure, which I take it
for granted, you have not heard of, or do not so cruelly
condemn me for, as others door you would not have
written to me, prevented me from fulfilling my
appointment
.
It was a painful thing to me, to disappoint you;
it always is, to me, to break an engagement;but I
felt an uncommon solicitude for your good opinion.
Old as you were, Mr. Ashton, surrounded as you
were by men, mighty in the ways of philosophy, I should
have embraced you on the spot, when you uttered your
testimony in behalf of my country, had I not been
restrained
by respect for you. I was an American;
nameless thenbut I should not be long soI was sure
of thatevents were then maturing, which, I had reason
to believe, would, in their mystery and blackness, soon
blast my reputation. Would I involve you in my fate?
No. And therefore, it was that I refused your
invitations
and avoided you, so frequently as I did. I had no
other way. I am naturally ingenuous; but, had I
avowed
the simple truth, you would have pursued me, in spite
of my wishes, and partaken, assuredly in my dishonour.
Thank God, however, that you have not forgotten me.
Thank God!and I do thank him, my dear sir, in the
sincerity of my whole heart and soul, that you have had
the courage to remember me, and appeal to me, for the
truth of that story. You shall know the truth. There
is only one other man on earth that knows it. And I
inform
you
, sir, as I would my father. Make what use
of it you please. But observeI do not tell you the
whole truth; I am only at liberty to tell that which
concerns
myself.
Helenwhose family you must know something of,
and I, once met, under circumstances of a very trying
nature. She loved me. She was lovelyintelligent
and, as I thought, her own mistress. We met frequently.
She
did
runaway from her guardian;and she
did
conceal
herself for several days;but, contrary to the general
belief, I do declare to you that I never saw her, until about
two hours before I restored her to her home. Yesit
was I, that restored her. I was amazed at her rashness;
and, it was not till I heard the whole story of her
suffering
that I could persuade myself to believe, that one so
young and beautiful, so passionately beautiful, could
have so forgotten her station, for an adventurer;for
what was I, but an adventurer? True, I was not base
enough, nor wicked enough, to seek her destruction; but,
when she was within my power;nay, I will not boast
of itothers would have done the sameI
spared her
.
I represented to her the consequences of her actto her
friendsher familyherself. She trembled and wept.
She even told me how long she had been absent and
where. I was thunderstruck. I feared that it would be
a death blow to her fameand I said so. Her reply was
a delirious laugh;and the next moment, I was alarmed
by a noise at the door. I am pursued, said sheit
is he!
It is he!
I took down my sword. I planted
myself
at the door. I would have slain the first man that
entered, at such a moment, had it been mine own father.
We were mistaken. It was not the scoundrel, at whose
name, the poor creature shivered like a maniac, before
her keeper. But it was one that had pursued her to my
room. She smiled bitterly, when she knew the truth,
very bitterly; and I do believe, rejoiced at the
consummation
of
their
guilt, not of hers.
We immediately departedI took a carriage; and, on
the route, brought her to some sense of her desperate
rashness. I was poormiserably poorhelpless, and
beset. What should I do with a wife? She interrupted
me, by producing a quantity of jewels, that, with my
little
acquaintance in such matters, appeared of great price.
My amazement increased. What was I to think of her?
Was her brain turned? Was she a spoiled girl, sick with
novel reading? She was very young, only 17; had just
been presented;was exceedingly sought after, even in
her retirement, out of which she had emerged, at the
instance
of some quality lady, who was a distant relation.
We had met but now and then;and my deportment had
been, merely that of earnestness and frankness. On
other themes, too, she exhibited a sober and well
disciplined
mind. What was I to think? It could not be
love for me. I demanded the truth. She told me.
Gracious God,my very blood leaped in my veins. She
showed me the evidences of a barbarity so horrible, that
I could have gone out against an army to avenge it. All
these things were to compel her to marry, either her
guardian
,
or his son; for I have reason to believe that they
had embezzled the chief part of her estate; and were
willing
to avoid their accountability in that way. But
enough. She consented, at last, to return. But only
on this conditions; for the performance of which. I pledged
myselfpromising, if it were violated, to assist her, in
any way that she pleased against them. The
condition
was that they should forbear; and leave her
entirely
to herself. I wrote a letterwhich was returned to
me unopened. I am not a man to forget such things. But
I can
forgive
them.
I did forgive this. But I had soon reason to repent of
my forbearance. I was publiclky insulted. I bore it
why?because appearances were against me. I was
called a seducer,by whom?by Clinton Howard,
the brother of Helen.He would never have left my
presence
,
had I not discovered
that
fact. I had already
prepared myself. Another wordandbut no. I
could
have done it.
After this I met with you. I loved you at first sight.
By this, I mean, not that I thought of you then, as I do
now, or, as I hope to, hereafterbut, merely, that I felt
drawn to you, with affection and respect.
The very next day, after we last met, I was passing
the square near where my chambers werewhen I heard
some one calling out my name, behind me.I turned
A hackney coach was approaching at great speed;as
it came near, the blinds were let down and I saw Helen.
Her hair was dishevelledand I suspected some violence.
I was mistaken. The coachman drew up, and I
entered
.
She was alone, splehdidly, beautiful, attiredwith
her dress stained here and thereand stiffened with what
I discovered to be bloodher own blood! My horrour
and rage were ungovernable. She had just escaped from
the ruffians;and I, with the little money that I then had
about me, abandoned my lodgings.I have never set my
foot within them, since.I was indifferent about
pursuit
;
but she, poor Helen,
she
was distracted, and
overcome
,
by her distress and fear. With a feeling of
respect
for her desolation, I went immediately, took a
license
,
an irregular one, I admit, but I did not then know
itand, (it was all that I could get without going to
Scotland;) and, in an hour from the time when I first met
her, I had a title, the truest and holiest title, that the
protector of woman can have.
I was her husband
.
Yet, I cannot deny that there are times when we are
both of us troubled in a manner, that I should deem
unaccountable
,
were it not for the nature of our marriage.
I cannot help feeling, that, while there is
any
doubt
about the legality of it, our endearment is, I know not
hardly how to express myself, is not, what I would have
it, altogether incapable of misrepresentation;and to
her, it is infinitely more trying. But, in my own
justification
,
however, I ought to apprise you, that I did not
know of any informality in the marriage, until about
eight months ago. I was deceived. Helen was under
a strange mistake. After our first adventure, she had
employed counselwhy, I never troubled myself to ask,
who told her that, a license taken out in a dissenting
Chapel, without a publication of the banns, would be
complete authority. Alas, for our errourwe were
both cheated by it;and, remain now, only man and
wife in the eyes of Godnot even in our own eyes
assuredly
not in
hers
, with a feeling of absolute guiltiness
now and then, to disquiet us, till we have an opportunity
of re-marrying. I care little for ceremonybut I care
much for the legitimacy of my children. And she, poor
heart, would be crazed, but for our temporary separation
which we immediately agreed to, when I discovered the
irregularity:The change of her nameand the artifice
(which I was brought to adoptI hardly know how) of
passing her off for my sister.But I will not endure it
much longer. The heat of the pursuit is nearly over,
now;and I hope soon to obtain her consent to another
marriage,
by her true name, in publick
. She is very averse
to it, nowbut that I attribute to her recent alarm.
But the catastrophe. After our marriage, we departed.
We were pursued. I found that Helen had large sums
of money in her possession. They were bank notes,
and as it was my intention to leave all my affairs and
embark for the continent of America, I spared no expense,
therefore, after exchanging the notes.We arrived at
the coast, and there, were intercepted. The scoundrel
who had abused her, was at our heels. He dared to claim,
my wife. Nay, he put his ruffian hand upon her, in
wrath.What did I?I drove my dirk up to the hilt,
in his side. I left him, weltering in his blood. And
now, we are in America.
EDWARD MOLTON.
FRANK OMAR TO EDWARD MOLTON.
Who are you, sir? Whence are you, that you dare to
address a letter to me?and such a letter! Mr. Edward
Molton, I know you. You are a scoundrel. I shall sail
to-day. But, were not my baggage on board, at this
moment
,
I would measure blades with you, before I slept.
Be not too secure. I know more of you, than you
suspect
.
Where did you first encounter William? Are you
sure that he had fair play?sure?
I have done with you. But, mark me! We shall meet
again. And thenI do not threaten youbut your
insulting
proposition will not be forgotten. What! would
you have me believe, that you could dispose of
her
, too.
Accursed scoundrelthe thought is madness. I prefer
thinking you a liarthan classing her with Marion, M.
P.What! does that name startle you? Molton!
Molton
!
if the hand of the Almighty spare you, till my return,
I will do my best to offer you up in sacrifice to the
broken
heart of that mother; and the untimely, blasted fruit
of your villany. NoI will not obey you! The story
of your power is a
lie
or shethe blessed martyrshe
is another
Marion
.
F. OMAR.
Answer to the foregoing, enclosed in one from Jane to John
.
FoolThe consequences be upon your own head.
E. MOLTON.
To Francis Omar, Charleston, S. C.
To be forwarded wherever he may be
.
JANE TO JOHNENCLOSING THE ABOVE.
O, Mr. Omar, tell your brother to beware. I know
not what he has donewhat saidbut I saw Molton's
eyes, when he gave our servant the letter;
and I know
him
.
If your brother be not gonemake him go immediately.
Don't let him come here. Don't let Molton meet him
there. There is no help for him, if they encounter.
What has he done?not insulted
him?
that he could
bear. What has he imagined?nought of dishonour to
him?
for that he would smile at. There is only one
thing that I can supposeand, if it be thatO, God!
there is nothing on this earth can save him. Perhaps he
has slandered that womanthat Helen!Is it so?
JANE.
SARAH RAMSAY TO FRANK OMAR.
I know the contents of the letterno matter how.
Enough for our purpose, that I know them; and
foreseeing
the consequences, have written as I have.
Be not rash, my friend. There is more meaning in
Molton's offer than you have been aware of. You have
fallen into the pit that he dug for you. You have forever
abandonedwhat you ought to have clung to, as your
life and bloodJuliet. Nay, have you not dishonoured
her in your thought? What is the conspiracy that he
alludes
to? There is meaning in it. Who are the plotters?
Be not precipitate. But, as you value meas you value
JulietO, avoid Molton. Your replyI know not what
it wasbut it has parched his heart up. He has devoted
you. Be a hero, for onceO, do! my beloved cousin,
and avoid the murderer. What have you to fear? He
is a coward. I have said so from the beginning,have
I not? But a coward may assassinate, or poison. Yet,
if you do meetwhich righteous heaven avertbefore
you join battle, throw
my
defiance in his teeth. Woman
as I am, I contemn and dare him, to his utmost. Once
I did this before Jane. Why? Because I saw her turn
pale. I never shall forget her looks. We were not friends,
then. Much as I hate thee, Sarah, said she to me, I
would not have Molton hear
that
, for the wide world.
It would be thy destruction. He never was braved with
impunity. Nay, womanthy eyes may flash, and thy
lip curl;---but I have seen a mightier than thoua
haughtier one, tooat his feet, in tears, for having said
less of him. I remember her words. I remember her
looks. They awed and intimidated me. There was a
mystery and a terrour in them. But I forget them, now
I forget every thing. Thy safety only do I consult.
I have a secret champion ready for him. I know not who
he is;but there is his gauntlet(a packet was
enclosed
)and
I will vouch for him. Give
that
to Molton, if
you ever meet. I am assured of the power;it is a
charm, a spell, a talisman, before which, his arm will
fall lifeless. I know not what it isI do not even
imagine
.
But carry it forever about you;let nothing tempt
you to lay it aside;for he may fall upon you in the
darkness and solitudehe
may
(of that I am assured.)
In my next to John, I will enclose one of several notes,
that I have received, lately, fromI know not whom.
I have never answered them. I knew not who it is, or
what; but no guardian angel ever did his ministering
more diligently. I have Molton's whole life before me.
know every spring of his heart;and, terrible as he is,
I almost pant to encounter him, that I may open the
mysterious packet, and confound him, forever, and at
once.
Am I not strangely altered? I know not what
possesses
me. What should I have thought, six months ago,
had any one said, that I should live to receive anonymous
letterstreasure them as I do thesedoat on themand
evenmy hand trembles, and I blush to the ends of my
fingers, at the thoughteven begin to meditate a reply.
Yes, there are some things that I must ask. I willif
it be only to detect all the villany of Molton. Ha!
would any other theme have so excited me, so impelled
me, headlong, as this has? Cousin, I cannot pray. It
distresses
me. Gradually, have I left off the habit;yet, O!
it had become coldcold and sad, long before I dared
to omit it. There was a time; but ah, that time has
passed
when
S
I could not sleep, if I had omitted my prayers.
But nowalas, I cannot sleep, do what I will; and I
dare notcannot pray.
Farewell
SARAH.
Boston
P. S.In my next, I will enclose one of my
correspondent's
notesJohn will tell you more about him;
and I have no objection that you should contrive to let
Molton get possession of it. I should like to see him,
then
.
JULIET TO MADAM VERNON.
Ah, my mother! I
must
unburden my heart to you.
I cannot,
cannot
live any longer, without sympathy.
Pity me, dear madam, pity me. I am worthy of all
your commiseration. Yet why should I repine? Are not
these trials, painful and distressing as they are, to be
borne with a submissive spirit? O yes, I feel that they
are;but thennoI cannot tell you more than this
that I am wretched. I do not complain that I am
spared a little longer; ah no, but I do think that death
would be less terrible to me now, than I have thought it.
I do pray for that consolation, which He only can give to
a wounded and broken spirit. Can I not come to you?
I know your poverty;it distresses me to hint such a
desire
,
because I know that it will almost kill you to refuse
me. Butindeed, you know not how I am beset.
There is an amiable man continually about me of late.
I know not what to think of him; for his countenance is
good, and his deportment mild and winning. But what is
he here, for? I cannot but see that there is some motive.
I hope that I am not vain; but, really, dear aunt, I do so
wish to be released from his attentions: they are too
painful
to me. The shock that I have had,the
consumption
I
meanit has made me too cruelly sensitive; and
shattered my whole constitution. Sometimes too, this
man, (Mr. Grenville is his name) sits by me, for whole
hours, in that breathless, intenseah, what am I
saying
,no,
I will not think of the resemblance. I will
arouse myself. O my motherI can speak to thee;
and, to whom else can I speak? He, whom thou,
thyself
,
didst appoint to me;even he, is a villain. He
thinks that I love him. He is mistaken. He is base.
I cannot love himfor how
can
we love, what we cannot
respect? No, no; and yet, at the mention of his name
the sound of approbation, where he is concerned, O,
I shiver and burn all over. I am poor
helpless
destitute.
Is there any succour for me? A heart
so soreso desolate? I know not aunt; but a thought
it was a terrible onea thought came to me once, in my
desperation; and I have not shuddered at its return;
yet, every nerve of my body shook, as with electricity,
at first. I know not what I should doI am very
wretchedvery. Were it not wicked, I should pray
never to arise from that bed
that
, to which I am now
going.
JULIET R. GRACIE.
JANE TO MATILDA.
Grenville is a blockhead. I have no patience with him.
There he sits, moping all night long, by the side of Juliet,
without opening his mouth; and only, now and then,
catching his breath, as the tune changes. What a pity
that so handsome a fellow should be such a fool. We
must manage our cards well, or he will never get her;
for she is prodigiously improved. Nay, auntit gives
me the headach, sometimes, to think on what we have
prepared for her. She looks so lovely;so beautiful,
so innocent; and then, her voice! I have heard it
compared
to a bugle, over the waterbut a bugle, a silver
bugle, is not so clear and sweet. It is more like a bell
ringing in the sky. Ah, my dear aunt, if that stupid
fellow would'nt sit by her, so; and look so sad and sorry
just as if he had eaten too heartily of cold apple
dumpling
she
might be a most enviable womanspend
all
her life between tract societies, and prayer meetings, and
love feaststhe happiest creature!ah, who can help
gaping?To suckle fools and chronicle small beer
kill spiders, darn rags, and whip childrenO, there's
nothing so pleasant. Nothing half so sweet in life
and then, if she should happen to lose one of her babes
why, it is only giving her new bonnet to quiet her. I
have known it succeed, more than once, with bereaved
mothers! You see that I am in excellent spirits. You
think so, do you? Aunt, I could sit down and cry, with
a good stomachthis moment. I don't believe that I
shall live long. I have been reading a system of
domestick
medicine;don't laugh at meand, at every page I
found myself afflicted with some new disorder. Well,
wellcome on, come on, directly, as you have promised;
make Grenville hold up his head, and look like a man;
and thenaunt,my dear aunt, I have a fearful secret
to communicate to you. Do you not feel cold about the
heart! I dobut it is
done
. No eye to witness it
none. It was tremendously dark. It thunderedand
it was done
. And such was the ferocious exaltation
of my spirit at the time, that I could have done the same
deed, though the day of judgment had been at hand. O,
aunt! I feel horribly about the forehead,very hot and
scorchingand my skin peals off, lately, with the fever
of my spirit.
IndeedI thought the earth did quakeandand
yes aunt, I did see, as plainly as I ever saw any thing in
this life, the broad paved-aisle, and the altar, that you
know I dreamt of;they opened in the darknessand
I saw smoke issuing from them; I heard musick; and then
I saw my mother too, as plainly as I see this hand
sitting
there, and looking at the poor little creature.
Yet I did it. Yeaand I should have done it, upon the
very altarthough it shook, at the time, with the
divinity
.Have
you any notion of the truth? Noyou have
notyou cannot have. What? that the haughty Jane
your pride, your idolthat she should come to
O, no, it were easier to believe her a murderess.Aunt,
come, come! to me. Some incurable malady is upon me, I
know not what it is;but, if you disappoint me again, I
shall die. I am sure of it. Why did you not come
before
?
You might have savedNo, I cannot tell you
what.But come;in mercy, come. What have I
written? I know not; my brain is in a whirl---and I am
trying to read itbut I cannot. I begin to pity poor
Juliet
.--But
if I have told anything---you must not believe
it---I am in such spirits!---O, aunt, it is the pleasantest
thing in the world to feel so full of festivityno, no,
it is a lieit is
not
it is frightful. What is the matter
with me? Perhaps you can tell by the writing.Is it
not strangely disordered?
JANE.
P. S.That SarahI can scarcely speak, for joy
her threatening has come to
his
ears. Wo to her!
I shall be revenged.
ANSWER.
Why did I disappoint you?oh, Jane! Jane!what
have you done! I was sick with horrour and affright.
What have you done!That terrible letter. It
threw me into convulsions. I am but just alive.Yet
the carriage is already at the door.I will never,
never
,
leave you again. This will be delivered into your hands,
by William. I have ordered him to ride, night and day;
and tell you that you shall not be disappointed, again.
NoI will sooner come to you, a corpse.
MATILDA.
SARAH TO JOHN.
Boston
.
I promised to write to you and Juliet again, soon, and
enclose one of the
anonymous
letters. I would write in
detail, and inform you how I am pleased with this
hospitable
,
warm hearted people; but, I am yet a stranger;
S 2
constantly occupied by visiting; a ceremony, conducted in
a fashionable way, that is exceedingly tiresome to me.
When I have more knowledge, and more leisure too, I
shall write to our beloved Juliet; and tell her all that I
know, or can find out, concerning the good yankees, the
sellers of wooden nutmegs;gloves, all of one hand;
cuckoo-clocks, and Hingham-ware. So far as I have
seen them, I like them. The country looks old, rich,
and substantial; and the manners, I should think, were
remarkably primitive. I speak of the country people.
The buildings, publick and private, are adapted,
admirably
well;
first
, for comfort and utility; and
then
, for
show. With us, and further to the south, there seems to
be a different tendency. But, perhaps I am prejudiced;
for you know, that, where we have been generously
treated
,
it is difficult to see faults.
It is in vain, that we would coldly turn,
To them that smile on us.
Byron, I believe;but I have no knack at such things;
and what possessed me to quote poetry, I know not; and
to quote
him
, of all men breathing; him, whom I so
heartily
execrate and despise. I don't know when I have been
in such spirits. Your note, announcing that Frank had
gone to New Orleans, has made my heart light; but the
first had miscarriedI have not received it yet; let him
wear the talisman, nevertheless; the tiger may cross his
path, when he least expects it. But why not say more?
You are on your return, I suppose.Shall you renew
your intimacy with Molton? I hope not. But if you do,
hunt him out of his labyrinth. Read the within, and
tell me what you think of it. It is the fifth, that I have
received. I already tremble; and, above all, I would
have you ascertain if Molton be
married
.
(ANONYMOUS, TO SARAH.)
The life of Edward Molton has been an uninterrupted
tissue of acts like the following. I make no apology for
communicating them, after what I know of him, and, of
Miss Gracie. Be it your business to communicate to
her, so much of the whole, as will counteract the poison,
that he has infused. Do not mistrust me. I say nothing
of Molton's talent. I only say that there is but one
way of restoring that heart to soundness, upon which he
has once breathed. Beware of him. He is charged
with many terrible crimes;with seduction;
adultery
;murder.
For the truth of these charges, I do
not vouch; but there are
facts
, to the knowledge of which
I have arrived, which I submit to you, in the following
order, without comment. Confront him with them. Will
he deny them? Nobut perhaps he will obtain your ear.
If he doI know himhe will prevail. You ask me, if
I know Miss Gracie?
Believe me, you were very
imprudent
,
in permitting yourself to ask me any such
question, particularly in black and white. It is perilous;
and although such confidence is precious to meyet,
on
your
account, I intreat you not to
write
to me again.
What you have written, is sacred. It was rash, I
confess
,
very rash in you, even to
receive
my notes. But, I
do not mistake you. I know your motive; and I trust
that my deportment has been such, as to convince you of
my discretion. The only thing that I blame in you, is,
your having acknowledged that you have received and
read
my notes. You ought not to let me know this---I am
the last man that should know it. But, it is done now, and
cannot be helped; so, let me reply to your question. Yes---
I did know Juliet Gracie. Nay, more---
I loved her
. But
that is passed. Still, however, I would preserve her;
watch over her, and restore her,---wasted and weary as
she is, to happiness and health.
Edward Molton, at an early age, manifested the most
depraved inclinations. Before twelve, he was a
confirmed
liar; drank to excess; and stole whatever he could
lay his hands on. He lived in solitude. He was the
chief pest of his family, and the bye-word of the town.
Among the transgressions of his youth, I can recollect
several, such as the following. He has deliberately
insulted
a lady, at a large dinner table, in two instances,
with an abrupt and brutal cruelty, that can only be
palliated
by supposing him ignorant of the commonest
courtesies
of life. Nay, he has presented a book, to one of
the most accomplished and fascinating women, in our
country, after violating the decorum of a family, by
lending it to a youthful and superiour girl, who
returned
it, with this cutting remark. I have
read
it, on
your
recommendation.---But, do not (as he had promised)
do not lend it to your sister. I have no fear that it would
corrupt her, but. She could say no more. And
the former lady returned it, almost in tears.
After a rude and shameful outrage too, upon a young
girl, a sort of apprentice where he once lived, in which
the consummation of his design was only prevented by
his inebriety, and the interference of the lady, to whose
government the girl was subject, he was a second time
so forgetful of all that gives dignity to a man, that it was
only by main force, that she escaped from his room,
into
which she had been beguiled.
Not long since, in this very neighbourhood, he fell
acquainted
with a reputable married woman, a mother,
travelling with her child; and ere he parted from her,
which was at the end of a few hours ride, he made an
assignation with her, to meet her at the house, where
she stayed, and agreed to pass himself off for her brother.
On another occasion, he entered, with a worthy and
respectable man, without any introduction, into a house
where the people of the place, (it was in the country,)
were dancing. He soon singled out a young and
interesting
girl. Her lover was with her. She affronted
Molton, and he determined to be revenged. He pursued
her to her father's; and while the man, that was with
him, sat down with a small company at cards, he
employed
himself in the work of ruin. Not a quarter of an hour
had passed, before Molton was surprised by the father
himself, in an unoccupied room, with his daughter.
He met with a woman, whom he had once loved, after
her marriage with another, at noonday, by a formal
assignation; and the story is, that they were both
inconceivably
distressed. Nay, he once visited the wife of
another man, in the absence of her husband; and who,
he had every reason to believe, loved him, at night; and
she was known to arise from her bed, and receive him.
He fell in love, or at least, felt a singular interest in
another girl, who was afterward married; and such
was the infatuation of
that
woman, that she used to pass
by his dwelling, continually, after her marriage, in the
absence of her husband.
He was criminally intimate with a woman, whom he
introduced, in his audacity, at the peril of his life, not
only into genteel and intelligent society, but into the
house of his own mother;or, rather, he attempted this,
but heaven interfered, and disappointed him.
Nay, I do know of his having successively pursued
several
women, for a long season, in one case, for whole
years, without any serious design. But, there was one
who had the spirit to requite him. She discovered the
blackness of his heart;and tore her's away from it,
forever
.
Was it not noble?heroick? They were to have
been married.
And who is she, with whom he now lives, in open
defiance
of public shame and honour? Perhaps
her
history
may be none of the whitest, in the calendar of darkness.
She is from England.
One other, and I have done. That other is a case of
singular atrocity. An innocent creature put herself in
his way, in tears. Her sister had been betrayed.
Molton
counselled her against the falsehood and subtlety of
man; and, when he had won her whole confidence, would,
perhaps, have destroyed her, himself;but she fled, and
is safe.
There is yet another. It is
said
, that he ran away, some
time ago, with a sweet girl, from a nunnery, in Canada;
was pursued, and shot, by the brother, on the way to
New-York, where he fled, like a dastard. This tale is
believed
.
And, since writing the above, two other cases have
come to my recollection, which may avail something in
your estimate of the man's character. He has been the
cause of much jealousy between several married people;
and, on one occasion, I know of his having secretly
corresponded
,
for some time, with a woman;an evidence
of infatuation in
her
, surpassing aught that I have ever
known: for she was a religious woman; the mother of
several children; and she knew his character. Yet, she
trusted herself to him.
The last is a case, where he had insinuated himself
into
a house,
how
, it would be difficult to tell; for his
manners
are
not
conciliatingand suddenly ceased to go to
it. Nay, I have reason to believe, that he was formally
requested not to enter it, again. What could have been
the reason?
You will, probably, never hear from me, again. I have
communicated all. That there are suspicious stories,
different
,
and quite as shocking, of which the world has no
mode of arriving at the truth, is true. But, I believe,
that these are nearly
all
of his sins;nay, I might say,
positively, that they were
all
, except some of a less
serious
nature, the recital of which I shall spare you.
Does he plead passion? No. He derides the plea.
He has sinned, and continues to sin, in his own way,
without consulting aught but his own heart; and what
that monitor is, after such an uninterrupted violation of
order and decorum, as I have exhibited to you, you may
judge for yourself.
And nowone word of advice to
you
. You are very
imprudent. The evidence that you have given to
me
, is
conclusive. My last advice isBeware of Molton;and
watch over Juliet. Only one thing can save her
uninterrupted
employment. She has an extraordinary
genius;but she is undisciplined, and unable, except at
intervals, to sustain and cherish it, as it deserves. Let
her know that it is better to toil,
regularly
, one hour a
day, than to work one whole day, in a week; or one whole
month, in a year. It becomes a
habit
, at last;and she
may gradually extend the time, until what would have
intimidated her, at first, will become a matter, scarcely
of observation, in her habitual practice.
SARAH RAMSAY.
SARAH TO JOHN.
I write to you, again. I am terrified to death. I had
entirely forgotten the deaf-and-dumb man. Yet
something
happened, a day or two since, which I was
ashamed
to confess. The thought appeared so childish. I was
standing at a counterI felt uneasyI turned, and there
he wasO, I should know his strange, melancholy eyes,
wherever I met them. I was near fainting. When I
recovered, he had gone. What a strange phantom it is,
said I;and, from that day to this, I have started at the
tread, or voice, of every stranger that I have met. I
rarely go abroad; and, when I do, I see his mannerhis
countenancehis very eyes, it would appear, at every
turn. The consequence is, that I am sickweary. I must
leave BostonI will. It is frightful, to me, to be so
harassed. I feel like something haunted.
But, as I was sayingI had recoveredI thought no
more of him. But, just nowcousin, it is not ten
minutes
since he left me. I feel his touch yet. Would that
he had spoken! O, with such eyes, such a foreheadif
he would only speak, I am sure that. No matter.
He is not striking. I thought him remarkably so, at first.
His physiognomy has nothing remarkable; but the
expression
that
it is, which startled me. It is imperial.
The profile is badfeeble, I think;but, in frontNo!
how should I think of describing it? I only know, that
he has, probably, saved my life; for, in crossing one of
these vile slippery streets, here, I fell; and, at that
instant
,
a carriage came thundering round the corner. The
wheel touched meI felt itI almost felt the weight,
crushing my bones. I was saved. The deaf-and-dumb
creature saved me. He threw himself, they say, at the
head of the horses, and turned them up the platform, so
critically, that the fore-wheel passed over my foot,
tearing
and bruising it very slightly. Ah! I just begin to
feel the pain. But where is he? I remember opening
my eyes, while my father held me; and
his
countenance
was near to
mine
with a strange expression;it made
me shut them again. He disappeared. Nobody knows
how;and my father, I find, looks quite serious. Nay, I
miss somewhat of his affectionate manner, now, more
than ever. But enough of this. Give the enclosed to
Juliet.
SARAH RAMSAY.
SARAH TO JULIET.
You have often wished, dear Juliet, that my
imperturbable
nature
, as you have called it, might meet with
something
to agitate it. Your wish is accomplished. I
am
agitated, cruelly agitated; not with the passion of love,
that to which you seemed to look, with most assurance,
for the desired effect; but with a strange, inexplicable
inquietude
intensely
painful and distressing, at times;
and yet, so pleasant withal, that I would not entirely
forego it.
You will be startled when you know the fact. I have
been pursuedhauntedfor the last two months, by a
deaf-and-dumb man. Who he is, or what is his object, I
cannot conjecture; but he is, incessantly, about my path,
besetting me at every turn, and occupying my thought,
and all my dreaming. At times, I feel no little terrour
about him; and then, my compassion for one so helpless and
heroick, for there is really something heroick in his
manner
,
entirely overcomes my terrour,and I only wish,
while the tears fall from my eyes, that I were his sister,
or some friend, and authorized to administer that
consolation
,
which one so desolate and dark, must require.
He has just saved my life. (Here followed an account of
the transaction, exactly as it is related in the preceding
letter, as to the facts; but the comments were more
feeling
and animated.)
I promised to keep a sort of journal, you know;and
I was as good as my promise, until I had been so
disturbed
,
by the frequent recurrence of this poor creature
to my thought, that I abandoned it. The last part of it,
that is intelligible, even to me, I find, is that, which
describes
a visit to the battle-ground, near the Falls of
Niagara. I send it to you, just as it is. It was written
with a trembling hand, you perceive; but a still more
trembling heart, I can assure you.
May
14
th
.Went to the battle-ground, in company
with an officer, who was in the action, and under the
command of colonel Millar. There is no hill, such as I
expected to see, where the British artillery was posted;
and several material errours, that my father had fallen
into, from reading the account by Maj. , were
corrected. After the Americans had obtained possession
of the battery, they never lost it. The British, it is
true, made several desperate charges; but were always
unsuccessful. The notion that prevails, generally, is,
that it was lost and won, several times. But, let me tell
the whole, as nearly as I can, in the words of the officer.
He was young, handsome, and modest; and, while he led
us over the ground, he pointed out the particular spot,
where any transaction of interest had occurred;showed
us where
he
had stoodwhere Millar was, when he was
asked, if he could carry that battery? and replied, with
more soldier-like pith than any Spartan ever did
I'll
try
.
The order came, to storm the battery, said the
officer
.
I was in front of my company. I had never been
closely engaged before:a few skirmishes, only, had
been the whole of my experience. My feelings were not
the most creditable to a soldier. I could have turned,
and run, with a good heart, had not all the eyes of my
men been upon me. We pushed on, at double quick time.
I was near enough to see the faces of the men at their
guns. Just at that moment, I saw one of my lads
gradually
sinking to the ground, with a face so horribly pale
and ghastly, that I forgot my own terrour, instantly. I
struck him with my sword;it was like electricity. He
stood erect; and I gave immediate orders, in a loud voice,
to bayonet the first man that lagged. The sound of my
own voice gave me new heart. Colonel Millar, too, was
just in the rear, walking leisurely, backward and
forward
,
with an enormous quid of tobacco in his mouth,
which, all who saw
him
, could see. You would not easily
T
guess the effect of such a trivial matter. But I have
known
that
kind of unconcern, more effectual, in giving
life to the soldiers, than the sternest and steadiest
countenance
.
It turns the current of their thought
from
danger
.
A stern visage. on the contrary, teaches them that
there
is
something to be feared; else, why such
preparation
?
Nay, I once saw General Ripley, when the shot
was raining in upon us, address an officer, near me, thus:
A pinch of your snuff, if you please, lieutenant. Sir,
we could have stormedI beg your pardon, madam.
I forgot, then, that you were so near. Well, we reserved
our fire. The battery opened upon usbut they fired
over our heads. We were about four hundred, and they
were many times as numerous. We had been waiting,
impatiently, for the word. It came.
Fire!
We took
deliberate
aim, and poured in our balls, like hail, upon the
men at the pieces. Every shot told. We saw them
tumbling
about their guns, in dozens. When we carried the
battery, we turned it, immediately, upon them. We
continued
to be reinforced; and the enemy, we soon saw,
meditated an attack, in turn. Then was the time of trial.
All about
us
, there was a dead silence. We could hear
the heavy roll of Niagara, however; and, now and then,
a straggling shot, fired in the trepidation of some soldier.
The moon was bright and beautiful; and the black clouds
that were driven across it, by a strong wind, presented
every variety of shadow and light. At one time, in the
darkness, the enemy had approached so near, that we
thought him a part of our troops. It was about eleven
o'clock, at night.
There, dear Juliet, I have given it to you, nearly in
his own words.
Ever thine
,
SARAH.
P. S.I am not a little mortified, dear Juliet, to find
that, after all, I have been in no kind of danger! The
carriage, it now appears, was not near me. I have this,
from my father, who, I am afraid, has discovered the
stranger. I await his questioning. with anxiety. In your
reply, tell me how you are situated. How does Jane bear
herself toward you? Is that aunt of hers, there? If so,
I
do
pity you. Who is Mr. Grenville? What is he?---
I wait
your
opinion of him, for particular reasons, in
confidence
.
There are some strange reports here.
SARAH.
JOHN TO SARAH.
(Bearing nearly the same date, with one from her to him.
The letters had passed each other on the road.)
Sarah, my poor brother is an altered man, indeed. I
thought that he had more fortitudemore strength; or,
rather, I did not believe that, with such a soul as he has,
he could ever become so utterly prostrate, as I found him.
He was pale; and there was something, in that paleness,
that frightened me. So few weeks had passed, since we
saw him, so gay and hearty;and now, his lips were
parched; his eyes sunken and fiery; his form so
emaciated
.
I sat down by him. I took his hand; naywhy need
I conceal itI fell upon his bosom, and wept. There
was an unnatural gaiety in his voice, too, that went to
my heart. I asked him if he had received my letter in
season, (with a little money, which I had enclosed to
him.) He grasped my hand. His voice trembled. I
inquired
into his intentions. They were to go to New
Orleans
.
I was constantly with him, for the first week; and
there came a letter for him, directed to my care, from
Molton. What could it be? I thought that his heart would
burst, when he read it. Accursed slanderer! he cried,
tearing it, and trampling on it, like a madman. I asked
him the cause of his wrathhe tried to tell me, but he
could nothe was choking;and all that I could
understand
,
was, that he, Molton, had slandered Juliet. If
that
be true
that
it will be enough. I shall soon see
him, and I shan't leave him, till I know the truth.
Frank's baggage is, already, on board the vessel; or, I
really believe, that he would return to see Molton;but,
from the look of his eyes, I don't think that there will be
much danger of his wrath cooling in this voyage; and
his honour, I find, is engaged to undertake it. I am glad
of it. I had rather meet Molton, than let Frank meet
him;and, unless he play me some trick, which I am
half inclined to suspect, from certain mysterious
movements
this morning, I shall see Molton long before he
will. But, I must stay here awhile. I must see him
fairly
on board; and then, I will return. In the mean time,
let your letters be directed as usual. There is a fellow
at Jane's, who will take care of them, for me.
Poor Frank!there he is!leaning upon the table,
with his hands pressed hard against his temples. I must
finish. It will not do to leave him, alone, for an instant.
Dear Sarah, adieu
.
Charleston, S. C.
JOHN.
P. S.I open this to say, that I have discovered the
truth. Molton has
offered Juliet to him!
Frank is
delirious
with passion, in consequence. I know not what it
means; but I
will
know.
JOHN TO FRANK OMAR.
Philadelphia
,
It may lighten my brother's heart, to know, that the
story which he has heard of Molton's baseness, toward
Marion, M. P. is untrue; and that, to have felt a regard
for him, is not so terrible a reproach, to a modest
woman
,
as he has thought. I have made particular
inquiries
,
and have been so fortunate, as to find the very
gentleman, at last, who, it was said, came so near being
deceived by Molton. The facts, as related by him, are
these:Molton never loved her, and never affected to
love her: on the contrary, she, herself, has always
spoken
of him, as having conducted himself in the most
honourable manner. She was an ambitious, smart, showy
woman, and Molton
was
on intimate terms with her, for
years;but, while I knew that he had no intention of
marrying
her, said this gentleman, because he, more than
once, left off visiting her, on account of such a report,
informing
her
of the reason, at the timeI knew, also,
that their acquaintance was not only perfectly innocent,
but discreet. Nay, ask Molton himself. What he tells
you, you may depend upon. It is true, that I loved
Marion
devoutlyto
infatuation;and, it is also true, that
I became acquainted with her, through the means of
Molton
;
and that, after we separated, she was seriously ill,
and went, for a few days, into the country, accompanied
by Molton. Here, my knowledge of Marion and him
terminated. There never was a more cruel and
murderous
slander, than this, of which you speak; and, were it
not as ridiculous, as cruel, I should be tempted to hunt up
the author. I have heard it before;but I laughed at it.
There is not one word of truth, from beginning to end,
in the induction that has been so wickedly drawn, from
a few simple facts. The lady was imprudent, I have no
doubt; for all women are so, to a degree, when in love.
But she was innocent. I'll stake my life on that.
Molton
was always too high minded, with all his faults, to
deceive a friend, so basely. I was his friend; and he
spoke to me of her faults, and virtues, without disguise.
Nay, he told me all their acquaintance.
She
deceived
me. She told me that he had, repeatedly, offered himself
to her. I doubted this;and, when I told him, he denied
it in such a way, and with such evidence, as left me in
no kind of doubt. Nothe truth was, that she
liked
Molton
.
I do not believe that she
loved
him;and, I believe,
that she would have won him, if she could. I know that
she tried hard, Thus much for
his
story. From
another
quarter, I learn, that the rest of the slander is as
base a fabrication. Yet, the facts are nearly the same.
She did not die in childbed. She is living yet. But
T 2
her husband
was
, probably, induced to address her, in
consequence of what Molton said to him. Nor, is it true,
that there was any secret cause, for the interruption of
the acquaintance between Molton and the family. It was
a plain matter of fact. He is haughty, bitter, and
sarcastick
;
and, when once provoked, difficult to appease.
He affronted her, deliberately; and, as deliberately,
repented
of it. The first cause of their coolness was
accidental
;
but it soon became so serious, that the father was
obliged to interfere. Molton has since been sensible of
his unmanly and unworthy conduct; and, I am sure, if he
ever have an opportunity, he will make an atonement
proportioned to his transgression. Perhaps the birth of
the child may be premature. The story abroad is so, I
confess. But I would pledge my soul, for the innocence
of Molton;and he, I am sure, would put his against
the man, that would dare to insinuate aught against the
purity of his acquaintance with that woman. Nay,
brother
,
you may depend upon this; for Molton, himself, has
told me, in plain language, the whole extent of her
imprudence
with him. It amounted only to a few tears;
but, he declares, that he never even kissed her, in his life;
and I believe him. No, says he, she is an innocent
and wronged creature, so far as I know anything of her;
and I have been very intimate with her, and for a long
time. Farewell. I shall direct this to Messrs. Fairman
and Baits, of New-Orleans, with leave to forward it, if
you should have left there.
Juliet is well
. Sarah, I
imagine
,
is somewhat in love!with a deaf-and-dumb man,
too!but that is hardly to be wondered at, where one is
so able and willing to talk enough for
two:
it would be
no serious objection to her, that
he
could not
speak
nor
to
him
, that he could not
hear!
I shall tell
her
so, next.
Dear brother, yours
.
JOHN.
EDWARD MOLTON TO GEORGE STAFFORD.
No, Stafford, I never liked Byron. He wants natural
steadiness and grandeur. He is too full of affectation.
Nothing is unpremeditated, with him; nothing
permament
.
His ambition is affected; his melancholy affected;
and so are his love and his misanthrophy. If he really
suffered, he would not be so forward to tell of it.
Men seek concealment in their calamity, whenever that
calamity is accompanied with wounded self-love. Not
so with Byron. Whatever happens to him, is for the
publick. His family distressesthe holiness of his home
the sanctity of a loved one, whose heart is bruised and
sore, with his unkindness, in her retirement, are all
exhibited
as so many spectacles. His passions, and thoughts,
are nothing more to him, than a kind of ware, with which he
supplies the marketa theatrical company, which he lets
out to the mob, for tragedy or comedy, prose or verse.
To-day the public appetite is for the moody and
mysterious
.
Byron profits by it. He marshals a score of
heroes, all of the same family; and exhibits them, with
such an air of reality, and with so many of his own diseased
attributes, that the world are willing to believe that they
are drawn from life. Ridiculous. Two or three things
alone that I find in his poetry, are enough to convince me,
that Byron is, naturally, a pleasant, harmless,
inoffensive
sort of fellow, with no more gall nor bitterness of
heart, than many a man, who is never suspected of
having
any at all. A sort of notion seems to prevail, that he
is blood-thirsty. I do not believe it. Nor do I even
believe
that he is really a
brave
man. My reason is this;
and it is quite enough for me. He has published a note,
to his British Bards, and Scotch Reviewers, which no
brave man ever would have published. He speaks of
having waited for the vengeance of whosoever might see
fit to assail him, after he had published the first edition.
Can anything be pleasanter? What had he said so
perilous
,
to his personal safety? Nothing. But of whom
was it said?of a set of poetsthe most patient of
God's creatures, where powder and ball are concerned,
though the most sensitive and unappeasable, where the
paper bullets of the brain only, are to be encountered.
NoStafford. Byron is not a great man;by this, I
mean, that he has not that quality which makes bad men
great, at times,immobility. Every thing shakes him;
every thing disturbs him. That he is a great poet, I do
not deny. But while I admit that, in a part of his labour
he has never been excelled, yet I will maintain that no
man has written a greater proportion of abominable
trash.
The fashion will soon have gone by, as it was with
Walter Scott's poems, and will be with the novels that
are attributed to
him
, now. But this must not be known.
People forget the past, and regard the present, as an
exception
to the vicissitude of fashion. If I should say,
therefore, that the time is close at hand, when Byron's
poems, and the Scotch novels, will be found on the same
shelf with Scott's poems, covered with dust; a drug in
Booksellers shops; and a part, too sacred to be touched,
of the libraryI should be laughed at. Yet, it will be
so. The fashion is passing away. The measure and
manner of Byron, is worn out; and the novel writer is
exhausted. I can remember, when it was little else than
blasphemy to utter aught, against the poems of Walter
Scott;I can remember when they were found upon
every
table, every toilet; when they were cited on all
occasions
;
and his songs were to be heard, at every turn.
Then it would have been thought madness to predict,
what has since happened. Then, there was no such
poetry
,
as Walter Scott's poetry; no such poet as Walter
Scott. The Edinburgh Reviewers ranked him with
Homer!and Lord Byron swore that his rhymes should
live, when England was no more!How is it now? No
bookseller is willing to have them upon his shelves.
They are seen upon no tableno toilet;and nobody
pretends now, that Walter Scott was ever any thing more
than a pleasant, fiery sort of a rhymer; who, after
drawing
two or three strong characters, kept the same,
continually
before the publick, in different dresses, and
under
different names, until they, simple souls, without
suspecting the cause, grew tired of him, and his
company
,
and come to their senses. The true reason was, that,
in his new works, there was nothing new;nothing in
character, measure, image, and little in incident. Had
the name been unchanged, the whole might have passed
for one story. Bating a catastrophe, now and then, they
had more connexion than the cantos of Childe Harold; and,
finally it has come to this, that, of all his poems, that
which first made him popular, the Lady of the Lake, is
the only one that is ever spoken of now, with
complacency
.
Will this be the fate of the novels? Undoubtedly.
Though I do not believe, that Walter Scott
is
the author,
for they are full of strength and destitute of ornament;
yet I believe that they will share the fate of the poems,
and that Byron's labour will go with them. Nayis it
not so now? Has not his lordship discovered the fact;
and adopted another manner, entirely contradictory to
his old, in that Don Juan, which you have sent me?
By the way, I should have written to you, on the subject of
that poem, when I first received it, but I was constantly
travelling. Yet, I shall endeavour to say a word or two
here, before we part.
But are there not other reasons, separate from the
fickleness of publick opinion, which may lead to this
result
?
I think that there are. They have been much
too popular, and too suddenly and vehemently popular.
Such things, no matter what their merit is, cannot last.
Besides, after admitting the merit of the writer,
the
dramatick
distinctness of his characters;
for, after all,
that
is
his chief, if not his only merit, for there is nothing
remarkable
in his style;there are so many drawbacks,
so much trashso many chapters of tiresome pedantry---
horologylaw---heraldry---history---and stuff, relative
to individuals, that can be interesting only to those who
know the parties
, that I should not fear to utter the
prediction
,
solely on that ground. But a great and
conspicuous
fault is this; that all his leading characters are
the same. He seems to have no conception of mind,
distinct
from the body. With him, the same body has always
the same soul. Recall for a moment some of them, and
point out to me where the real difference is. It is
only
in a greater or less degree of
vulgarity
and that,
oftener
in the dress and situation, than in the language;
for his low-born often talk better than the high-born.
In every tale, there is a deformed man;with long arms
and prodigious personal strength:there is Dirk
Hatterick, Ashley OsbaldestonRob Roythe little
Black Dwarfand the great Black Dwarf, for example,
all with the devil in their hearts.And here I cannot
help making a remark that has long had weight with
me.However it may be with Walter Scott, who I am
told is lame, I was sure, the moment that I saw Byron,
(and I did not know that he was clubfooted, till then)
that
that
was the chief cause of his bitterness and
hostility
to men. The mind accustoms itself to regard the
body of a man, like his countenance, as in character
with his spirit. There is the crook backed tyrant of
Shakspeare, whom by the way, I suppose you know to have
been a marvellous proper man, and no more
crook-backed
than I am. Such men, like the diminutive and
weak, cannot be magnanimous. What would be
forbearance
in the strong and valiant, would be, in them,
but pusillanimity. They are viewed with an evil eye.
Women avoid themand fools, with better faces and
feet, get ahead of them. The consequence is, that they
become dark, unforgiving, and terrible;their hearts
secrete a continual poison;what is aliment to others,
the smile of beauty, the movement and grace of
fashionable
lifeis bitterness and death to them.Love and
women
are to them a perpetual taunt. They cannot be
loved
they know that;if they have any ambition, they
aim to be feared, as the next best thing, accessible to
them.
But I am wandering again. Let us return. There
is also a series of mad women, you know, running
through the whole set of these novelsMeg Merillies;
Madge Wildfire; Ulrica; Edith; Helen McGregor;
Norna
of the Fitful-Head; and one or two others, whom I
cannot
recollect. And, after deducting these two sets of
dwarfs and mad women, what have we like a character left;
nothing but what is common to many novels, if we
except
Claverhouse, which is only a sketch; Rebecca;
Minna
;
and Di Vernon; and the Waverly Heroine (who
are all one) and the Knight Templar.The others are
paltry. And I do say that we shall see the time, and
soon too, when few persons will have the patience to
read through some of them, which are now thought the
most ofas Waverly, for instance. Can any thing be
more tiresome than the first one or two hundred pages
of Waverlyexcepting some part of the latter? I can
remember when it first appeared. I read it with great
difficulty. It was the most irksome thing to me, that I
had ever met withsuch was the general sentiment, too.
But the Scotch Reviewers pronounced it a miracle; and
we, in our humility, echoed the edict. They, too, have
declared that Old Mortality and Waverly are the
best of the collection. We have been fools enough to
believe
them. And yet, Stafford, to an Englishman, or an
American, they are the most tiresome; and, for the very
reason that they are the most grateful to a Scottheir
extreme particularity and
locality
. No wonder that a
Scot finds entertainment in the barbarous gibberish of the
natives; but
must
we, in spite of our teeth, be pleased
too, with what is unintelligible to us? I hope not. No
the fact is that the best of these novels are those that
are not
national
Guy Mannering is the bestI vanhoe
the next. They are stories that men relish, who never
heard of Scotland, and never wish to hear of it. The
characters
are not
individuals
but species:the language is
not provincial, but universal. But the epidemick
for Scotch poetrycloaksribbandsnovels
criticism
scienceand
musick, is rapidly passing off.
We begin to be only rationally disquieted by it.
Butif I am to say anything of Don Juan, I must do
it soon; my paper is nearly out. My first notion is, that
it is merely a piece of pleasantry in Lord Byron; and that
the world have sadly mistaken him, in supposing that he
had any
design
, good or bad, in sending it abroad. That it
is profligate, I admit;but, is it more so, than
Shakspeare
?his
Romeo and Julietnayeven his Lear
or is it half so coarse and brutal as his Othello? Why
even now, after the pruning of a whole centurya
decent
woman can hardly sit it out, without blushing to the
very heart. Naythere is the whole school of
Beaumont
and
Fletcher
Madam
Centlivre
;and even
that most genteel piece of obscenity, that was ever
tolerated
upon any stage, the SCHOOL FOR SCANDALthe
greatest outrage upon decency that I know;and all the
novels of Smollet and Fieldingare they not
unspeakably
more coarse and shameful? They are. But do
not suppose that I mean to justify or plead for Byron.
No. But I mean to say that, while the blasphemy, and
detestable licentiousness of his poems are complained of
it would be more decent to complain of it, a little more
temperately; and after reading
a little
in Milton and
Shakspeare. Treat it as it issneer at it, as the
pastime
of a wicked, dissolute man, worth reading, on account
of its vivacity; but not to be
dreaded
, as it is, like death
and rottenness, to the human heart. There, your
reviewers
were foolish;but they have set the fashion, and
we have followed it. They have called it the
ne plus
ultra
of genius and wickedness; and we have repeated it.
The opinion is false. It is no such wonderful thing,
except for its eccentricity, as coming from the
misanthrope
.
You see with what facility it has been imitated.
There are parts in both of the works that I sent you, so
like the best part of Juan, that it would be difficult to
detect
the counterfeit. Nay, nothing is easier;and the
ridiculous doctrine of association, I take it, was first
gravely
followed in Byron's Childe Harold. There, he
was forever wandering. And it is my serious opinion,
that, having become sensible, that it was easy to make
that habit, and consequently, the writer, ridiculous, he
tried his hand at Beppo, by way of anticipating such
ridicule
.
M. G. Lewis did the same thing, you know,
with his Giles Jollop. Don Juan, therefore, is only a
parody upon Childe Harold, by the author himself.
And what is this association? That which keeps a man
continually turning. The author thinks of a horsethat
reminds him of Bucephalusthat, of a shadowthat, of
the moonthat, of lunaticksthat, of mad Leethat, of
poor Swiftthat, of racingthat, of the Olympian
gamesthat, of cardsboxingbull fightsElgin
marbles
gladiators---GreeceLibertythe
Turks
Emperor
Alexander, &c. &c. in short, of every thing, and
anything, but the subject in hand. And that is
association
!
I have now done. If you would have the venom of
Don Juan diluted,make less noise about it. That is a
sure way. At present, people are ambitious of trying
the strength of their constitutions.
Ever yoursDear Stafford
.
MOLTON.
JULIET TO SARAH.
Yes, my dear Sarah, it is time that I should forget
myself, for a while, and remember those that are now, as
I have been, away and apart from their home. I have
received all your letters, I dare say; for none are
missing
;
and, until your last, I had contented myself with
replying to them, at second hand, believing that I was
acquainted with
all
. I was mistaken, I see, now; and
though not disposed to take you very seriously to task
in the matter, yet, I do think it a part of my duty to treat
it somewhat so. I am afraid that you do not think
enough of this strange correspondence. No, I do not
express what I wish; but I mean to ask you, if it be not
rather more grave a matter, than you are willing to
acknowledge
,
even to your own heart. For my own part, I
will tell you, frankly, that, since Mr. John Omar's
return
,
we have had a long conversation about you;
and I made no scruple to keep the extent of my
knowledge
a secret, until I had arrived at the limit of his.
He is naturally unsuspicious; and, when he found how
completely I had tricked him, with all my
artlessness
, as
you have been pleased to call it, he really looked a little
U
angry, and coloured; nay, I do not know but he might
have said some spiteful thing, had not the gentleman,
about whom you are concerned, been present. However,
we were all good friends again, in ten minutes; and
continued
our chatting. He declares, without any
hesitation
,
that you are in
love
, at last; but then, no human
being can believe that he is serious; for he seems to have
taken up the very character of extravagance, levity, and
frolick, that his excellent brother threw off, so wisely,
just before he left us. Indeed, I have been frequently
struck at these changes. Unlike as they
appear
to be, from
all that I am able to discover, and every observation adds
new strength to my opinion, they are
really
so very much
alike, as to be able to change characters, completely.
Thus much, and in this grave way too, to prepare you
for what is to follow. But do not be terrified. I do not
mean to carry these airs much further. I was never
made for a preceptressand, I find it not a little
awkward
to give advice;so, what I do give now, must be
charitably taken; or, I have done playing Minerva.
I have thought over your whole acquaintance, with the
stranger, so far as it has been communicated to me; and
the result is, that I hardly know what to say. I cannot
say that
you
have been imprudent; for, if the poor
creature
would follow you, how could you help it? But
I fear that---pardon me, Sarah. I declare that it brings
the water into
my
eyes, to say it, even half in earnest
I fear that you have been imprudent, in some way.
Before
I said this, I should have asked you perhaps; but
would not the question itself imply that I suspected you?
Yet, let me tell you, from what I judge. You are such
an altered creature. Your very hand writing is
disordered
;
and your language is so, too. Now and then, by
flashes, a spirit breaks out, that I never saw before.
This, again, is succeeded by words,single words, and
phrases, which are really alarming, when I remember
what you have been. They are mournful, touching, yet
natural. By this, I do not mean that you were ever
affected, or
unnatural
, but that these are heart-felt.
They have distressed me,
me
, who knew you so well,
when, perhaps, another, not so familiar with your style,
would observe nothing of the kind, in them. But
Sarah
,
let me assure youI can safely say, that, in
all
the
letters
together, which you have written to me, since we left
Philadelphia, (and they fill a large part, of a very large
drawer,) there is not so much passion, and brokenness,
and strange beauty and fervour, as in two or three of
your last. Yet, you have experienced many vicissitudes;
and though there was
once
, a singular abruptnessa
masculine vigour, (have you forgotten
that?
) in your
style; yet, it wore off, and you were remarkable for
serenity
,
until of late, when you have returned, all at once, to
it. Passion is always abrupt;so is strong emotion.
Indeed
,
you had become so sober, at one time, and so
severe
,
that I almost trembled to write to you. But now;
how is it, now?Ah, Sarahyou have a woman's
heart, after all! and I can prattle with you again, as
freely as ever.
But
a deaf-and dumb man
. what am I to think of
you? That you are interested in him? Yesthat you
love
him?
No
.Take care, Sarah; you are too
confident
of your own strength. You are daring, too.If
you lovedeafness, dumbness, blindness, would hardly
be a fatal objection to you. Consider of this well. The
advice had better be months too early, than one moment
too late. If I know any thing of symptoms, yours are
sufficiently decided; and my opinion is
That you are
cruelly deceiving yourself
. I may be wrong, but such is
my belief. If you
thought
that you felt any tenderness
for the poor creature, you would tremble to speak of him.
You would be ashamed, and terrified. You would stifle
the thought, immediately, at the risk of suffocation; for
in her sober senses, any rational woman would do this,
as a matter of religious duty. I forbear to urge any
argument on this point. If argument be
necessary
it
is already too late. No, my dear, dear Sarah, your
danger
,
I am sure, lies in your self confidence. You are
cruelly agitated, without suspecting the cause. The
deaf-and-dumb man is the cause. Your proud heart is
the cause. I hope that I am mistaken;but, O, Sarah,
your letters;
such
, from such a woman as you, now that
I see them all, and know the whole, do alarm me
inexpressibly
.
That a girl, who has scarcely read a dozen novels in
her life; whom I have seen laughing over some of the most
pathetick, and sentimental scenes of the drama;one, on
whom all poetry that tells of love, still love, operated,
only to make her beautiful lips curl, in scornthat
she
should be so at the mercy, of one or two whimsical
adventures
,
as to believebut, before I advance another
step, Sarah, let me beg of you, to answer medo I know
all---is there nothing untold;---nothing---I ask you,
seriously
;---and
I will tell you, why. It appears to me so
utterly improbable that Sarah Ramsay should be
troubled
in this way, merely by the circumstance of having
been once in a grave-yard, with a deaf-and-dumb man;
by having seen him, at glimpses, and doubtfully, two
or three times; and, having been assisted in a trying
moment
,
by the same person, even were that assistance as
critically rendered, as she at first supposed.---Nay, this
seems so
impossible
, I might say, that I am driven to the
belief that there is something untold. Yes---there is.---
Sarah, my dearest friend! my sister! my dear Sarah! I
implore you to tell me. It will ease your own heart.---
But, if it may be---for there are some things; some, that
a woman will not tell to her own heart; some, that she
should not.---If this be one of them---it is enough. I am
satisfied, without wringing the confidence, like blood,
from your poor heart. Yes---satisfied; for this letter will
do all that such confidence could. It will awaken you,
dear Sarah, to a sense of your danger. Nay, it were
better
perhaps, that I should not know more, whatever there
may be to tell. We are sadly unwilling to relinquish
such things. I have found it so;and the heart of
woman
is always young, tender, and mute, till
that
feeling
of shame is gone, But then, when she has once learnt
to talk of the forbidden thing; once taught her lips to
pronounce the forbidden nameonce learnt to hear her
own voice discourse upon the theme of treachery, she
becomes, like the true coward, preternaturally brave.
Thus, it is said, that women never stop half way with
crime or virtue;and thus I am sure, they that have been
under any constraint, become imprudent, when that is
removed
.
That feeling of shame, Sarah, has been an
unreasonable
restraint to you. Even if you have felt
tenderness
,
you have
never
dared to show it. The fear of
ridicule appalled you. It is not wonderful; ridicule has
shaken stouter minds than women ever ought to have.
I could never love her, whom it would not disturb. It
may be better, therefore, that we should not speak at all
on this subject, again;---no matter whether it be, at
present
,
a trifle, or not. Because, unless we agree to
this
,
I should expect you to laugh at me, if it were a trifle;
and should conclude of course, if you did not, that it was
serious.Otherwise, I may live to hear the insensible
Sarah, muttering a sweet formal incantation aloud, to
the blind boy; invoking him, by some
name
which, but
to have heard pronounced by another, once, would have
been death to the poor trembler.There, my dear Sarah;
have I not played my part mighty well? I think that I
have; and I am sure that you will think me fairly quit
for some of your ancient lecturing, on similar subjects,
when I wanted a guardian, dear, more than you ever
will.
And now, let me take a more natural tone. I should
be really glad to hear, that my beloved Sarah, whom I
know better than they that think her cold and
insensible
,
had some truly romantick, high-hearted fellow for a
husbandnot for a loverthe romance of a lover is too
often sickening and artificial; but, when a husband, a
sensible husband is romantick, the character is
respectable
;
and the deep, thrilling, passionate beauty of
romance
is never so well set off, as by dignity and wisdom.
To such a man, would I fain see my Sarah wedded. I
should be happy, then;or, if that be too much, for we
are seldom
happy
here, I believe; and it is better for us,
that we should not be, I should be less
unhappy
than I
have been. Yet that is saying little.Supply the
deficiency
yourself, dear Sarah; and believe, as I do, that it
U 2
is better for us, these trials and disappointments, this
weltering of the heart at times; or, they wean us from
unsubstantial
things. And why should we complain?
surely not, that we have found the truth at last!Do we
complain that we are awakened from a delirious slumber?
Would we be deceived, forever?lie, forever and ever,
dreaming of imaginary virtue, in imaginary beings?
No, Sarah;and, instead of sorrowing that the delusion
has passed; and that the wicked are no longer seen as they
were wont to be, on beauty and majesty, we ought to
rejoice
.
And so we should, were it not for our self love.--
We cannot bear to confess that we have been duped
cheated, so miserably, as we sometimes are, into
enthusiasm
for the wicked andbut whither am I
wandering
?SarahI
have given you a practical
illustration
,
of what I cautioned you against, in the last page;
and I would tear this out, with a blush, and a few tears
perhaps, at mine own weakness, were I not more
ashamed
of
such
a weakness, at
such
a time. Perhaps
however
,
with me, it is a symptom of strength, rather than
passion, that I am able to support any allusion to this
painful subject. There was a time, when I could not;
nay, it is not long, since the most delicate touch would
have taken my breath away. I can think of it all, now,
more steadily; my feelings are strangely altered; and I
cannot readily believe that my heart is already so sound
as it appears;I choose rather to believe that the wound
is festering yet;that the living stream lies quick
below
.
While I believe this, I shall be more safe. It is
dangerous reviving certain associations. I have
experienced
that
. It is like retreading on crushed flowers with
our naked feet. We may affect to go there, with
indifference
;
we may know that there is no fragrance, no
beauty left; but the very earth is aromatick, impregnate
with their essence. The odour and oil follow us--haunt
us---even in our sleep. This looks well. When people
can talk so, there is, in general, little to be feared; but I
have learnt caution---and this, I hope,
is
for the last
time with me. And as for you, Sarah, the edict against
you
, is in full force.
You
are not to allude to the past.
And now, let me reply to your kind questioning. It
is very true, dear Sarah, that I am not so happily situated
as I could wish; but why should I disquiet you? You
cannot relieve me; and we are too far apart, for such
safe
correspondence, as would justify me in dealing very
plainly
.
Beside, I have lost a part of my sensibility, by
recovering
my health. I feel more serious, and am told
that my manners are so. Yet, I do not think that there
is any affectation of solemnity about me;perhaps there
may be, of cheerfulness, sometimes; for, when my heart
has been right heavy, on some foolish account or other,
I have tried to avoid alike, the appearance of melancholy
or dejection, which might be mistaken for pensiveness,
or sentimentality; and that of great spirits, which all
women
are apt enough to assume, whenever their hearts are
touched by disappointment. Do I write as I used to? It
appears to me that I do not. I think that I am getting
more into your manner, your
old
manner, I mean; for
your new one is quite a novelty!there's no denying
that
.
Of one thing, I can truly assure you. It is this. I
never knew what were the consolations, or what was the
vitality of religion, till death had been brought home to
me. You will rejoice with me, that this knowledge has
boen purchased so cheaply. I begin to think many things
less valuable; and to look upon many others with
different
eyes, than I did. Perhaps there is a certain evil
prideas well as some respect for religion, at the bottom
of this. If you think so, aid me to detect it.
Yes, Miss Matilda is here, and is much kinder to me,
than before. Jane, alas, has had her trial, too. We
have seen but little of her, lately. So many deaths in the
family, I fear, have broken her spirits. Her manner is
not very cordial; and she is very thin; but I am sure that
her heart, poor girl, is kinder than it appears; and when
we recollect how mistaken has been her education; how
dazzlingly beautiful she has been; and then look at her now,
so wasted and pale, from confinement and real inability
to bring her powerful mind into action, without the
excitement
of admiration, perpetually and publickly
administered
,
it is not wonderful that she is somewhat less kind,
than formerly. But Jane is a noble girl, after all. I
know of many a sick heart that she hath comforted; and
were it not that her virtues are too stern and masculine,
she would be an example of discretion for the age.
Of Mr. Grenville, I cannot permit myself to say
much, because I have not known him long. Some years
ago, we met; and I took up an opinion against him, which,
like some
others
, I have had good reason to change.
He remembers you; and you may have heard me speak
of him. He is about thirty-eight, I should judge; but
looks much younger. His mind is active and free, and
betrays an agreeable general information, that makes him
courted a good deal. I could not judge, whatever were my
ability, which is very slight, as you know, of his depth
or solidity, on so short an acquaintance; but, I am at
present disposed to think him an amiable man, with good
character, settled habits, a handsome fortune, and,
probably
,
a warm heart. Are you disposed for a bargain?
Come, what say you? I have no doubt; nay, I am sure
that he is well fitted to make any woman happy, who
may be ready to give up her heart to him. Only think,
Saraha snug fortune, (though that, I know, is nothing
to youheigho!but a little money, after all, is apt to
be a very comfortableno, not, a
little
money
that
is
one of the uncomfortable things of this life; for, if it were
not, I know not who would be more comfortable than
many a sweet girl in this neighbourhood.) There,
Sarah
,
farewell. I do not know when I have fallen, so
naturally
,
into my old humour; but the serious face that I
could not help fancying you
in
, when you wrote that
interrogatory
about Mr. Grenville, did divert me, that's
the truth on't; and I laughed heartily, when I came to it,
again, in answering you. Yet
you
must not laugh; at
least, not at him. He is far too respectable for such
pastime
,
I assure you. Once more, farewell dear Sarah,
and accept this long, endless letter, as an offset to some
of
yours
(quite equivocal that!)
JULIET.
JOHN TO SARAH.
O, Sarah!Sarah! What have I seen. Where have
I been! With whom have I been confederating? Stop.
Are you alone? If not, go to your room. Lock the door.
Now listen. Is the paper spotted? Are the spots red?
Do not shudder, do not, though they be. StayI will
be calm. The red stains that you see there
there
they
are continually shifting to be sure, but some will be
there, when you open the letterthey are blood. It is
Molton's blood. He is an
adulterer
. Mary Howard is
an adultress. Helen Molton is an adultress! She
abandoned
her husbandand fled with Molton. Retribution
has been done upon him. He is dying. The blessed
Saint is avenged. Juliet is avenged. William is
avenged
.
Frank, and the husband, and the poor, poor father,
all are avenged. His blood is upon my hands, at this
momentI cannot wash it off. I have washed, and
washedand wept upon itbut no, it will not depart.
But let me tell the story calmlywait a little while
* * * I went at nine o'clock, this morning, to see
Molton. I took my pistols with me. I was desperate.
I did not believe him guilty. He had told me a
plausible
story about Helen; and I believed it. But he never
told meah, this bloodthe smell is very offensive
do you know any thing that will take it out, Sarah?
He never told me that she was married to another, when
he came away;still less, that it was her husband, whom
he had slain, upon the beach.O, noif he had, I should
never have deserved the reproach of intimacy with a
man, at the head of whose table, sat his mistress.No;
I knew that she was his wife; that is, I
thought
so;and
I kept the secret, because he prayed it. II.
Welllet me to my story. As I approached the
house, I was willing to see if Molton was in his study;
and I went through the wood, therefore, at the back of the
house. I thought it a pity to be disappointed again. I
saw him. I knocked. The servant denied him. I
wrote a linewhat, I know not; but, here is the answer;
on the very card, too, just as it was written.
Young man.I shall be at your service, at
10.
It is
now
, 9,
by my watch
.
E. M.
I was unwilling to leave the gate; but, I had some
sense of decorum left. I turned my horse into the wood,
and rode about, determining never to quit him, alive,
till he had satisfied me, as to what he had said of Juliet;
what he wrote to Frank; and what Frank meant, by that
mysterious allusion to the death of William. I had seen
Juliet, several times, while I was waiting to see Molton;
for he had been constantly denied to me, 'till I would
bear it no longer. But she knew it not.
At ten, precisely, I rang the bell. I was conducted
in. Molton was in his dressing gown; and was paler and
thinner, nay, sadder, I thought, than I had ever seen him.
Am I intelligible? I must tell you all my weakness. My
heart smote me, for a moment. I felt as if I were
choking
.
Might I not have been too precipitate? How
could
he look soifmy blood mounted again. No
he was
not
innocent, look as he would!
I know not what I said; but he sat, I remember, leaning
upon his hand, with his eyes lifted, mournfully and fixedly
upon mine; and the first words that he uttered, in reply,
were merely these: and they were very calmly uttered.
You have brought your pistols, I suppose?
Yes, I replied, unwrapping them, and offering him
one.
He put it back, gently, and with a smile; a sickly,
wan smile, not so much in derision, the habitual one of
his
face, at such moments, as in compassion, or pity.
Nay, sirtake ittake oneyou
shall
take one;
said I, determined not to relent.
He took one; but, with a carelessness, that looked
more as if he wanted to convince me that he was just as
little in my power then, as before, than to exchange a shot.
I trembled with passion. What! might I not be
permitted
to harm him, with a loaded pistol in his hand?
Defenceless
,
I could not.
That
, were the work of an
assassin
.
But now, I prepared to fireI levelled. What
prevented me, I know not.There was a dead silence.
His melancholy eyes were rivetted upon mine, like one,
weary of life, willing to die, but sorry to die, by the hand
of one that had loved him;---so, I interpreted it. Shall I
tell the truth? My eyes ached---filled---and my arm
fell down, powerless at my sidethe pistol went off
a shriek followedand the apparition of my
brother
stood before me. Helen appeared, for a moment;
but, rebuked, I suppose, by some gesture of Molton, for no
sound escaped him, she vanished again. I only
remember
her, as I do all the rest---like phantoms, that came
and went, in noise and smoke, while the sound of the
pistol
was still ringing in my ears; and I knew not that my
aim at Molton's heart had been abandoned. I regarded
myself as a murderer. He sat without motion. My
brother
stood before me. I dared not embrace him; his
countenance
was stern, and I began to think, though it was
broad day light, that I was dreaming---nay, perhaps I
am dreaming, yet!-----It is incredible that so much
should have happened in so short a time. There is my
watch---and the hands would tell me---but they lie---yes,
they lie---that, not two hours ago, I had no blood upon
my conscience.
Well Frank was there. It
was
Frank. Whence did
he come? Did he drop from the clouds?
Molton's hand dropped;he fainted:but scarcely
were his eyes shut, than he opened them againand
ordered
the door to be shut, and locked.
Young men, said he, hear me. I have but a few
words to speak. You have deliberately sought my life.
I have known this, for weeks. There has not been a day,
when your own was not at my mercy. You might have
put me upon retaliation. Nayyou haveI speak
to bothto
you
, sir, and to
you
you have said things to
me, which, the bare
possibility
that I am an innocent and
injured man, ought to have prevented you from saying.
Permit yourselves but to suppose it
possible
, for one
moment
,
that you have been deceived; and what must
you think of your own conduct? You have pursued
me, to my own house. You have waylaid my path. You
have compelled me to become a prisoner, in my own
mansion
,
that I might not have my blood upon your hands;
nor yours upon mine. How many more there may be of
you, I know not. ButI hope your aim is
accomplished
.
If it be not, my patience is exhausted. I can go no
further. In my day of passion, I did many things that
I would avoid now. And, if I survive
this
, I shall apply
to the law. Will you inform me, who is the other that
has haunted me so long?lurking about my groundin
this country, toolike one prowling for a victim? You
are silent. Are you ashamed?
I know of none, said my brother, humbly.
Nor II know nothing of the matter, said I.
What!Is the young ruffian, and his fellow, who
were seen skulking about, here, some months ago,
unknown
to
you
, sir. A tall young mana drab coatand
very erect, proud step
I met
such
a man. said I, this morning, in the
wood. (For I remember that he turned, suddenly, as
my horse dashed past him; and put his hand into his
bosom
,
like one surprised, where he ought not to be. Nay,
I thought that he looked alarmedbut I attributed that,
afterward, I remember, to my own agitated appearance;
and to the pistols, wrapped in my handkerchief, to be
sure, that I carried under my arm.)
I
knew
one suiting such a description, once, said
my brother, haughtilyand I am glad to hear that he
is so near to me. I did not know it, before.
I looked at him as he spoke. His voice was altered,
and there was a cold, bright meaning, in his dark eyes.
I knew not what to think.
Well, continued Molton, you may marvel why I
have shown such forbearance toward you. That I have,
and that each may know, from the other, how I have
treated
him
, I will give you an opportunity of conversing
together, after one or two short remarks. My strength
ebbs apace. I am weaker than I thought. But, I think
it is not mortal. You have, both of you,
called
me a
coward
.
Did you
believe
it? If you did not, was it decent
to say so? If you did, was it wise? Nay, was it bravely
done? Would a stout heart ever battle with a
coward?
So much for what you have
said
. Now, hear me. There
was a time, when, had you done, exactly what you have
now doneI beg you to excuse my inarticulatenessit
is not the loss of blood, but the consequence of agitation
and put yourselves as much in my power, as you have
on this occasion, you should have died,
each by the hand
of the other
. You shuddernay, I can see a smile
gathering
in your faces. You do not believe me. But, hear
me out. I was willing to try that, now. I kept you apart.
One of you knows that our meeting was to have been, in
silence, this evening. Had I not relented, I should have
made the same appointment with
you
(he addressed
himself to me)and each would have met his brother.
Your shots would have been exchanged, in silence, and
darkness. The signalsthe hour would have been the
sameeach of you would have parted from me, where
you now stand, and you never would have known the
truth, till it was too late. Nay
I saw it alland Frank staggered into my arms.
Great God, said he,
it is true!
He had well nigh
done it, indeed!
I heard a strange sound at the moment; and, as I
turned
my eyes, I saw Molton plucking his white
handkerchief
,
drenched with blood, from his side. It adhered
closely, and ripped, as he tore it away; and he shook a
little, as with pain. Many steps, and a bustle, were then
heard in the landing.
I pray
you
, sir, said he, to me, if you have any
mercy on me, not to permit Helen to enter here, for the
present.
My brother sat down, like one utterly deprived of
strength; and covered his face with his hands.
I went to the landing, and saw Helenher hair all
looseher dress disorderedclinging about the knees
of an old manthe very old man, tooI knew him, at
the first glancethat I saw with Frank, so long ago.
She called him
father! father! dear father!
But he stood
W
stern, and like a judge, before her. Yet he was her
father
he
was!
for I saw his forehead move, at last;
and his chest heavedoh, with such tremendous
emotion
I
thought that his soul was departing, erect, from
her habitation. But, the tears came, at last, and he fell
upon his child's neck, and sobbed, as though his old heart
would break.
Oh, my lost, lost babe!said the old man.
I had left the door open. I heard a noise. I turned.
There was my brother; and Molton, with his hand upon
his side, leaning against the door frame;his troubled
eyes rivetted, with a look of strange inquietude, upon the
scene.
What is the meaning of this? he said, at last, in a
voice scarcely louder than a whisper.
But Helen heard him. Ears that love, are quick and
jealous. They will have nothing of the musick, that
they
love, lost.
It is my father! said sherising, and throwing
herself
upon the bosom of Molton. He caught her in his
arms. I trembled for the consequence; but the
handkerchief
clung to the wound, and his gown covered it.
The old man arosecame forward, with a firm step;
exchanged a look with Frank, and would have taken
something from his bosom; but Frank arrested his arm.
(He is a dead man, already, said Frank.) But he
came forward, nevertheless, and was about to lay his
hand upon Helenwhen the intrepid, cold eye of Molton
lightened outrightBy the living God! he cried, if
nay, I am too rash, perhapsart thou, indeed her
father
?
Helen, look up, love,
is
he thy father?
He is! cried Helen, kneeling, and kissing his feet,
while her dark tresses swept over them, in her agony
O, forgive me!
Edward
. He
is
my father.
I
do!
I
do!
answered Moltonraising her, and
staggering. The father stood therenot a limb
trembled
.
Daughter! cried the old manhear me. Lift up thy
hands. Renounce thy destroyer, foreverrenounce him,
there
there
, where thou standest, before these witnesses;
and thy father's heart is open to thee from this moment!
I know his powerI will forgive thee!bless thee!
weep over thee!forget thy shame, and thy dishonour!
to thee!if thou wilt. Butbut
daughter
I will
never pronounce thy name, again; no human being knows
it, yetnone shall know it
daughter!
if thou wilt
not
,
here, where
I
stand
here
, before the same witnesses, will
I curse thee!
Helen only clung the more vehemently to Molton; and
buried her face the deeper in his bosom.
Daughter!wife!a father's and a mother's curse!
a
husband's
curse!a
She raised her faceLord! how altered it was! Hush!
hush! said she. Do not believe him, Edwarddo not.
Father!
there
is my husband!
He!
he
thy husband!then what art thou? cried the
old man.
Molton's countenance, then, was like one falling asleep.
Death was upon him. He gradually sank upon the sofa;
and Helen stood over him, kissing his foreheadwiping
the sweat from his lipsand answering their occasional
movement;for no sound escaped themas if
she
understood
it allas if her very heart had a language of its
own, and kept uttering it, inwardlywith a continual
whisper of
oh, do notdo not believe it, Edward!
But he gained more strength. His spirit awoke, for a
moment. She was putting back his hair.
Helen!
said hehis eyes were rivetted on her with
such a look!O, of unutterable tenderness, struggling
with death.
Helen!
look at me. I never doubted thee.
Yethere is thy
father
. Is there a
husband
, too? Look
me in the face, Helen.
A
husband!
said the stern fatherYes! What
mockery
is this?
Silence!
said Molton. I ask
her
. Helen! love, look
upon me. I do not doubt thee, yet. Just whisper itlet
thy sweet lips move, and I'll believe them, say what they
willnay, though thy husband stand before me, at the
time.
Stand before thee!thou terrible man! By heaven,
he
shall
stand before thee.
Orford! Orford
! I say.
At this name, I saw Helen shudder. She arose, and
stood, fronting the broad stair case. I heard a step. The
young and interesting stranger, appeared.
Behold him there! cried the father.
Molton turnedbut when he saw his face, weak as he
was, he half arose from his seat, with a look of
inconceivable
horrour and alarm. A convulsive motion of the
hand followedlike one grasping a dagger, and ready
to give a blowand then he
smiled
smiled so
beautifully
,
so like a dying christianthat I could have fallen
down, too, and wept upon his feet, and wiped them with
my
hair.
Young man, he said, I am glad of this assurance.
Our feud, I feared, was mortal. Let us forget it.
He proffered his hand, as he said this; but Orford
struck it away, with scorn.
Molton's forehead reddened; a short, but fierce, bright
struggle, followed; and, he then added, in a low, sweet,
solemn voiceMen, bear witness for me. I have
offered
my hand, as a dying mannay, Helen, forgive me;
something has happened more than thou knowest of, yet;
do not look at me, in that mannerI have offered it to
one, that insulted and abused that woman,
Helen
to one,
that would have taken her from me, when I was her
husband
Nay,
sir---or, if your name be Orford---hear me,
for one little moment;a man that would scourge a
woman---attempt to ravish a wife from her lord---would
be not the least likely to reject, with
scorn
, the hand of
a dying man.
Some movement of the stranger's arm, was here
intercepted
by Frank, and the report of a small pocket pistol
followed, close at my ear.
What, sirs! cried Molton, have you no decency?
By heaven, I have fellows that would grind your bones to
dust, were I but to speak the word!---and yet, at every
turn, I am in danger of assassination. What! ho! Pedro!
Cadiz! Marco!
Instantly, we were surrounded with six or eitht of his
young Spanish negroes.
Boys! Throw the first man out of the window, that
you see move his arm, said he, coldly; but with the
aspect
of mortal determination.
They stood ready to obey. As for you, sir---Orford,
as you are called---I have little doubt that you are a
coward
.
Beware! Nothing can save you, if you advance
a finger. Your conduct, on two occasions, within my
own knowledge, justifies this opinion. But, you know
him well, Helen. Will you not bear witness to his
gentleness---his
humanity---his courage? Why so silent,
love? Nay, be not cast down. These are friends. I am
glad to see the young man alive; not that he deserves to
live; but, I would'nt have
such
blood upon my conscience.
It were fitter for the executioner. Speak, love. Shame
the wretch, at once! Shame him to everlasting silence!
Show him thy beautiful arms, scarred and bruised---the
places where the iron rusted into thy flesh---the
Helen
,
what ails thee? Why avoidest thou mine eye? Is
there any mystery in this? Speak! I never saw thee
thus, before. Speak! I conjure thee! Yet staya thought
ano, no---I will not imagine it. I'll only
remember
,
dear, thatcome nearer, love, nearernay, sir,
beware
how you moveit will be the signal of your death
I mention it for
your
saketell me, dear. Something
was said, but now, about some
other
husband; some
other
than meyou see that I smile, Helen; but, while I
remember
it, it were as well, I think, to smile with me
do smile, Helen,
do
I do not trouble thee to say
no;
but smile, dear, smile once, as I have seen thee, when
not a thousandth part so idly slandered.Tears!
silence
!Helen,
beware!The eye of the Everlasting
God is upon thee!Nay, nay---do not press thyself to
me---do not---thou must answer me! Answer me, now!
I will take nothing, but thy word. Arise, and answer
me!
Thou knowest me
.
Helen fainted. And Molton---just saying to the blacks,
in Spanish,
Let them go free
---plucked the handkerchief
from the wound, and fell back, saying faintlyThen
am I, indeed, O Saviour of men, what I most dreaded
an
adulterer!
W 2
Justly afraid of the consequences, I persuaded Frank
and the father to go, till we knew the result; but the
husband
would not depart, till the sight of Molton's shoes,
full of blood, made him think, I suppose, that the wound
had been given by
his
hand. I took advantage of the
thought, and offered him my horse; and he is gone.
Yes, he
is
an adulterer! But, what am I to think? You
did not know of her marriage; nay,
you
did not even
know, that he was the suspected one;---or that he came in
the vessel with her. Was the secret so well kept in
England
?
But how could
he
have been so deceived? O, he
must have known it. This tale is all a farcea farce,
between life and death! No, that cannot be. Men become
serious, then;and such men, who are habitually serious
and contemplative, they would not be very likely to play
such pranks. But, perhaps, the woundHa!you
know him, Sarahyou have called him a consummate
actor. May not all this be an artifice. It is---it must
be. At least, if he be not seriously wounded, it must be.
But how shall we know that? I'll go myself. O, the
thought is refreshing!look at my hands, Sarah!---look;
the blood has gone from them, with the thought---and the
paper, too---O, it is all white again, as the driven snow!
Ha! Frank is here.
WellFrank has just left me. My suspicions are,
again, at rest;---and my terrours revive. Molton has
sent for me. That shows no desire of concealment,
certainly
.
What, if I have wronged him?ah!---ah!---it
will kill me. And you, Sarah---but for you, perhaps---
Nay, I cannot blame you, for you taught me to avoid
him.
Frank says, that he has been here, for ten days,
concealed
;
that he saw Molton three days ago, and agreed
to meet him, on notice; that the notice was given him
this morning, while I was there, no doubt; and that he
was on the spot---the study---preparatory for the evening
---when, hearing my voice, which he did not expect, he
stepped into the next room; that the sound of the pistol,
and the shrick, alarmed him; and he entered, supposing,
till
now
, that I had deliberately shot Molton. I now
remember
the heroick conduct of that man. All the while that
we were together, not a look, not a word, escaped him,
to charge me with unfairness. He retained his pistol.---
Poor Molton. Yes, I must see him.
The father, it appears, has relented somewhat toward
him. He begins to believe it possible, that there was no
such deliberate seduction, as he, at first, supposed. Nay,
since he finds that, from the first, Molton used no
disguise
in his name, for he has a letter from him, signed
Edward Molton, he begins to think it possible, that he
was deceived; for Helen had not been married one hour,
when she escaped. The father prevented the publication;
and, believing Molton's name fictitious, he never trusted
it to any person in America; but always spoke of his
daughter, and pursued her, as unmarried.
Nay, when the thought came to him, that Molton might
be innocent of the greater evil, he actually wept. My
brother, then, ventured to tell what he knew, and what
he had seen. The father shuddered. The story of the
guardian, is false, said he. She had no other guardian
than myself, her natural father. But, there is a frightful
mystery in the matter, which I cannot explain, yet. I
cannot.
Farewell!---farewell. If Molton should die, I shall
never sleep again. Nay, why should I wish to sleep?---
It will only be to hear the report of the pistolit is
ringing
in my ears yet---to see the dark blood, swimming---
oozingpattering, like heavy rainO, it is horrible
good night!
Frank would have made no use of the bundle, he says;
the charm. He came to fight him.
Adieu
.
JOHN OMAR.
JANE TO CLARA P.
I shall be with you to-morrow,
matronised
, as we of
the
ton
say now, by
Miss
Matilda, my sweet maiden
aunt. Prepare yourself for the wonderhere has been
the devil to pay. I have just come to the truth of the
whole story. All the town is ringing with itbut you
may depend upon it,
my way
. Molton's girl is only his
wife. She is also another man's wife; another manI
shall make it very intelligible, I see plainly!has come
after herjust as I have expected, always, you know; it
being just the wickedest way of accounting for
appearances
;
and I knew enough of Ned Molton to feel pretty sure
that
that
was the true way. So it proves. Wellthe
husband shot Moltonand
Miss
Helen, the wife of two
husbands, has gone into fits, I take it, according to form;
and the husband has runaway with Mr. John Omar's
beautiful horse! If that won't be a consolation to him
unless he's
caught
for the loss of
any
wife, he must be
quite a remarkable creature among the race of modern
husbands. But there is something more. Her father is
come. They have been here too, skulking about
Philadelphia
,
to the knowledge of the Mayor, for a whole age.
Beside, it is said that they mean to mob Molton.
They'd better notsick or dead, he will give them a hot
reception. His house is full, from garret to cellar, with
black Patagonians, creatures that he has caught
somewhere
in South America; they can't speak a word of
English
,
and have no other notion of duty, than to do just what
he bids them. That they would cut any body's throat
at his bidding, there is no doubt; and how can you
punish
him
, in such a case? They cannot tell talesno
more than so many brutes. Is'nt he a precious fellow
that Molton? What a pretty chap for a novel, if he
only
lived in Italy, or any where but in America, the land
of the free and the home of the braveahem!I should
like to
see
a little more of both, and hear less of it. Who
would believe that such things were perpetrated, directly
under our noses, in the nineteenth century, (I believe 'tis
the nineteenth) in this, our peaceable county. Is'nt it
enough to make one's hair stiffen with affright! I
declare
my bed shakes under me, sometimes, when I think
of what we are coming to. We are getting as bad as the
English. Murders are things of every day occurrence,
here, since the war. Our ears were made familiar, it
would seem, with it thenand that, and the wars of
Europe
,
have deluged us with all the banditti and ruffians
of the world. Another thingthere was the father, the
husband, Frank Omar, and John Omar; all agreed to
have a crack at him, as they express it hereso he
could not escape you know. But the
privilege
of being
first shot at, was
yielded
(without much dispute I dare
say) to the
husband
. Lord!what cattle they are. So,
if Ned should get well now, he must fall in the long run,
or begin a
long run
, directly, and never come back again.
OJuliet is to be married.
Circulate the report;
but
don't say from whom you get it, till it is necessary, to
make it go down. By that time, they will forget of whom
they had itand all will be well. I want her ears to get
accustomed to
that;
and then you may give his name.
It is Grenville. I'll tell you all about him, to-morrow;
and give you a specimen of his conversation, literally.
It is one continual
episode
. Thus, he began the other
evening to speak of machinery. He began with
Arkwrights
;
he went on with ear-rings; watches; card
machines
;
printing presses; but let me follow him, in his own
way, from Harper's Ferry to the planet Jupiter, which was
quite a natural digression for him. They compare him
(in derision, I suppose,) to John Randolph. But one
difference
is plain enough to me, already. Randolph has
been known to get back,
sometimes
, to the point whence he
started;nay, always, I may say, in
argument
. But
Grenville never, in any case, whatever;every step is a
pointand every pointa centre to which he never
returns
.
One might trace his course on a map, by a
Congreve
rocket, that should have the faculty of exploding,
whenever it struck the groundor the
subject
and then
darting off again, in a tangent. He seems to have great
constitutional vivacity, although his faculties, and his
senses
too, are fettered by this new influence, till he looks,
at
her
side, like Apathy listening to mysterious
symphonies
,
coming out of the grass, with odour and
beauty
all
about himha!what think you of that?
Some one happened to name the name of General
Harper
we
were speaking of his fine talent and heart;and
then, of the strange fact, that he was
permitted
to review
the British troops, in the face and eyes of Lord
Wellington
.
O, speaking of General Harper, said Mr. Grenville,
that reminds me of Harper's Ferryever there?--I was
always mention ittravelling for pleasurewent to
the armourysome notion of being comfortablethought
it was about time to begin to think about getting
married
after
a wifeknow of any? Manage to make the
pot boil,
may be
. Jefferson's rock's mighty dangerous
names carved to the brinkmost
curious
thinglike
to a'been washed away in ahemmill race. Durst
thou Cassius, said I, leap with me, &c.and in I went
Lord!it took my breath awayscarified me
whizzed
and whirled me about, like soap-suds in a gutter.
I would'nt recommend to you to bathe in a mill race
(you will recollect that women only were present)
bad place to learn to swim inahemthe most
curious
thing that I saw, was a turning lathejust invented
turns gun-stocks wholelock, stock and barrel
'Twas'nt exactly the wisest thing that ever was done, I
confess;I might have been drownedbut I never lose
my presence of mind, at such moments, I meannay,
women
themselves do notthere was an iron mould made
in the shape of a gun-stockupon this, a number of
instruments
were graduated; corresponding exactly with
others, aboveahemthose at the top had
edges
those
below had nonethe wheel revolved, the chips flew, and
out came a gun-stock!ahemwonderful contrivance
very
curious
indeedrevolutions are naturally in a circle
you would think it difficult to turn an ovala
hectagon
a
squarebut this machine does moreall at once;
many ovalscapable of universal applicationvery
simple
,
the principle! What a people we are! for invention,
and improvement!emphatically our national character.
There's Arkwright now, and Wedgewoodyou've heard
of both; wellahemthere's our Perkins, and
Fairman
,
and Rittenhouse; andoh, it
is
amusingwhen the
patentee of the machine to make cardsdid you ever see
it? One twist o' the wheel---wire crooked---cut---holes
punched---teeth placed---just like the human fingers---
more exact---when a committee of the national
institute
were invited to see it, in Paris, they laughed at the
specificationthey said it was
impossible
they saw
it. And they say that there is nothing like it, under
heaven. General Harper, they say, is the best
parads
officer in the world. Nay, those who know him best,
say that his military talent is his predominant talent,---
a profound statesman---a great orator---poh!---a first rate
lawyer---but a greater general---ahem---strange how we
follow their nobility. Did you ever know Miss ,
Miss, that was---or Miss . I've heard that she said
she would prefer being the
Mistress
of a prince, to the
wife of an American citizen!---shame on her!---reproach
to the country---no true American citizen, after that
speech, would marry her, if she could pave his house with
gold---ahem---never mind---she may live to be the
mistress
,
yet, of Lord Wellington, or some other spoilt
Irishman
.
Thank you for another song, Miss Julyaheman
Irishman's a princetill he be spoilt by a peerage
Curran
SheridanSwift,
&c. &c. &c.---hey? Strange
things are whispered of some American ladies---they had
better stay where they are---we are not made for
train
bearers;
our
ladies
, I mean---let us dance as we will, and
prattle ever so innocently, and ask ever so many, sweet,
pretty, simple questions---`
Grand-pa
---is I
got a gizzard
.'
His family plate is pawned---jewels---a constellation.---
Oh---a new planet is discovered---and we are to have war
with Spain---a broad belt encompasses it;---and they say
there are two or three moons. I wonder if there are
many lunaticks, or lovers---synonimous, you know---
there---in proportion to the number of moonsI
II.
There, dear,
that
is a fair specimen of his trumpery,
I leave you to judge of the man. But circulate the
report
.
Leave the rest to me.
JANE.
SARAH TO JULIET,
(Enclosed in the following, from Dr. George Wallace.)
Salem
.
Mr. Ramsay died last evening, between ten and
eleven
,
with little pain, and in the full possession of his
faculties
.
His daughter is seriously indisposed; but she has
the best medical attention in the country; and her
deportment
toward her father, during his short illness, has made
her many friends. Be assured, madam, that she shall want
for nothing. She wrote a note yesterday morning, and
gave it to me, with your address, requesting me, if the
event should be as we anticipated, to enclose it to you.
She took to her bed, immediately; or rather, we carried
her, by force, from the presence of her father, who
commanded
it; and she is now delirious. Mr. Ramsay
received
every attention and kindness, that he could have
received at home. A catholick clergyman, from Boston,
one of the most amiable and benevolent of men, was with
him all the time, during the last two days; and no human
being ever manifested more resignation, after he was
told that death was inevitable. At first, he was a good
deal agitated; yet, he told me, not an hour afterward,
that he
knew
he should die in my house, the first night
that he slept here. I laughed at the notion then, but it
was verified. He did die, in the very room, in the very
bed, and at the very hour which he had foretold. I have
had some experience in these things; and am willing to
attribute much to the imagination; but, when I see a
sober
,
sensible man, like him, yielding up to a belief that he
has seen a spirit---pardon me, madam, I am little inclined
to provoke a smile at such a moment; but, Mr. Ramsay,
not an hour before his death, told me, that his wife had
appeared to him, and summoned him. Was there any
thing remarkable in her death? I ask the question, from
some mysterious observations that I heard escape him,
in conversation with his daughter, respecting the matter,
when he was first taken ill. He told his physicians and
me, that nothing could save him; but, desired us not to
inform her. We tried all that we could, to divert his mind
from meditating on the subject. But all in vain. Even
medicine had no effect upon him. Can the mind
counteract
such things?neutralize our poisonsdilute and
dissipate the most corrosive, and fiery applications?
Is that sympathy so vital, that the blood cannot be
chilled
,
where the mind is preternaturally heated? It was,
in his case. Blisters were applied. They came off, as
they went on. His skin had lost its sensibility.
Purges
and emeticks were given. No effect was produced.
The stomach and bowels were impenetrable. Laudanum
followed; but, the only result was, a more mortal
coldness
in the extremities; no sluggishness, no torpor;
the blood, therefore, was beyond our dominion. It is
considered here, the most extraordinary case, within our
experience; but we are told that such things may be, in
the books; and our limited observation would seem to
confirm the position. Sudden fright, I have known to
produce deathand to restore drunken men. And the
sea-sickness, always ceases, when the danger of
shipwreck
is imminent.
I am, respectfully, dear madam,
Your most obedient, humble servant
,
GEORGE WALLACE.
(NOTE, ENCLOSED.)
O, Juliet
if
it should come to pass
if
he should be
taken from me, what will become of me? Juliet, dear,
blessed JulietI cannot leave him, even to write this
every breath that he draws, goes to my heartO, it is a
judgment upon me. I have forgotten to prayforgotten
tonay, what have I not forgottenwhat was left to
me, after I forgot my Maker. O, Father of
mercies
,
Father! spare him!O, spare him!. I must
go to the bed sidehe movesfarewellif you receive
this, you will
understand
it. The word death, may not
be in itbut Death will be the bearer.
X
MAD. VERNON TO JULIET.
My sweet child
.
Your letter found me so ill, that it was thought
inexpedient
to open it; and, when was I well enough to read
it, it was not to be found; nor, did any of us conjecture
from whom it came. I had left no direction for
opening
it; and, as you had not written to me, for so long a
time, it never occurred to me, that my dear Juliet was
the writer. But, to-day, we have found it, unopened,
carefully put away, with some old papers, of no value.
I tore it open, and read it, with feelings, I am sure,
that my poor patient child, would not willingly cause her
mother; let me be still your
mother
, Juliet, the
endearing
nameO, it is tender and welcome to my widowed,
childless heart;yet, dear, why should I complain of it?
The tears that followed, and blinded my old eyes,
were tears of pleasure, as well as bitterness. To find
my babe restored to health, again, O, that were enough
to make me endure any thing.
But Juliet, tell me the whole truth, dearall thy
suffering
.
NoI am wrongdo not. O, my heavenly
Father, why should
we
repine, aged, and weary, and
worthless as we are, when we see the innocent and
lovely
;
the pure of heart, and the very beautiful, so helpless
and miserable! Juliet, what can I do for thee. Shall I
weep?behold my tears; my glasses are dim with them,
and the paper is blisteredmy prayers?O, while I
lock my withered hands, and pray for thee, mayest thou
feel the warmth of
His
love, flowing into thy dear heart,
as it does into mine, old as it is, whenever I prostrate
myself
,
devoutly, before him. Let
that
prayer be granted;
and thou hast nothing more to wish. Thou wilt be
happy
.
O, dear Juliet, when a poor, lone, dark woman,
like me; beset, as I am; bereaved as I have been, can
find
that
a consolation, for the loss of husband,
children
,
friends, youth, riches, and health, in
widowhood
,
and childlessness, O, believe that there
is
a
divinity
in religion---a truth, in that blessed Book, upon which
my hand is now lying---believe it, and thou wilt be
happy
,
happen what will.
Yet, thy calamities are not light;
not
light; I well
know that, Juliet. Thy uncomplaining, quiet
disposition
,
never speaks, while it has a tear left; and when thy
tears
, poor, gentle heart, are all shed, when
they
are
exhausted
,
hard must have been the pressure. O, I
do
pity
theeI
do
, from my soul, my dear child. But look up
to
Him
pray to
Him
, unceasingly.
He
will interfere
for thee. Hath
He
promised it, and shall
He
not do it?
What shall I say of Grenville? What I know of him,
is entirely in his favour. He wants dignity, I confess;
and, most of all, that intellectual dignity, which
nay, my dear childlet us abandon all such thought;
and once more, only once more, will I mention him. It is
now.I am amazed at his blackness. I knew that he was
rash, and a creature of violent passions;---but I thought
that he had arrived at their mastery. He had given
such
proof
. I know that he has been great---resisted
greatlytheir dominion. And has he yielded at last? O,
my child, forgive me, forgive me for the danger that my
counsels have led thee into. I did not think him faultless,
as I told thee; nay, for he told thee himself, that he had
great faults, which he
would
overcome. How has he
kept his promise? Let
him
answer that.
Farewell, my dear, dear Juliet. Do not be hasty. I
give no more advice. I have done recommending
anybody
to thee; judge for thyself. But conceal thy
sentiments
,
even from me. I am sore yet, with my
partiality---so
infirm are we all! But Mr. G's family are
respectable
;
and, so far as I know any thing of him, his life
is irreproachable. I say this, I hardly know why---is it
because I would not have a man
seen
in the company of
Juliet R. Gracie, who was
not
a man, and a
christian?
Whether Mr. G. be
one
or not, you can judge, better than
report.
Farewell
,
N. V.
JOHN TO SARAH.
Frank has prevailed. We could not both fly to the
sick bed of our beloved Sarah; and we have finally agreed
that he should be, as the older, and more experienced,
the first to minister consolation to her who, henceforth,
is our
sister
. From this instant, our home is your home,
Sarah, and while we have a morsel of bread, that morsel
is yours. We mention this now, because, it may happen
in these disastrous times, that a death so sudden, as that
of your excellent father, may leave his extensive affairs
in some disorder; or, at least, render it difficult to bring
them to a profitable or speedy termination. I speak now
as a man of business. Sudden death, in the head of a
great commercial house, is little better than a
bankruptcy
,
unless the property be under lock and key. I pray
you, therefore, my dear Sarah, to be prepared for the
worst. Put the whole management of the business into
the hands of Frank; and make yourself well and happy,
as soon as possible. This will not be shown to you,
till the
agony
of your bereavement is passed; but, it will
be shown you, while the greater danger is yet near you;
that of despondency, and weariness of spirit. I recommend
travelling to you; Frank will accompany you. I offer no
consolation. I pretend not to the power. But I feel for you.
I have wept for you; and I can only say, go to the blessed
Book, which you have so often recommended to me.I do
not pretend to speak from my own knowledge of its value
from my own experience, I meanI am shamefully
ignorant
of it, I confessbut, I see that it makes the mourner
look smilingly up to heaven; the widow's heart beat; and
the sweet orphan move her little mouth in prayer;---and I
cannot doubt, that it is the best medicine for the sick at
heartfor you, my own dear Sarah.Do not yield to
the blow. But you will not. Your talents are not to
lie idle and darkening, in the chamber of apathy. No
you must be useful to them that want examples among
the sweetest charities of lifethe household charities.
Poor Juliet is indisposed, but sends her lovewill
write soon.
Affectionately, and ever yours,
dear cousin and sister
.
JOHN.
FRANK TO JOHN.
Salem
,
Dear John
.I found our dear cousin far gone, indeed.
She was so altered that I scarcely knew her; and, when
I first took her hand, she did not seem to know me; and
it trembled, as if there were something hateful in the
touch of mine; but, after looking me steadily in the face,
her dark hazel eyes, burning to their centre, with
some deep, strange thought, for two or three
minutes
,she
heaved a deep sigh, smiled faintly, shut her
lipsand the tears instantly filled her eyes. She
pressed
my handand carried it to her temples. The
beating
was excessive and fiery. I spoke to herI
endeavoured
to appear undisturbed; but she saw my agitation;
and I am sure that she ran over, in her thought, all that
had happened to both, since we parted. She attempted,
two or three times, to speak; but her heart was too full, and
she only put her beautiful hand upon her bosom, and
temples, and shook her head. After that, she slept for
several hours; and her nurse told me, with more
composure
,
than at any time since her illness. She had been
in danger, I was assured, by the worthy, but very
eccentrick
old gentleman, whom I apprehend to be a
correspondent of Juliet's; for he spoke of
Madame
Gracie
.
You may be very sure that I smiled, at the
whimsical
association in my mind. But the danger is all
passed now; and, at our last conversation, there was
discoverable a deep and beautiful inwardness of
tranquillity
,
that augurs well. We have spoken of Juliet; and
she desires to be remembered to her, with affection and
gratitude;
gratitude
, she says, with emphasis, Juliet
will know what I
mean
. Tell her that her advice was
timely. I was in more danger than I dreamt of. But her
letter and this shock have opened my eyes; and I do
trust, if it be permitted to me, to go abroad once more,
that I shall have the strength to prove how I have been
bettered and benefited by both. A fall makes one step
more carefully. she added; and every aberration from
the true path, is remembered, in the sick chamber, as an
X 2
irregular pulsation of the heartsomething to be cured
at oncesomething to turn pale at.
Farewell
. Be
particular about
her
, and believe me, as I
am
.
FRANK.
JOHN TO FRANK.
I have been with Molton every hour, night and day,
since you left us. He is yet in a very critical way; but
whence, if it be not from the sustaining power of a well
governed mind, and a conscience untroubled and
unpolluted
,
can be preserve this great serenity, at such
a time? I know not what to think of him. I have
spoken
of his past life; and he has acknowledged that his
conscience is not clear; that there is a heaviness about
his heart, and a darkness upon his understanding, at
times, from the recollection of much evil that he hath
caused and done. Yet, he says, that there is not the
weight of one deliberately cruel, or wicked deed, upon his
memory. It was impossible not to believe him. His
sins have been those of suddenness, or of mistaken, but
generous, imprudence. His passions have been
tremendous
;but
they are now, one would believe, utterly
subjected to his mastery.
There was a consultation, last night; and the result
would have been unknown, had not Molton demanded,
in a tone of solemn authority, that they should not deceive
him. How dare you trifle with a dying man? said he.
Am I in a very perilous situation? Speak! Tell me
so, like men. I shall bear it like a man. Do you fear for the
agitation? You little know me. Were you to tell me this
moment, that I should be a dead man, when that hand
points at twelve, you would perceive no change in my
countenance; none in my voice; none in my pulse.
What! should I not feel it? I should. But the spasm
would be over, instantly. There would be no outward
sign. Do your duty. Tell me the truth. What is my
chance of life? Have I one in ten, one in a hundred, or
a thousand?What! no answer! is my death so certain,
as thatnot one chance in a thousand! You shake your
heads. Speak, will you? You are not dealing with a
child. Tell me my fate, at once, and let me go to sleep.
I am weary of this anxiety. Would you have me bear
witness against you, to-morrow or next day, for deception
before God.
They refused to declare their opinion; but entreated
him not to disquiet himself. He smiled; and, looking at
me, calmly observed, you see now the efficacy of that
rule. Were I not accustomed to the contemplation of death,
his nonsense alone, would be enough to jar me to
dissolution
.
What! am I such a simpleton, as not to know
that, when doctors and surgeons consult together, by
their own consent, the case must be extremely critical;
and that, when a consultation has once been held, if
they have anything pleasant to communicate,
any
hope,
any
chance, however small, it is always told? No, Mr.
Omar,I know the truth. The terrible pains that I
had felt this morning; the sudden cessation of those pains
have told me the truth. A mortification has begun.
Very well. I expected it. The inflammation justified me
in expecting it. Let them be as silent as they will, were
I a weaker man than I am, it would be a dastardly
policy
.
Would not
any
patient conclude that such silence
as this, was the doom of death, most emphatically
pronounced
,
by them, from whom there is no appeal? Well,
gentlemen,since you are unwilling to tell me
that I am a dead man, will you allow me to ask you,
how long it is
possible
for me to be a living one? They
were earnestly whispering together at the window.
The elder advanced, and took his hand. Are you
prepared
for the worst? said he. Yes, for the worst, said
Molton. Will you submit yourself entirely to us?
Entirely
. Do with me as you will, while the breath is
in meand then, you are welcome to my bonesand
all, but my heart. That were a study that would terrify
you. Nayon second thought, I recal that. You shall
not have my body. I have reasons for it. The medical
man shook his serene old head, as if he suspected, that
all was not right. We have concluded to tell you the
result, said he. There is yet some hope. Molton's
countenance fell.What! was life appalling to him.
But the chance is small, indeed. We shall abandon the
ball; but a very painful operation is indispensible, or
your hope is truly desperate.Molton looked him
steadily in the face. Spoken like a man! said he.
That is right. That is the way that wise men will act,
when dealing with creatures, about to appear before the
judgment seat against them.Do with me as you will.
The operation was then performed. It was frightful, and
he faintedthe blood spun out of his breast;his hair
was wet and soaked in his own sweat; yet he never
breathed a loud word. He is better now. Are you
willing to die? said I. He was silentI repeated it.
No
he replied,
No!
--No man is willing to die, if, by that, you
mean, that he would not save himself, if he could.
Are you resigned?I do not understand the word,
said he, but I am proud, too proud, to flinchand,
when I reflect on what I must endure, if I recover, I
declare
to you, that I am more intimidated at the sudden
thought of life, than death. The pain of death is
nothing
.
I have suffered more than that twenty times over;
nay, I have been dead, to all appearances, more than once.
The coming to, was death. It was like the rush of a
whirlwind of powdered glass into my lungsmy
arteries
were distendedall the vessels of my heart were
ruptured; and I could have raised my hands, and wept,
to be left alone; but I had not the power. My mind
only
movedmy body was at their mercy; and they
tortured
it back to life. NoI should be sorry to die; but, if
I must die, there is no martyr of them all, that ever died,
more self collected, passionless and undisturbed, than
Edward Molton will. The time has been, when death
was
terrible to me. The career of ambition was then
open to me. The blood beat into my heart like a tide;
and a mighty spirit arose, self-engendered, self-created,
self-compounded, in the uproar and agitation of its
elements
the
fierce alchymy of fire and blooda spirit,
that would have died, with the harness upon its back,
though it died, scaling the bastions of heaven. Woman
was accessible to me
then
. I was born to loveand be
beloved
.
Then
, life was dear to me! It is so no longer.
My ambition is extinct. My love has burnt down. My
heart is in cinders.
Now
, why would I live?Faith,
it were difficult to tell.Perhaps to be a better man---
perhaps, to be revenged on some, that have thought evil
of me;---perhaps, to prove to them, when their faces are
in the dust, and my foot is upon their neck, that---I
never
asked more, than to have my power
acknowledged
.
Acknowledge it, and I will never use it. Deny it---and
what follows? I must thunder about your ears with the
proof. Behold the secret of my dispositionthe whole
secret of my crimes.
What am I to think of such a man? and then, his wife
O Frank! to be so loved; so worshipped; so ministered
to, by a creature like that; Ah, I should go distracted at
the thought of losing her. By the wayI must not
forget
,
that the father is unaccountably kind to Molton,
nowand that his manner toward him, is rather that
of one, who has injured another, than been injured by
him. His look too, is more in sorrow, than in anger.
I cannot understand it; yet so it is; and I have actually
caught the old man weeping upon Molton's hand, with
Helen by, her beautiful eyes upturned, in her idolatry
to her lord'swhen I entered unexpectedly; and I have
pausedand wished that I had put off my shoesfor the
ground that I trod upon, I felt,
was
holy.
OYou are held pledged to secrecy for all, that
transpired
,
while you were present. I have promised it, so
that these reports may all die away, now that the husband
has gone.
May not this marriage have been the
secret
that
changed
Juliet? Mention it to Sarah. Nay, I have some
notion
that,
that
was what he communicated to her, when I
left them alone, for a moment.
I am afraid of the consequences. I don't like this
Grenville, yet he appears to be on a very familiar
footing
there; and, what is exceedingly provoking, although
I have taken a great deal of pains, I have been unable to
hear one word against him. The whole world seemed
to be leagued against me. I am very serious; for, though,
if she marry him, I should most devoutly pray that he
be a good and great man; yet I have my fears of both.
But fears are not enough;if my brother, my noble
hearted brother is to be supplanted by anybody, it should
be by a man.Nay,
I
should not be much pleased by
the comparison. But what can she do? There never
were such a set of children and gawkies, with their
impudent
familiarity tooabout any woman of sense, since
the world was made. I wonder if they have the assurance
to believe that they understand her value. The devil
take them!there is not one among the whole, that can
fathom her heart, or her understanding. All that they
know, is, that she is gentle and sweet tempered, and sings
well; and that two or three fine fellows have been in love
with her. But this Mr. Greenvillehe has more sense
not much to be sure, for he does not, cannot know her.
His compliments are often direct and barbarous; and, did
I not
know
that he is a man of property, his pretensions
to it, and his indirect, ingenious way of boasting of his
wealth; and announcing his desire of obtaining a wife,
would make me tuck away my watch chain, if I sat near
him. His fondness too, is childish at times. But after
allI am obliged to own that I
think
Juliet likes him.
If sopersecuted as she ishelpless as she is, with Jane
and Matilda about herher pride and sorenessGod
help her!
Farewell
.
JOHN.
JOHN TO SARAH.
I have written to Frank, a long letter, dear Sarah; and
meant to have written another to you; but I am really
unable. My strength is nearly exhausted. I had no idea
of it, till now; but the loss of sleep, I find, wears more,
upon my constitution, than the loss of food,---or even than
the troubles of the mind. You can read Frank's letter,
however, and consider it the same, as if written to you;
for I hardly know what else I could have said; except to
praise heaven, from the bottom of my heart, that you
have escaped a protracted illness; and to pray your
implicit
submission to Frank's guidance, in every
particular
,
just as if he were your own brother. Oh, yesthere
is yet another thing; but that is for you alone. Keep
your eye upon Juliet. I have my fears, that she is more
unhappy than she would seem; that there is some deep
grief, praying inwardly upon her, I am sure. She
deceives
herself;---she deceives the world. But she cannot
deceive me. My tenderness is too vigilant; a secret
disease
is working at her heart. You may guess it;---her
face is serene, her manners composed; and her spirits
never appeared more truly innocent and captivating;
but, at times, even in her pleasantest mood, when nobody
else saw her, I have seen her; all the festivity of her eye
vanished; her pale brow grow still paler; and her meek
lips trembled, as if a spectre had gone byvisible to her
eyes only. I suspect the truth. The world say that
she never loved---till
now
. What!---can it be, that
no, no, I will not imagine such blasphemy.
Ever thine, dear Coz
.
JOHN.
JULIET TO SARAH.
I have been a little unwell, my dear
sister;
for so, I
must call you, that, if we cannot make up in nearness,
we may in number, the relations that you have lost;---
but the first thing that I have attempted, as soon as I am
able to hold a pen, is to write to you; not, with the vain
hope of offering consolation to a daughter, in the hour
of her bereavement and affliction; no, dear Sarah, but to
weep with you; to kneel with you; and to pray to Him,
whose mercy endureth forever, that He will have
compassion
on the sick and weary of heart; that he will
temper
the wind to the shorn lamb, and be to thee, my
sister
,
my own dear sister, what he hath been to me, in my
unworthiness, a present helper indeedfather!mother!
brothers and sisters! O, blessed be his name. Without
his indulgent, and sustaining hand, how utterly helpless
were our situation! two orphansafar and apartalone,
in the wide world,beset with many dangers;one
exposed
to the profligate and sordid, by her wealth; the
other toall the worldby her poverty. Ah, Sarah, it
were difficult to say, which was the most enviable
situation
;
that, where the purest offerings of the heart are
liable
to be suspected of impurity; where, whatever may be
its disinterestedness, passion and vehemence, and truth
and tenderness; they
can never be proved
,because
the shrine of its idol is of fine gold, and rough with
precious
stones:or that, where the true heart is
continually
pressed, and pressed; and tortured and wrung,
while there is one drop of life left within itby poverty
and dependance. O, Sarah! O, my sister! how many a
delicate creature, appointed by heaven to all the offices
of love, and tenderness, on earthto be a wifeand a
mother
to
some dear, noble hearted man, and some sweet
babe,hath been pinioned and bound, and offered up in
sacrificeeither by her poverty, her pride, or her
revenge
.
How many a maiden hath perjured herself;
how many a widow re-sold the desolate tenement of love,
to the highest bidderAh, the thought is too cruel.
What can I say to thee? Nothing but this, my beloved
sister, nothing but thisto put thy trust in heaven.
JULIET.
EDWARD MOLTON TO THE REV. CHARLES ASHTON.
Your letter, sir, returning
mine
, was received, when I
was unable to reply. I made you some promises in that,
which, had you acted prudently, or with the good sense,
to be expected from a man of your age, and profession,
you would have opened, after having
invited the correspondence;
and which (I speak of those promises,) I
hasten
to fulfil, notwithstanding the insult that you have
offered
me. My letter, I shall keep by me, with the seal
unbroken
.
We may chance to meet again, here;or,
perhaps, in heaven; and, if it be permitted to me, I will
then break the seal in your presence, and convict you of
what I have just charged you with. I pity you. And
here our correspondence must close. I only write now
because I promised to make some remarks upon Mr.
Laney's book. I have performed my engagement; and
written them in a sick chamber.
They follow, precisely as if nothing had happened
between
us. I let no such things disturb me. I have been
too much accustomed to them. You are not the first man,
nor the first
clergyman
, that I have been deceived by;
no, nor the first, whom I have found a cold, calculating,
shrewd man; who, if his heart were ever surprised into
any one generous emotion, made haste to atone for it, by
acting, as if he had no heart at all. I will tell
you
of one
instance. There was a man of this character once, who
had some notion, perhaps, that I could be of use to
him. He was electioneering then for a benefice. He
went to a
friend
of minea man that
was
my friend, and
is
yetand will be, to my dying daywho had known me
long enough, not to shut his eyes to the lightthough
that light were brought to him, in
my
hands;a
gentleman
too, who has not the courage to insult a brave man,
when he knows that
his
gown is a greater shelter to him,
than cowardice or womanhood. He asked my friend for
a letter to me. It was given, with evident reluctance;
(for the applicant was a stranger, to
him
,) and with these
remarks, I will give it to you, sir. But you must expect
no dinnerno wine;he is too poor for eitherno
popularity
,
for he is unpopular. Yet the man had the
indelicacy
to take the letter, notwithstandinga letter that
was only
not
refused. He came to the town, where I
was; and, when he found that, what he had heard from
my friend, was
true
his heart failed him. He had the
meanness to keep it a secret from his own intimate friend,
that he had a letter of introduction to
me
. He was
Y
ashamed to own it. Would he have owned, to his Ma
ker, think you, if he could have helped it, that the same
letter was
obtained by his own importunity
. Noyet such
was the fact.
I heard of his arrival. I expected to see him. On
weekten daystwo weeks passed over my headstill
he came not. I saw an intimate friend of his. Mr.
S
, said he, has a letter for you, he tells me, from
Mr. P heAhsaid Ia letter of
introduction
,
I suppose. A letter
of introduction!
said
this most courteous gentleman, with a manner for which
he deserved to have his teeth knocked down his throat;
a favour that I should assuredly have done him, on the spot,
had I not known enough of the man, to believe that he
expressed
no more surprise, than he honestly felt, at my
having presumed such a thingwhat! a letter of
introduction
to
me!
borne by Mr.
S!
The thing was
quite
too
ridiculous!
I was sensitive then. Poverty makes most men
humble
.
It makes me proud. I scorned to tell the creature
the truth;that the letter
was
an introduction, and a
solicited
one too.
Tell your friend, sir, said I, to put the letter into the
Post Office.
A few days after, I received it. I have it yet. Had
it been presented to me by any
gentleman
, in the situation
of the man, of whom I speak, I should have said, sir,
I thank you for your visit. I shall not return it. But
do not consider
that
as any mark of disrespect. At
present
,
my acquaintance would not be creditable to you. I
shall, therefore, not return your visit; but come and see
me, when you can. Hereafter it will be different. The time
is coming, when no man shall be ashamed of me, or of my
company. I shall treat you as well as I am able, till
we know each other. I do not ask you to dine with me
because the people where I board; and, to whom I pay
my board, too, may have to pawn a ragged
pocket-handkerchief
(which they did one day) to buy bread for us;
and I never drink wine. This I would have said. But
he gave me no opportunity.
I felt no little bitterness toward him, at first;but
that has now passed away, and I forgive him. He did
unwisely;a little knowledge of the human heart, must
have let him into the secret; that, when it is sore with
the jarring of the worldquiveringcold and alone
a gentle hand will not approach it carelessly, lest, even
the well-meant office of kindness, may be
misinterpreted
for rudeness. Still less will it, when that heart is in
flower, for the first time in its solitude, for many years,
will it send a bitter and deliberate blast upon it. There
was a time, when I would have horse-whipped the man,
whatever were the colour of his coat, who did that thing.
And even since, so little of that forbearance, which I
have
now
, had I then, that I deliberately told the story,
among them that knew him; they did not appear
surprised
;
they had never suspected him of a heartthey knew
that he was full of worldly wisdom, and intrigue
prudent
electioneering intrigue, at the time;and I meant,
if I ever met him in company, that would be wise enough
to listen, and remember, and not interfere, to tell him
the story to his teeth. But that thought, I have
abandoned
.
An angel won me from it. She smiled upon me;
and the sacrifice, almost the first, yea, it
was
the first,
of a purpose so solemnly resolved, was made. I
forgave
himfor her sake.
I have now done, Mr. Harrow. Do you see the
parallel
?
Had you read my letter, sir, you would have
found a gentler spirit, it may be, than you expected; and,
had you continued to think well of me, till my own lips
condemned me, I could have convinced you, that all which
you have lately heard, might be
true
; and yet, that I was
not
very
guilty. Has your charity never imagined such
a possibility? I only suggest it. I leave it to your
meditation. I scorn to win any such heart back to me.
Were you young, I should smile at your rashness, and
forgive it; but one so old, so seemingly generous, so much
above other men, in the calm of philosophyI have no
hope of such a man, when
he
acts like a boy. I do not
respect you as I did. I no longer value your good opinion,
as I have.
The following remarks are for your eyes, and for Mr.
Lancy's. Whether
you
ever see them, I care little,
now
.
There
was
a time, when I would have written them over,
for
your
eyes, alone; as I would, for those of my own
father
.
But you are all alike, old and youngmere men;
fuller of infirmity and blindness, as you verge upon the
tremendous threshold of darkness and eternity. Do not
misunderstand me. I have written them, only in
obedience
to my
promise
. It is no longer a pleasure for me, to
write for your eyes.
I shall not attempt to follow the author in the order of
his reasoning; but, I will examine what he, and many
others have said, upon the same subject, just as their
several theories may happen to present themselves to my
mind. The question is this: reduced to its elements.
Whence is the pleasure, that we derive from the exhibition
of tragedies?the narration of murders?the
representation
of battles, in painting and poetry?the sight of
bloodshed
and horrour? Is it pleasure? If not, why do we
seek it with such avidity? All agree, that it
is
pleasure.
One man will tell you, that our pleasure is derived
from a comparison of our circumstances, with those of
the sufferer. He will say, it is not sympathy, but
selfishness
.
Is that true? If it were, this pleasure would increase, as
that difference became more striking and evident. I
am in my house, by a warm fire, where I can hear the
storm beat upon my roof, and the beach roar. I feel
pleasure. The sense of security is delightful. But if
my pleasurea rise from that
sense of security;
if it be
the result of a comparison between my situation, and
that of those, who are exposed to the storm, the peasant,
or the mariner, then would it augment, in proportion as
I saw that exposure encreased. Of course, if the skies
thundered all around me, while I stood safe; and all the
winds, and all the waters raged; and I could see the
apparition
of ships, drifting in the hurricane, while my
own dwelling stood unshaken, I should be the happier.
Nay, let a ship drive upon the breakers, at my feet. Let
me look out in safety, from the illuminated window of
my strong cottage, upon the miserable, drowning
creatures
,
below; as the difference between their situation
and mine, is the cause of my pleasure, that pleasure
would then be at its height. But it is not. It is not
selfishness, then. It is not a sense of security. It is not
a comparison of situations.
It is gratitude to heaven! another will say; gratitude
for being sheltered and sustained, while others wander,
unsupported, in the iron tempest, over the unsteady
waters
.
But no, it is not gratitude. For, if it were
gratitude
;
and that gratitude arose as it must have arisen,
from comparisonthen, our pleasure must have been
greatest, when the difference between our situation, and
that of the sufferers, (or any sufferer,) was the greatest;
for, then would our gratitude be at its height, together
with its cause. No, it does not arise from gratitude,
for the very reason that it does not arise from
comparison
,
and a sense of the difference in our situations.
It is your consciousness of security; repeats another.
Is this true? I stand at my window, and listen to the
skies, while they roll over my head, in thunder. The earth
rocks under my feet. The lightnings of heaven blaze
upon the ocean; I see it all white with foam, and the
clouds in its bosom. Am I more
secure
now, than when
the skies were blue, and clear; the ocean in a sweet sleep;
and my dwelling in safety?
Besideat this moment of peril, I see a fellow
creature
,
ready to perish; he is upon the very brink of the
precipiceor weltering, and blinded, upon the surge.
I climb the precipiceI leap into the breakersI save
him. If my pleasure were only the sense of
security
,
why did I relinquish it, so foolishly?my security grew
less and less, at every step. Yet, I persisted. It was not
my sense of security, then. As little, was it selfishness;
for
that
would have withheld me from the peril of
humanity
.
Nor, was it the difference, discovered by a
comparison
of situations; for had it been, I acted most
unwisely
,
by diminishing that difference, as I
did
, in
exposing
my life; and, had it been
that
, my pleasure would
have diminished, with the difference.
Y 2
But it is your sense of danger, that thrills you; says
a third; and the emotion is pleasurable. Impossible;
for if it were so, there would be no cowards. We should
seek danger with more care, than we now avoid it.
Battle
would be no longer terrible to any man.
But what is it, then, that gives us the deep and
beautiful
emotion, that we experience at such a season of peril?
It is not, that we are pleased to be in danger; but, that a
sense of danger wakens our spirits and faculties; puts us
to thinking of our dependence, and of God's power. In
a calm, blue day, we feel a sleepiness in our serenity.
We do not so much
feel
, as breathe. We are not
conscious
of
safety
, till in danger. So, we think nothing of
health, till it is about to depart from us. Do we love
sickness, because our eyes are brighter in sickness?
Nobut we have learnt to value health, because we have
but little left. So, we love safety, in proportion as it is
diminished. The storm comes up, while we are reposing,
half asleep, under the trees. Till there was danger,
there was no
safety
to us; for we saw it not, felt it not.
It
is
, therefore, the sense of security, which is one
ingredient
,
in the beautifully compound feeling that we have
at such a moment.
But, as that feeling of security diminishes, and the
danger becomes more alarming, we are troubled, and
terrified. The mind is frightened from her
contemplation
.
The spirit's devout breathing of gratitude is
followed
by supplication. She is terrified from her
devotion
.
That we are pleased with a degree of danger, is
certain
.
There is something warlike and agitating in what
is dangerous: hence athletick sports, racing, hunting,
fencingtilt and tournament. But the moment, when that
peril is so great, as to prevent our faculties from moving
loftily;the moment that the activity of thought is
palsied
;
the lights of the imagination dimmed, by the
nearness
of the peril, or its magnitude, that moment our
pleasure ceases. Danger is pleasant, just exactly to that
point, and no further, where the chief play of the mind
is produced,or rather, the most intense excitement of
some one faculty, without the prostration of the rest; and
this will be endured to an inconceivable extent, where
we know that it is in our own power to withdraw, when
we please, from the danger.
Another fact, somewhat mysterious at first, but found
in analogy, with the commonest operation of the mind,
is this;that, in proportion as the quantity of our safety
decreases, the value encreases. Diminish the quantity,
and the quality improves. Our health is another
example
.
Riches may be another. Few men will part from
their last dollar. But many risk their last thousands
every hour; and part, without emotion, from many
thousands
.
We
feel
sensible of our security, and of its value,
only
when about to lose it. I have a friend, a wife or
child, no matter which; but the blessing is inestimable.
I say this. I feel it. Yettouch that friend with
sickness
.
Let death approach that wife. Let pestilence
breathe upon the mouth of my babe. With what
distracting
tenderness, I now doat upon it. How different are
my feelings! We only
feel
the chord that is tugged at.
Were my pleasure the growth of
security
, I should be
more an d more miserable as that security diminished.
But I am out; and when all that is so dear to me is in delicate
health, I love her but the more tenderly for it. Were
this not an appointment of heaven,---in its affection, the
sick bed would be desertedthe chamber of sorrow
would become a hermitage;the desolate and bereaved
would be leftabandoned and alone.
Thus far, I have spoken of many theories, advocated
by Hume, the Abbe du Bos, Fontinelle, Campbell, &c.
without distinguishing them; but I may now be more
particular, for a time.
The Abbe du Bos contends, that such pleasures are
sought, like gambling, to awaken us from ennui. It
matters
not what the emotion be, says he;the stronger it
is, the better. The more afflicting and disagreeable
certain
spectacles may be, in themselves, the more
acceptable
they are, because more efficient in relieving the soul
from that oppression, which is so insupportable to its
energies
.
But this, I believe, is hardly true. Beyond a
certain point, such excitement becomes painful; and is
avoided by the most diseased appetite. What woman,
though half dead with the vapours, could see a man
broken
,
alive, upon the wheel; or even an amputation
performed
,
with pleasure?
Fontinelle says, that pleasure and pain differ not much
in their cause. Pleasure, pushed too far, becomes pain.
Pain, a little moderated, becomes pleasure. Take the
example of tickling. Thus, too, there is a soft and
agreeable sorrow, which is only pain diluted. But, can
this be true? Says anothera cramp is painful; at what
time does it become agreeable? A great disappointment
disturbs and grieves usyet, who is pleased with a slight
one? A great insult enrages usat what time is an
insult
agreeable?
Hume subverts the doctrine, while endeavouring to
uphold
it. He maintains, that our pleasure, at the
representation
of a tragedy, arises out of the aggravation of
natural misery, which we see. But, if this were true,
the most extravagant caricatures of misery, would be
most delightful to us;and, if it be the
art
of the poet, I
would ask what pleasure we can receive, when that
art
is visible; and our pleasure arises from the
aggravation
of certain sufferings? If we see that they are
aggravavated
,
are we not angry at the trick;and if we do not,
how know we, that
exaggeration
is the cause of our
pleasure?
Doctor Campbell follows them all; and, at last, gives
his own, which makes the pleasure in question to consist
in a certain self-complacency that we feel, in finding
ourselves
so kind hearted;next, a beautiful compound,
which is somewhat unintelligible to me; and thenbut
I have somewhat to say of my own notions, on the
subject
;
and will leave Dr. Campbell to the author.
We are more interested in terrifick and calamitous
events, because of their unfrequency; and because they
excite
a livelier and more vehement sensibility. The
scenery
of a tragedy, if warlike and turbulent, is the same.
It has less the air of vulgar life, too. And sorrow
impresses
itself more durably upon the heart than joy.
Sorrow leads us to contemplation; suffering, and the
aspect
of suffering, to retirement, where its visage sinks
into
our heart. But joy leads us abroadand we forget
it. We laugh at farces, and forget them. We weep at
tragedies; and our memory never lets go its hold upon
them.
Beside, pleasant skies, good health, perfect security,
the drama of common life, excite no reflection; or, if any,
reflections that are unfavourable to enjoyment. We see
others happy; and it often obtrudes our own sorrow upon
us, with more force;others, in health, and strength, and
beauty, and we feel doubly unhappy, in our weakness
and deformity, as something marked out for the peculiar
displeasure of heaven. Not so, at exhibitions of another
character; then, we run, with avidity, over what we have
to be thankful for, and delight in displaying it. In the
former case, envy and discontent, are often awakened;
in the latter, gratitude and submission.
At tragedies, the sickness and deformities of another,
remind us of our own good health, or person. The mind
delights in finding and imagining parallels.
Thus, bright skies, and pleasant scenery, excite
painful
emotions. Stormy skies, and the face of calamity,
excite pleasurable emotions. The latter are
remembered
longest, and, consequently, give most pleasure.
And the sum of my whole theory, is this. Whatever
gives a brisker circulation to the animal spirits; or, to
the intellectual spirits, without agitating the mind so
much, that it cannot think, is pleasurable; be it danger,
storm and darkness, or tragedy. It must have the
faculty
of exciting reflection, without disturbing us. We
must be sufficiently awake to compare, without being
terrified by the conclusion. And the simple definition
that I would give, is thisthe pleasure that we
experience
,
is only a
hurry of feeling
. It is derived from the
disposition that we have, in common with race horses, to
keep up with whatever we see; and outrun all that we
can!
And, whatever excites the mind to the greatest activity,
without overwhelming it, is the most pleasurable to it,
for a time. But, beware how you overwork it, by
repetition
,
or continuity. The faculties, physical and
intellectual
,
hold too intimate a dependance, for either to be
trifled with. If you will preserve the freshness of
sensation
,
the tone of the instrument, you must keep the
chords and nerves in gentle but continual exercise.
I ought not to forget, however, that there
is
a pleasure
in seeing theatrical representations, totally apart from
this. What is naturally disagreeable, and even
disgusting
,
in itself, may become beautiful, exactly in
proportion
as it is
naturally
represented. Morland's hogs,
for example, wallowing in filth. So, too, a murder
upon
the stage may gratify us, in proportion to its
faithfulness
,
which, if perpetrated before our eyes, in reality,
would drive us distracted.
Our pleasure, in these cases, it will be perceived,
grows out of admiration and love for human talent, and
the faculty of imitation;and has nothing to do with a
wicked or corrupt heart, or beastly imagination.
I have now done, Mr. Ashton; but, as we are probably
about to part, forever, I cannot say farewellno, I
cannot
,
in the spirit with which I began. I am near my
grave. You, perhaps, are near yours; for you are an
old man, Mr. Ashton, and cannot be long for this world.
We may meet, sooner than we expect. What shall I
say to you, then?
This
, and this only. Man! I was
worthy of your good opinionhere is my heartread
there is my judgedo I tremble? No, Mr. AshtonI
would not tremble, not before my Maker, in aught that
relates to
you. You
have nothing to complain of. But
why need I say this? It will all appear there. The sins
that I have donethey are in his book. He will do
justly
with me; and I shall prostrate myself, that he may.
But, in that book, there will be found no sin against
you
.
However, we are about to part. I feel no animosity, or
but little, toward you. I am not sorry that you
returned
the letter, as you did, unopened. It has left the fame
of one, that is yet dear to me, in
my
keeping; and there
it shall be, until this heart be dust and ashes. But, why
did you return my offering so unkindly? Could you not
bear to be loved by me? I had no fathernone;nought
but a poor, desolate mother? I went to you, with my
heart, naked, in my handyou put it back. Was it wise?
Is it wise to turn such fountains as gush
here
, into
fountains
of bitterness? It is not. Old man, you have
sinned
.
You have shaken my reverence for age. Yet, I
could have forgiven it. I could have remembered our
common infirmitiesyour liability to impositionthe
generosity of your nature. Yes, I could have appealed
to thatI
could
but I scorned to do so. No!you had
doubted me, insulted me, and cast me off, when my
vindication
was in your hand. Yet
sir, I forgive you
.
Farewell, forever.
ED. MOLTON.
Rev. Mr. Ashton, London, Eng.
CHARLES GRENVILLE TO HIS MOTHER.
My beloved mother
After all my wandering and trial; after so many
vicissitudes
and disappointments; so many changes in
myself
,
and so much caprice in others, I have at last, I think,
a prospect of being happy. Yes, mother, I have, at last,
found the woman, whom, I believe, fitted by heaven, for
my happiness. My feelings are serious and devout. The
hey-day of my boyhood is past; and I have learnt to
distrust
and tremble at those sudden prepossessions and
prejudices, which, once, were well nigh shaking my
reason
to the centre. I have found the woman, at last, that
I can love and reverence. One, I had seen, before, whom
I could have loved, and
did
love, as you know; but oh,
she would not permit me to
respect
her; she would not
permit that I should enshrine her, and sanctify the place
of her dwelling, as a spot unapproachable to aught of
sensuality or corruption.I found another, however,
heaven forever bless her, for her goodness! whom I
believed
to contain within her bosom, the noblest principles,
the most generous sentiments, the most devoted and
sublime
affectionI waited, only till her heart were in
blossom
,
and fruitage, to offer her mine. But the vine was
not for me. Others, have I seen, two others, who were
lovely and estimable women; but I had not the courage to
think of either, as my
wife
, as the head of my table;or,
as the mother of my children. They had no experience,
none; and I would not trust, unthinking as I am, the
everlasting happiness of my babes, to them, whose
experience
went scarcely so far, as the fashioning of a cap, or
the plaiting of a ruffle. But, there was
one
one, about
whom, you felt so sensible an alarm, when we were last
together, whom I could have borne to think of, in that
solemn and sublime capacitya wife and a mother.
She was trained to the office. The large family, so long
subjected to her watchfulness; her character, its
impressive
seriousness; her sincerity, as manifested in her
advice
to me;all these things were of weight; and though
my situation and honour forbade me to think of her
then
,
in any other light, than that of a friend; yet, since then,
and often since her marriage, have I thought of her, as
better fitted for my happiness, than any other woman,
whom I ever met.
But, I have found another; and, as I cannot bear that
an emotion of my heart should be unknown to the most
excellent of mothers, and the kindest of sisters, I have
thought fit, thus early, to apprise you, that I have now
found the woman, whom, if I
can
marry, I
will
.
Do not charge me with precipitation. It is true, that
I have not known her long; and have no surety that my
suit will be acceptable; but, I have long known her
character
;
and long, long since, met her, under
circumstances
,
that can never be effaced from my remembrance,
which established the goodness of her temper. Her
disposition
is what it should be; gentle, and patient, perhaps,
beyond example; certainly, beyond any example, within
the reach of my experience. But, contrary to the
general
rule, she does not want for spirit; and her talent is of
the highest order. There is no pretension about her; but,
I am justified in saying, that, in some matters, she has no
rival. Her family are unexceptionable; or rather, were
so; for, she is an orphan, and is now left upon the charity
of some distant relatives. This state of dependance, is
galling to her, I am sure; for it must be, to every
generous
mind. Yet, she is discreet enough to be cautious,
in leaving it, for one, from which there is no escape, but
by death. She has had many offers, and some, that few
would have had the wisdom to reject.
My temper has undergone a radical improvement since
I have known her. It is only a few months, to be sure;
and there is something not a little ridiculous, I confess,
in ascribing such an effect, to the influence of a young
girl, upon a man of my settled habit; yet, it is the simple
truth. She has done more toward effecting a
reformation
in me, in several points, within this short time, than
all the admonition, and all the entreaty of them, that I
most love, continued, without intermission, for many
years. Judge of her influence, then. If you were to see
her, you would love her. Her name! her name! I hear
you
ask; by
you
there, I mean Anne; for I can see her
blue eyes laughing brightly over the page, and her red
lips parting impatiently, to practice the name of her
intended
sister. Well, her name is Juliet R. Gracie. Is
she rich? Nonot worth a dollar, thank heaven. Is
she handsome? No. Smart? No. Fashionable?
No. Of high family? No. Then, what is she? I'll
tell you, Anne, if you will only listen to
me
, a moment.
She is modest and sensibe;pure of heart, and gifted
with a beautiful spirit. She has genius, and true natural
sensibility, gushing out for the real, not the imaginary
affliction of life;she has patience, that sweet
tranquilising
spirit, which makes martyrdom contagious. She
has an affectionate disposition; fine, intelligent eyes,
bashful
as love, and instinct with the subdued expression of
a passionate, deep, and settled spirit, darkening to their
very centre, with the secret of her bosom; sweet lips, full
of wisdom and gentleness; a countenance, where there is
nothing to strike you, nothing to dazzle, nothing to
intoxicate
,
or astonish; but every thing to love, for it is
innocent
and lofty. Her person is excellent, without
being showy. It is, like her faculties, good, but unfitted
for display,withal, however, so delicate, that I
tremble
for her. Her constitution may not be broken; but the
Z
tincture of health is uncommonly variable, upon her
cheek; and the paleness upon her forehead, too, alarms
me.
Her fortitudewould that I could speak of it, as it
deserves
!but
I cannot. Of her sincerity, that noblest of
virtues, however, without betraying her confidence, I
may be permitted to say, that it is positively
sublime
.
She has dared to tell me, what few women
would tell any man. I respect her for it. It has
given me more confidence in her. She has loved before.
The object, I have heard of. It is no light thing to
be
his
successor, in the heart that he has ravaged and
devastated
.
Yet so it isand I
shall
be, if it be permitted
unto me. I am now waiting my doom. My happiness
is in her keeping. Heaven bless her! Whatever be her
determination, heaven bless her!
Yours, my beloved mother and sister
,
CHARLES GRENVILLE.
HELEN TO HER MOTHER.
Oh, my poor blind mother! And can it be, that the
unnatural daughter hath made the last hours of that
parent
dark, who, in the helplessness of
her
infancy, would
have fed her with the light of her own eyes! Can it be
my mother, that the little Helen, thine own, thine only
daughter, who was fed of thy beauty; and whom thou
wouldst have nourished with thy life-blood, hath turned
upon her mother, in the day of her bereavement; and
smitten
that bosom with death, where she once nestled so
innocently
!those
eyes, with blindness, that wept away
their light upon her----O, my mother! my mother! What
have I not suffered. The innocent babe, the unpractised
child, whose ways were like the thought of thine own
heart; she, who, in the morning of her days, would not
have brushed away the dust from an insect's wing, with
rudenessshe, who wept, if the bowed lily wept, or the
pale rose shed its perfume, with a sickly quivering of the
leafeven she! what hath she becomean adultress!a
murderess!a parricide!She hath slain more than one
husbandshe hath! O, no, I dare not tell the truth.
He, the blessed martyr, he, whom thou hast unwittingly,
so often called down the lightning uponhe, my living
husband, is the man! He is the
injured
the wronged
the broken hearted! He is dying; and I have destroyed
him. Yet hath he forgiven mewept over me; blessed
thee, my mother, and the father that hath followed me!
O, how little thou knowest him! Would that I could tell
the whole. But the tremendous secret may not be told;
nay, who shall tell it. I have only a faint imagining
of the truth. I cannot speak. My faculties are bound.
My husband, O, bless him, the noblest and the truest
heart that ever beathe hath forbidden it, and my father's
eyes look awfully down upon me, in the deepest
midnight
,
when my heart is meditating treason to the vow;
for I would tell itI
would
, if I might; and then lay me
down and die. But one dayO, it will come! Heaven
will not permit the abused to go to their graves dishonoured
if it do, there is no justice in heaven.
He is now lying in the next apartmentnay, perhaps,
is now meditating on the devastation that I have caused,
I
,
whom he hath so loved!
I
, to whom he hath hewed down
his idols, one after the other, Love! Ambition! Revenge!
IOh mercy
mercy!
I, that am so wicked, and
worthless, and miserable. O Moltonthou! before whom
my spirit could not stand upright, even at our first
meeting
,
how will it meet thy rebuke, when thou shalt know
all!all!. By the throne of the Eternal, mother, the
fierce spirit that wears me, must have space and height
for its operation. It must be free. Pity meO, pity
methe awful mystery that encompasses me, as with
a web of darkness and fire, may not be broken by
me
;
it may not, for a time! but when it isO, my mother,
thy heart will break with it; and thou, O my husband,
my husband!even thy great bosom will be shattered by
it! Mother, why was I born? What deadly sin hadst
thou, or thine ancestry committed, that, upon my poor
head, there should accumulate this weight of horrour and
consternation!forgive me. I know not what
I say. I am forbidden to write to thee. Father has
written, perhaps; and has told thee that I am well. Do
not believe him, mother. I am not well. There is a
weight herea fire hereunquenchable;a weight, that
the hand of God only can lift. Pray for me, mother; I
cannot pray. The dark, frightful countenance of
Remorse
is now pressed to mine,he sucks my breath---I
feel it now, now!and my poor lips,O, they are
parched to cinder. Hush! there are strange sounds at
midnight;it is near the time nowI wonder if Edward
hears them. I don't knowit would be difficult to tell.
He betrays nothing by his words; but his hand has grown
mortally cold; nay, his whole arm, as it embraced me;
and the thick, icy sweat has started out, all at once, from
his forehead, as it lay upon my cheekI have observed
it. He thought me asleepa cold tremour went over him
and he drew me closer to his bosom, like one that will
not relinquish what it most loves, though he
be
supernaturally
required. Ha!nay, I hear nothing. But I
feel somebody near me. I dare not look upI continue
writing, yet my pen will scarcely move over the paper.
It looks over me---I feel the coldness approaching---I
have grown familiar with horrour lately---II
It was my dear father. To whom are you writing
Helen? said he, To my mother, sir. Be careful not
to alarm her, said he, impressively. I promised to obey.
Have I not kept the promise? O, mother, you are not,
you have not been alarmed, have you mother?
Ah, would that I were near you once more!---would it
not refresh this poor wasted and desolate heart? It would.
You would weep for me---love me the better, for my
transgression
,
as a mother loves her sick babe the more for
its sickness. Why art thou not here? Yet no---stay
there, my mother, stay
there
. It is wiser---for, if Molton
die---lo!---mother do thou pray for me! The very thought
struck upon my brain, like a clod upon a coffin lid. The
hollow sound is there yet. Let it not pass away. I
care not how soon I am delirious---once so, my
obligation
ceases---I am no longer accountable. Mother, pray
for me;---do you ever pray, now?You, who were once so
good, so sweet, so constant in prayer? No, you do not
---what! not pray---woman! look at me. See what you
have brought me toMe, Helen!---me, your only
daughter
.
Had you prayed-- devoutly---taught me to pray,
when my little hands had strength to join themselves
together
,
the blessing were now upon your own head.---
But you did not. I knew no prayer---I was spoilt.
Behold
the consequences. Yet---O, my mother, I do love
youI do. It grows darker, darker, much darker
farewellheaven bless you, and forgive me.
HELEN MOLTON.
FRANK TO JOHN.
Portsmouth, N. Hampshire
.
Dear John
What you have told me of Molton amazes me; but, I
am most concerned, and most cruelly sensible and
interested
,
in what relates to Mr. Grenville and Juliet. It
cannot be, I am sure, that her heart is made of such a
material
.
Yet, it mayand there is no reasoning with the
affections. The gentleman in question, I know nothing
of. The worst fault that I can find, is, what seems to
be something else, in your estimation. He has no
enemies
.
At least, it would appear so, at present. If it be
true, he must be insignificant. Virtue and distinction of
character, will have enemies. Good men are never
without
them. Fools have no enemies. He who has no
enemies
,
has no friends. Jesus Christ had enemiesand
the best and wisest always have had, and always will
have. It is a part of heaven's appointment of trial and
temptation to man. Can the wicked and base feel other
than enmity, for him that arrays himself, boldly and
constantly
,
against their favourite indulgencies? Nounless
Z 2
there be imbecility; and that is no barrier. But, enough
of him. He is unworthy of her. Beside, there is too
great a disparity in their years. It is less apparent now,
than it will be; his habits are settled, hers are not. A
man and wife, ought to grow old together, like their
servants
and their furniture. It is preposterous to mingle
generationsnay, wicked. Heaven hath always
paired
the youthful, unless, when it would punish vice, or
make avarice ridiculous, or lechery hateful. Enough.
Of one thing, I am certain. She will never marry,
without a disclosure of her heart, and its whole history;
and God help the man that consents to occupy a tenement,
that is haunted by Molton. I know not who he isI
know not what are his powers. He appears to be, only
a plain, positive manvery direct, and energetick; but,
he has the mysterious faculty of consecrating to himself,
and
forever
, whatever he touches, even in his wantonness.
I have found it so. I do not say this, in bitterness. But,
if Mr. Grenville have the courage, for she will never
deceive
him, to run the risk of having his repose darkened,
and his temples bleached, by the presence of Molton's
spiritlet him, in heaven's name! But, mark my words.
The woman will deceive herselfMolton will abide
there, and he will know it. Her memory will be
his
her thought
his
her tears, even in the arms of her
husband
,
his
and his alone, forever, and forever!
Let me quit the theme;it is hateful to me. I could
throw myself down upon the bed, and weep, for very
sorrow, over the calamities, that I foresee. Poor, dear
Juliet! would, that I might save thee!O, how readily I
would, even, at the peril of mine own peacethough my
heart crumbled in the effort. Yet, farewell!it may be,
that heaven hath set its seal upon thy frontunspotted,
unprofaned, a sweet flower, to die in blossom. Would,
that it were so!thy whole body, sweet, would gush up,
in violets and snow-dropsfarewell!and now, for a
livelier air.
This is a very pretty town, built chiefly of brick, with
a plenty of house room. They have a strange,
convenient
fancy, in this part of the world, of building
prodigiously
large,
roomy
houses; often, of such materials,
that it will cost the rent, to keep them in repair; and, not
unfrequently, I am told, there are to befound, some
venerable
buildings, of twenty or thirty
ages
?no,
years;
which have been so often repaired, and so effectually,
that, like the ship, in which Cooke sailed round the
world, there is not wood enough of the original stock
left, to make a tooth-pick of. The girls are pretty, but
singularly rude, here, and have been much more so, I am
told. Nay there
was
a generation, whose commonest
frolicks were, knocking off young men's hats, or taking
their arms, in the street; driving four horses, standing up,
over the side walks; tying old men's legs and arms
together
;
and chucking cold water into the bosom of a
dapper little parson, that once lived here;and I am,
told
, and what is more, believe it, that it was no
uncommon
thing here, at one time, for the beautiful women of
the place, to manifest a somewhat unnatural
precipitation
,
in the birth of their
first
child; but, it never
happens
to the same person, a
second
time, however. At
church, yesterday, a wicked fellow pointed out five fine
looking women, to whom this awkward affair happened,
nearly about the same time. The physicians were
inconceivably
alarmed at first. It seemed to be quite a
dead set at the common doctrines of gestation; but it was
at last, very satisfactorily accounted for, by the night
air, long walks; and some other indulgencies, of a
similar
nature, persevered in, for rather too long a time,
before
marriage.
Sarah is altogether better; and really, so beautiful, with
the transparency of her complexion, and clearness of her
quick hazle eyes, and the glossiness of her full hair, as
to excite universal attention, even among the women here,
who are, decidedly, the handsomest that I have seen,
for a long while. In Boston, they were frightful; they
turned my stomach inside out, in riding through; though
she says that there are, somewhere, to be seen in the place,
two or three downright lovely creatures;there may be;
all that I say is, that they ought to build temples to them.
This town has been cruelly afflicted by fires; year after
year, destroying hundreds of houses at a time. The
consequence
is that, though an old town, it has the
appearance
of a new one. There is little business done, now
being cut up by smaller places, and so situated, that
Newburyport, another beautiful town, of 8, or 10,000
inhabitants, through which we passed, yesterday; and
Salem, (where Sarah was sickan opulent old fashioned
matter of 12, or 14,000 inhabitants,) and Portland,
which we have not yet seen, take off all its trade. Yet,
the others, with the exception of Portland, are as little
thriving, it would seem, as Portsmouth. Newburyport
was visited by a tremendous fire too, a few years ago;
and it is no wonder that they are so frequent and fatal,
as most of the houses here, forty years old, are built of
pine boards, and caught like tinder, after a little hot
weather. Yet, they have a light, cheerful appearance; and,
for country houses, I like them better than stone or brick,
which are always damp and cold. Portsmouth is the
capital
of the state; and was the seat of government, till
lately; but, for all such matters, I refer you, at once, to
Morse's Gazetteer. My remarks shall be confined to
manners,when I meet with any. In Newburyport,
there are none at all;they look sad; and I should think
the whole population was made up of creditors that could
not get their pay, and debtors that could not pay.
Adieu
FRANK.
SARAH TO JULIET.
I thank you, my dear Juliet, from the very depth of
my heart, for your last kind letter. I have
endeavoured
to follow your advice; and, when we meet, which I
hope, will be soon, I trust that you will see some other
evidence than her word, that Sarah Ramsay is better
and wiser for her sorrow. The dispensation
was
heavy,
Juliet; and my heart was in its unpreparedness. In my
poor father, all its affections were concentrated. All
that had been torn away, from other cherished ones,
had, it seemed to me, fastened upon him, as the nearest
and best, for support and nourishment. I thought that
I was prepared for almost every thing. O, I was
cruelly
mistaken. The blow came, as if it would shatter me.
It felland I was alone. No father;no mother!
no sister!no brother;forgive my tears, Juliet, they
are a relief to me. My poor father, as you know, was
never weakly indulgent to me; but his plain good sense,
his household virtue, and his worldly wisdomthese were
the substantial things of this life, without which, we are
weaker than children. One only thing, did I pray for;
in all others, he was a good man. He wanted that
earnest
vitality of religion, which early sickness, and
little
else
can
, will always teach the sensible and meek
heart, that lovely and beautiful religion, which steals
upon
us, like the dew of heaven, in purity, and freshness,
while we are sleeping.Yes, he wanted
that;
but he was
nevertheless, a good man, practically good, and very
useful. Let us hopeyea, I do hope, in humble
confidence
,
that he hath had meted to him, the measure of
love and forgiveness. Nay, more; I do
believe
it, for,
when we parted, he blessed me, and bade me pray more
frequently, saying that it would be a comfort upon my
death bed. His countenance was serene, but earnest;
and, during all the delirium which followed, with me, I
heard his voice and saw his face, continually. Let us
obey him, my dear Julietmy
sister
. YesI will be
thy sister.And, now, to be less melancholy.
By the way, Frank is somehow or other beside
himself
of late. What has happened to him? Can his
spirits
be artificial? Sometimes I think that they are. A
thought strikes me, Juliethear meit is said, that
Grenville is making his regular approaches. Do not
be precipitate. Situations have their influence.While
I have a home, and a house, it is the home and house of
Juliet. Have I said enough?I shall soon be there, and
then we shall be happy.
Shall I attempt to give you some account of our
journeying
,
and plans? We propose going to Quebec. I
find that a visit to one of my relations, which I shall
make, by gradual stages, will carry me up the
Kennebeck
river, to a place not more than sixty miles from
Quebec; and how can I return without having been
there, particularly with so elegant a fellow as Frank,
for a protector. I assure you that, we attract a
good deal of attention; and, in spite of all his artifices,
I can perceive, by the sparkling of his eyes, and an
occasional
silliness about his handsome mouth, mighty
common in our moments of self-complacency, when we
try to conceal our pleasant thoughtsthat he is much
flattered by it. I write in spirits, Juliet, for I feel in
spirits; and it were a wicked affectation, I think, at
such a season, when heaven is all blue above us, and the
beautiful earth, so green, to shut up our senses in sorrow
for the past. NoI can think of my father, without
forgeting
my Maker. And I can enjoy the colour and incense
that surround me, I hope, without any unbecoming
negligence
of either:but Frank has just left me,
laughing
at the freedom of the women here; some country
girls, I supposethey took his arm without any
ceremony
,
as he was sauntering along, under one of the
most magnificent old elm trees in the world. He was
astonished, shocked at their indelicacy; but a little
conversation
set him right. They were women of sense
and education; and, when questioned, candidly attributed
their conduct to the scarcity of beaux, who, they say,
are in the habit of running away, from their native
town, as soon as they can go alone, and as fast as they
are able. Frank said that he did not wonder at itfor
which compliment, they invited him home. Really, he
says, he found those very romps, whose manners had so
alarmed him at first, and he really had a great deal of
sensitiveness, entertaining and sensible. Frank's
manners
,
you know, would recommend him any where; and,
when he produced his letters, which was not until he was
on the most familiar footing, what was his surprise to
find that some of them were to the fathers, brothers,
and friends of those very women. He was embarrassed,
but they were not, at all, and laughed heartily at the
affair
,
as a good joke.
Salem
.Which we left Saturday morning, appears
to be a place of considerable importance; and, from its
proximity to Boston (only twelve or fourteen miles
distant
)
to participate in all the fashion and amusements of
that place. I was very kindly treated there, and I must say
that the yankee women are much better educated, and in
general, handsomer, more womanly in their deportment,
than we, of the south. I do not think that they have our
grace, finish, refinement and delicacy, or rather
sentiment
;
and their style of dress, to my eye, is unbecoming;
but all this may be prejudice; and I dare say it is, for,
with the fashion, our opinions change, both of manners
and dress. They are more English, and the southerners
more clearly French, in every thing. Their very walk,
and dancing are peculiar, short, hurried and active; like
a money-making people, determined to have their money's
worth. Yet, I have seen some of the best bred men here,
that I have ever met with, calm, sedate, self-collected,
confident, and sensible.
Newburyport
A place about a dozen miles from
Salem, over which road we rattled, with an amazing
velocity
,
in the mail coach (for I have sent home the
carriage
it
was quite too great a care on my mind)
containing
,
I believe, about nine or ten thousand inhabitants,
is really a handsome little town. Frank does not like
it; but I do. It is truewe were not much noticed; but
what could we expect? We only stopped a few hours; but,
during that time, I had the good fortune to meet with
one fine woman, whom I shall not forget. She knows
my relative, and treated me with the plain, cordial,
unaffected
kindness of a relation, or of an old acquaintance at
least. I found her intelligent, pious, and lady-like.
You have heard of the Salem-witches. Many were
burnt there. The buildings are often of wood, and truly
New England.I do not know what more I could say.
It implies all that is honest, shrewd, calculating, clean
and comfortable,
for one generation
. Let the next take
care of itself, seemed the first maxim. But cannot we
account for this better, than by a want of foresight, in a
people so conspicuous for seeing further than their
neighbours
?
The towns grew rapidlylabour was cheap;
lumber
(by which word, they include all
stuff
made of
pine, such as logs, joist, spars, timber, shingles,
clapboards
,
&c. &c. &c.) plenty and cheap; and their trade,
in the early settlement, was chiefly in
lumber
, to the West
Indies; a trade however, that, like our tobacco planting
at the south, was sure to impoverish them that pursued
it, in the long run. It was more important of course, to
men so employed, to keep their little capitals active, and
their labour in its most productive channels. What
were they? Navigation, and shipping. They grew
rich, therefore, in clapboard houses; and are now
gradually
replacing them, as they decay, with brick and
stone.
You have heard a great deal of New England
cunning
,
and Yankee
trickery;
yet, I have observed, that
they, who are most prejudiced against the Yankees, seem
to know the least of them.
I never met with any person
that had been among them, who did not speak of them with
affection and respect
. And I have observed this fact, even
at the south, where, you know, they consider all that are
north, of
themselves
, to be Yankees. Thus, in the
Carolinas
and Virginia, the Pennsylvanians are Yankees. In
Pennsylvania, the New-Yorkers are so. Avoid the
errour
;the
five New England states are jealous of the
prerogative. They are, Massachusetts, Rhode Island,
Connecticut and New HampshireVermont is since
made up among them; and now the District of Maine is
making upso that there will be six New England states,
the people of which, and
they
only, are Yankees. The
fact, that I was about to mention, is this. At the south,
I have frequently heard the Yankees condemned
in a
lump;
but I have always heard the particular
acquaintances
of
the speaker, excepted
. In this way, I have heard
nearly all the Yankees of a large city,
excepted
at
different
times, from the sweeping denunciation! Butthe
prejudice is wearing away. We begin to assimilate.
We
are no longer, in their opinion,a people of billiard
players,slave dealers, and horse jockies; nor they, in
ours, a people made up of dealers in wooden ware, and
long and short sarse
, as, it is said, they call vegetables,
turnips, onions,potatoes being round
sauce;
which
they pronounced
sarse
, and carrots, beats, parsnips, &c.
long sauce
. They
do
call vegetables
sauce;
that I can
aver, for I have heard it often. Another thing that
strikes a stranger from our world here, is the being
waited upon, by the family at the taverns, and
often
by genteel girls. They have their whims, it is true;
but they are a hard working, religious, sober people,
who may always be depended upon, in the hour of trial.
Look at the men of the revolution? Where did the spirit
first appear? Who withstood, so soon, or so steadily, the
continual encroachment and inroad of power? The men
of New England may justly boast of their ancestry.
They were the persecuted pilgrim,mistaken, no doubt,
in points of faith, but never mistaken in his duty to God.
Their family jewels are not hand-cuffs nor manacles;
no convicts were exported to New England;and the
people are more purely national than any other in
America
.
It is rare to see a Frenchman here;and an Italian,
Spaniard, German, or other European is a prodigy.
Blacks, too, are scarcely to be seen; and they that are so,
are freemen, humble, industrious, and orderly.
No, Juliet, we have wronged this people. They have
poured in their population upon us, as we have ours upon
the south. It is the natural appointment of heaven. The
hardy barbarians of the north, have always overrun the
slothful and effeminate men of the south; and they always
will; yet, must we look to the south for genius,here
for talent; there for poetry and rhetorick, and eloquence,
and painting; here for wisdom, law, mathematicks and
scholarship. And so it isthe most learned body of
divines in the world perhaps, of their age, are to be
found in New England. They are a school of
protestant
Jesuits. Do not listen to the vulgar stories about
this people. Ninety-nine out of one hundred, that we have
heard, again and again repeated, as
Yankee tricks
, are
A a
either inventions; aggravations; old stories, newly
dressed
;
or were not committed by Yankees. They are now,
however, the legitimate parent of every trick, as an
Irishman is, of every blunder, no matter who may beget
it. For my own part, I have no reason to believe that
dishonesty is more common here, than with us;if it
were, and practised as a trade, there would be no
dealing
with these men, I confess. They are so persevering;
up early and late; and move with such a substanstial
regularity
,
in all the affairs of life. They are the Scotch
of America.
FarewellI shall write to you next from PortlandI
hope.
SARAH.
JOHN TO FRANK.
Molton is gradually recovering from the wound; but
there is some incurable disease, of which his physicians
are forbidden to speak, that will inevitably carry him to
his grave. What can it be? Can it be the perilous
stuff that a troubled conscience will engender? I know
not. But this I know, that the oldest and wisest of his
physicians, when he spoke of Molton, to me, but the other
day, spoke of him with feeling and affection; and, when
I alluded to this hidden disease,his face altered
amazingly
a
strange expression, compounded of horrour and
doubt, it appeared to me, passed athwart it. I
pursued
my inquiries; but he looked at me kindly, shook his
head, and departed. My curiosity was unappeasable.
I assailed the other two, in succession; but with
precisely
the same success, except that the younger, a free
hearted, noble fellow, about my own age, added, as he left
me, these wordsEdward Molton is no common man.
Helen is perpetually by his bed side;it is not a moment
since I left him, sitting up, supported by pillows; the air
gently stirring the white drapery of the bed; and just light
enough in the room, for all the shutters were drawn, and
all the windows except one, darkenedto see Helen
sitting
on a low stool by him; her face uplifted to him, with
such an expression of awe and delight, of pity and
passionate
lovewith a dash too, of gentleness and
melancholy
ah!
the delirious brightness of her half-shut eyes!
the eager parting of her sweet lips!her short, quick,
deep breathingher dark tresses, wreathed and
undulating
brightly, from her upturned forehead of
transparent
clearnessevery breath a sob!O, by heaven,
brother
,
to have such a creature wait and feed upon my
countenance
,
for one minute, like that, I would consent to
die.
How do I stand toward Molton? Simply and truly
thusI love him, I respect him, more than I ever
believed
that I could love and respect any man but you, Frank.
I feel a constantly augmenting attachment. Every hour
makes me more familiar with him; yet, every hour, I find
him more august. There is a terrible simplicity in the
operation
of his mind, when we are once admitted behind the
curtain. I do not pretend to understand him. I feel that
I cannot. There is more longitude and latitude, more
elevation and depth in his thought, than I am yet able to
conceive. At times I have thought that I was near to the
secret fountain of his strength; that his foundations were
uncovered. I was mistakenthe springs lay deeper,
and the pillars were sunken where I dared not penetrate.
And, at last, the sum of all my discovery is, that, the
nearer we approach him, the more we are oppressed with
a sense of his amplitude. It is like journeying in the
highlands,the elevations that you have passed, are
only
stepping stones to what is before you, no matter how
long you have travelled, or how wearily;and the
prospect
enlarges with your ascent.
Good night
.
Sunday Morning
, .
I have just left my bed. Last night was the first, in
which I have been permitted to sleep soundly; and I shall
spend the morning, until service, in relating a narrative
that Molton has made to me, concerning certain stories,
in which we are deeply concerned. You will let Sarah
have this; I shall continue it, day by day, as I have time,
until the whole be related.
Yesterday, as we sat together;he, leaning upon the
shoulder of Helen, he renewed the subject of certain
stories
;
and went deliberately through them, one by one,
with the solemnity of a dying man, who would be at
peace with all the world.
His words have impressed themselves upon my
memory
,
with a distinctness that is wonderful; and his manner
was so calm and impressive, that I shall not forget it, to
my dying day.
It is true, said he,I do not deny it; that, as is
alleged
,
I did manifest uncommonly premature signs of
wickedness. I was a liar. I should have become a
drunkard in time; for I often drank brandy, with sugar,
until my cheeks were inflamed. I was a coward too.
And I was a thief. I can recal many acts of deliberate
cunning and villany, perpetrated by me, before I was
ten; acts, which have made it little less than miraculous,
that I have escaped the Penitentiary. It is all true.
But did your informer know that I am an altered man.
Mr. Omar, I am but just rising from a sick bed. A man
must have no common degree of hardihood, who can
trifle
with the sacredness of truth, at such a moment. I wish
you to believe me. It will be a comfort to you, one day
or other. You have thought well of me; and I pledge
myself that, the more intimately you know me, the better
you will think of methe more you will love meand
respect me.
You ought to know what I
am
, as well as what I
was
.
At twelve years of age, I undertook, unaided and alone,
the work of reformation. I was a liarI am so no
longer. I was intemperate, in childhood. As a man, I am
temperate, almost beyond example. The taste of
spirituous
liquor, simple or compound, I only know from
memory
;
and, for nine years I never drank a glass of wine.
I was exceedingly profane. Now, you will hardly hear
a profane word pass my lips, from one year's end to
another
.
I was a coward. I am so no longer. I smoked
and was guilty of other vices. I have done with them
all, and forever. Not that I have no vices leftno, I
know better. I know that I have a devil within me
but it is a crowned and sceptred devil. I am proud as
Lucifer. What I have once made up my mind to do,
that
have I always done. No difficulties have
disheartened
me;no danger intimidated me. I appeal to my
life. If I had been a bad man, then, with my
perseverence
and address, was there any thing that I could not
have accomplished? Yet, what do you hear of meevil
report; vague, dark, glimmering and contradictory
speculations
.
My chief characteristick, I believe, is determination,
unconquerable determination. I have learnt to respect
myself. I knew what I can do; and, what is more, in
what time I can do it.
But let me give you some examples. I was a boy
there were but few things that a boy could do, to
distinguish himself. I thought of them; resolved; and, in
a little time, I had no rival. It is of little consequence
what they were; they were a part of my trade.
I was covetous of other glory. I had a friend that
could reason. I learnt to reason, until few were willing,
or able to enter the list with me.
I had a talent, no matter of what nature, that slept,
and might have slept forever, unheeded, in darkness; but
another friend grew conspicuous for his. I arose then,
and battled with him. In my turn, I became known,
and wondered at.
I had a talent for poetry. The world said that I had
no other talent. I laughed at them. I laboured, toiled,
sweated at the furnace of the mind. Still, I was unknown.
Still I was told, that I should live and die a poet, and
nothing but a poet. I resolved, calmly and deliberately,
that I would
not;
I dashed the cup from my lips. I
plucked down my idol, Poetry; reduced her to an
impalpable
powder; and scattered the glittering dust to
the four winds of heaven. I resolved to worship her no
longernay, not even to wait at her temple. I was
laughed at. I was told that I could not abstain; that
A a 2
poetry was aliment, and breath, and life to me. Yet,
my resolution hath been kept, shall be kept, to my dying
day. Not a line have I written since; not a line will I
write.
What I once resolve to accomplish, I already so know
myself, that I feel as if it were half done. I was invited
to join a society. It was proposed to change the night
of meeting, for my accommodation. I visited it at one of
the sittings. I entered into debate;was triumphant,
against many competitors; and proposed, in form, for
admission. The next day, the second officer waited on
me; and, after some stammering, informed me that I had
been ballotted for, and
rejected
. I told him that I
was sorry,
for the sake of the society;
that I considered it
a compliment to
them
, that I had thought of joining them,
even after their importunity; and, that I would not join
them
then
, though they elected me, in a body, and
presented
me a diploma, upon their knees. They
reconsidered
the question. They
did
elect me,
unanimously
. The
same officer came again. I kept my promise.
I belonged to another society. I was one of its
original
founders. It flourished, beyond example. I saw
fit, no matter for what reason, to say that I would quit
it, unless a certain proposition were adopted. It was not
adoptedfor nobody believed that I was in earnest
nobody
thought that I
would
leave the institution. Yet, I
did leave it, and forever. I had supported myself by my
pen, for many years; it was time to embark in a
profession
,
full of discouragement. I was tempted abroad.
I could have been sent to the American Congress; the
offer
was made to me. But noI resolved to succeed, or
perish, in one particular place, because every body told
me that I should
not
succeed. I had no friendsyet, I
deliberately abandoned my only resource, my pen,
because
it appeared inconsistent with my plan. What
then?
I did succeed
.
Thus much, for my peculiarity of temper. Many more
incidents, I might give, but I will not. There are enough
to show you that, if I had resolved to be a bad man
there was nothing to arrest my course, or turn my hand
aside. It is always easier to be wicked than good
particularly
,
when one is beset on every side, by temptation,
poverty, evil, and reproach;without friends, and
almost
without hope; certainly, without encouragement,
except that, which is inwardly furnished, by a proud
heart, confirmed in its experience, and confident of itself,
in the extremest peril. That was my case. Years ago,
I foresaw all that has since happened; all that will
happen
.
I looked upon it steadily, as upon the ebbing and
flowing of a midnight seashattered, it might be, now
and then, in the star-light, by the sudden emerging of
some spiritthe dashing of some great wing that went
over it, or the plunge of some adventurous bark; but
ebbing and flowing, nevertheless, with an everlasting
steadinessand governed forever, by the same
immutable
law, in its tremendous wrath, or in its still more
tremendous repose.
But, to the matter in question.
I was
hated. I was
unsocial; when I left my native village, no blessing, and
no prayer went with me. I went, as to the gallows,
certainly
,
in the opinion of the wise. And it was God only
God, and mine own strength, that turned my destiny
aside.
YesI did once, deliberately insult a lady, at a
dinner
table. Nay, more than oncefor, on another
occasion
,
I have seen my best friend leave the table in tears,
at some inhuman ribalry of mine;and once, I
remember
telling a lady, very distinctly, that she lied, at table,
while her lover was sitting by her side. Nay, it was not,
perhaps, in so many words; but the amount was the same,
for I said this:I do not accuse you of telling a
deliberate
falsehood; yet, the story
is
false; and I have the
charity to believe that you have told it so frequently, that
you now believe it yourself. It was brutal. I am
ashamed of it. But the other case, and I know not which
is meant, was yet worse. There have been those, Mr.
Omar, who have dared to imagine that they could be
insensible
to any thing that I could say. Nay, I was once
told so. I was once told that a person would never think
of being angry with
me
. It was calmly said, but I felt
it. My heart turned bitter, with my breath. That
person
was mistaken. By heaven, there never lived that
human being, whose blood I could not make boil in his
veinswhose heart I could not turn green, in his bosom,
at my bidding.
Tuesday Evening
.Well. The case was this. I
was invited to drink a glass of wine, with a lady. I
loathed wine. My conscience had forbidden it. The
friend that urged me, knew it. The lady, with whom
I was requested to drink, was in a most pitiable
situation
.
She was just recovering from an illness, that had
unsteadied her brain.I would have bled for herdied
for her. But I would not drink wine.
I refused
.
Behold
my deliberate insult. Yet it was chiefly
ignorance
.
I did not know then, that I might be permitted just to
touch my lips to the glass, and leave it. I thought that
the fashion was, to drink it, every drop. Had it been a
mortal poison, I would have drunk it, to make any one that
I loved, happier. But, as it was, my complaisance would
not permit me. I would not take physick for fashion's sake.
I refused; and here, I have a remark to introduce, which
has always been a governing principle with me. Let it
be so with you. I love politeness. I hold it to be the
next best thing to religion, for quieting the rude, and
restraining
the profligate; yet, the true gentleman will
never
be known by his resemblance to any body.His
fashion is his own, full of self-possession and dignity;
he carries meaning and authority in every movement.
You see that he is not fashionablebut you see that he
is something better. You see that fashion, as it is, the
coxcombry and invention of fools, to preserve their
insignificance
from detection, is something beneath him.
Yet, you dare not call him unfashionable. Go where
he will; in what dress he will; in what age he will
among what people he will, it is always the same. But
how would it fare with one of your fine gentlemen of the
common castwere he caught out of his own company,
among strange people, in the courts of Europe?
He would be taken for a man-milliner;a
something
to be played with, and laughed at, by the
ladies
;a
ridiculous contrivance, made to fetch and
carry gloves and fans;an automaton to hold on
by in your lounging.The maxim was this.
When I was in any unexpected situation, no matter how
new or how suddenlymy first object, was to do what
I thought proper, without imitating anybody. If I went
wrong, an air of confidence carried me through; and the
well bred doubted whether I were not better bred than
themselves. But, if they had caught me imitating anybody,
they would have detected my ignorance and awakwardness,
at once; and would have had a standard upon which to
graduate my gentility. If you are in doubt, always act
with decision and promptitude. No matter where you
are.
That
will carry you through. And above all
remember
that---
it is better for a man, to be thought regardless
of form, than ignorant of it
. For the former, he may
be respectedfor the latter, he is always ridiculed. So
it was, in this case. I was hated for my ill temperbut
I was respected, in spite of all, much more, than if I had
made myself sick with the wine.I could appeal to the
lady herself, at this moment; and she would tell you of
her uncommon regard for me.
But there was another case. I wounded the woman
whom I most respected on earth, at the time; I wounded
her to the heart, at table. She arose and left the room,
in tears. It was no premeditated offence. I was not
even conscious that my words had been capable of the
cruel interpretation, which had struck her. I pursued her
to her room. Her husband was my dearest friend.
He was away. I was in some sort the delegated
protector of his wife, in his absence. Judge of my
feeling, when, after begging her pardonshe told me
that had her husband been there, I would not have
dared
to say what I had said. Not
dared
, said I
madam, you do not believe me. I told you that it was
not
meant
. Of course, it would have made no difference,
whether he were there or not. But you know me;and
I trust, know enough of me, to believe that when I
mean
to wound, I leave no room for
conjecture
in the mind.
I strike hometo the very core. Farewell!
I left her.She had forgotten the natural generosity
of her nature, and we had well nigh parted forever; but
we did not. We were friends again. Whether we are
now, or not, I cannot tell. All that I know is, this
that I respect and love her;and, if we ever meet, shall
treat her, if she will permit me, as I did, when we
parted
,
though much has happened since, to make me proud,
and her foolish.Another thing has always been a
maxim with me. It is written in blood. If I suffer
never to let the world know it. If I run my head against
a post, I am the first to laugh at it; and, at this moment,
were I dying of a broken heart, there is not that
creature
breathing, who would be able to say, that he
knew
it, or that he ever heard me complain. But I affect no
melancholy. I have no wish to be interesting. I
cannot
stoop to play the hero, for women and children. It
is the fashion, to be sure, if one wishes for the reputation of
genius, to be very unhappy, peculiar, dark and
magnificent
.
All that is childish to me. I prefer, rather, if I
must act, to
act
cheerfulness.You will forgive these
occasional digressions. I throw them in, as they occur,
merely that you may have a faithful copy of my thought,
in its natural movement and operation.
But perhaps the writer alludes to a very different
circumstance
;
and to one that happened more recently.
Let me relate it, as it was; and then Omar, do thou judge
between her and me.
You have heard of the beautiful Mrs. Warren, whose
husband is known for many things that are especially
pleasantbut chiefly as being the husband of Mrs.
Warren
.
He plays the flute sweetly; is passionately fond of
musick and money;and once, it is said, offered his hand,
with the most familiar air in the world, to the First
Consul
of France. But all this may have little to do with
his wife, who is really, in the company of women, alone,
a very pleasant, entertaining, unaffected creaturebut
in the company of
men
, men whom she means to
astonish
O,
she is quite another matter. It happened that
I was
presented
to her. She condescended to be very
ineffable
.
But as I had heard of her, I determined not to
be astonished at anythingbut rather to astonish her.
Yet how should I do it?There was only one wayto
act
naturally
, speak naturally, and honestly. To a
fashionable
woman, that would be the greatest rarity; and I
should be the greatest monster in the world.
By some chance, it happened, half a century ago,
perhaps
,
that this lady was presented to the Queen of
England
.
Now, it is no light thing, you may know, for a
plain republican, like me, to see majesty at second hand;
and next to seeing the queen, was seeing one, that
had
seen her, you know. I knew all thisyet, if you will
believe me, there was no hurry in my blood.
She spoke of her unclethe general, and his
carriage
.She
managed it very prettily. It almost took
my sight away, I assure you. Yet, as true as you sit
there, my dear Omar, I was able to keep my seat.
She then condescended to mention Mrs. Siddons. I
asked
her, if she had seen her. O yes! said she, with the
practised air of one, that was hand and glove with Mrs.
Siddons. But something, I know not whatperhaps it
was her resemblance to an old friend of mine, which was
really so great, at times, that I was on the point of
catching
her hand, and applauding herand something, of
doubtfulness, in her tone; and a little shifting of the eye,
as she said this, made me resolve, spitefully enough, to be
sure, to push the question home, until I knew exactly the
truth, and the extent of her intimacy.
Ah! said I, in replywell, pray, what were the
talents
of Mrs. S. in conversation?
AhII have
heard
(faintly articulated) that
she is remarkable for the beauty of her conversation.
But such dignity!
In private life?on the stage, to be sure, she
is
queenly, I.
O yesin private life;certainly, Mr. aa
Molton
in
private life.
Was she pleasant and natural in her manner?I am
delighted to find that you
knew
her so well.
NoI cannot say that II knew her
well
. I have
seen
hem!heronceI rememberin the
exhibition
roomsat Somerset house
In the exhibition roomsat Somer!
echoed I, with
a look of unaffected astonishment, and stopped short for
her reply.
She was a little confused. Her perfectly lady-like
self-possession fled for a moment; and she added, a little,
a very
little
petulantlyyes, sirbut it was no
common
privilege to be admitted there.
The devil it was'nt! thought I.
Another might have foreborne here. But II knew
that she was in my power; and I determined to punish
her for such a vain profanation of her good sense. I
reiterated
my question, as I would have examined a
witness
,
without any apparent aim, until I arrived at the
truth
, that all her acquaintance with Mrs. Siddons,
amounted to her having
passed
her once, while she was
sitting
in a picture room.
Wellthe lady read well; and she knew it. A little
book lay upon the table; and, taking it for granted, as
hundreds of people do, who are taught to be well bred, by
such scoundrels as Chesterfieldas people, are cookery,
out of book
,that, to entertain a man, you must
talk to him of his trade, no matter how hateful it
is to him;she began to expatiate upon poetry. And then,
she began to read a page out of Rogers' Human Life,
I believe, about a cricket. She read charmingly. Had
the theme been worthy of her voice and manner, I should
have listened to her a long time, I confess, without
yawning
in her face; but, as it was, I could not make up my
mind to a lie. She finished.
There!
said she,
shutting
the book,
there!
Mr. Moltonis'nt that poetry?
her fine eyes full of enthusiasm.
No!
I answered.
She was thunderstruck. My friend laughed outright;
and I was sure that I should never be forgotten. Such
a violation of
bienseance
. She complains of it yet, I am
told. Well, let hershe is full enough of bienseance;
and her fool of a husband too.
She recovered immediately, however, and, in a much
more sprightly and natural manner, rang a series of
musick upon many a pleasant theme, for a whole hour.
Do pray tell me. Is there anything new in the
literary
world? said she, at last, to me.
My friend looked at me, and smiled. Yes, madam.
said I;Lord Byron has published a new poem.
Ah!what is it called?
Don Juan
.
Can it be had here, do you know?
`I have it, said Iand it is at your service. But
let me not deceive you. It is cruelly condemned for its
licentiousness. My friend there, says (and he has just
returned it to me) that he would not permit his wife or his
sister to read it. Another, who has read it, returns it to
me, with a similar observation.
Dare
you read it? Will
you read it, notwithstanding this;and, on my simple
recommendation? Believe meit will reward you. It
is full of beauty, deep tenderness and passion,
occasional
sublimitypoetry so brilliant, yet so delicate, that
Every touch that woes its stay
Will brush its brightest hues away.
But, full of raciness and pungencyyet, stained with
impurity, profligacy, and irreligion. What say you?
There is much to forgive; much to pity; but not more
than in the School for Scandalnor so much as in Rowe's
Fair Penitent? I have a better opinion of women than Mr.
D  hasI am not afraid to trust them with such a
book.
I will read it, said she, without any hesitation.
That is what I expected, said Iand I have many
reasons for wishing itI want your exampleto
protect
a person, to whom I lent ita young lady.
She interrupted meO, I have read many a page
that I would prohibit to a
young
lady.
I have no doubt of it
, said I, very gravely. This was
too much, for my friend. He roared outright. He
knew and I knew, that the lady had the reputation,
whether
justly or not, I do not pretend to say, not being of
the privileged orderof having her rooms furnished
quite
la franoise
with naked Apollos and Venuses; a
pair of whom, it is said, once frightened a little child,
who ran down stairs screaming, that she had peeped
into
B b
the room!and there were aunt and uncle Warren
standing up in the corner,naked as they were born!
But I respected her the more for her independence. I
love nature. I love that estimable frankness which speaks
promptly, when promptly questioned. If it be not a
virtue
,
it deserves to be one; and is ten thousand times more
graceful and bewitching, than all the foolery and
nothingness
of fashionable life.
Wellthe next day, I waited on the lady, and left the
book with her.
That day, she stayed at home;
and, the
next, she returned me the book,apparently about one
quarter readand in great displeasure. I know not why,
but I believed that she must have read it; and I could
not suppress a resentful swelling of the heart, to
think how I had been deceived in her. I pursued her
to her carriage;she was a good deal disturbed; her
haughtiness disappearedher voice tremblednay, I
will not swear that there was not a filling of her
beautiful
eyeswhen she shut herself in. By the Being that made
me, Omar, I would have gone down on my knees in the
dust, before I would have touched that woman's heart,
unkindlyHad I believed that it was modesty, the sweet
bashfulness of a naked feelingI would sooner have died,
than doubted or tried her. ButI could not believe
this. She had travelled. She had read. She had seen
pictures. The book was no such mighty matter. I had
told the truthand she ought to have believed me; or,
at least, have manifested a less suspicious resentment.
One that
had
an unsullied heart;one that
was
inexperienced
;one
whom I truly, and from the bottom of
my heart, respected,
had
read it. Yet, when
she
returned
it to meher simple, sweet admonition, was only this.
There is your book. I suppose that I ought to be
offended
;but
I do not avail myself of the privilege.
Thus much for this matter.
Good night, Frank.Tomorrow, I shall recommence.
Morning
The next affair is a trifle in comparison. I cannot
bring myself to regard it seriously. No, Mr. Omar; I
have much to repent ofmuch to lament, in sorrow and
humiliation; but I have not the weight of seduction; nay,
nor of adultery, upon my soul. For this, I thank God.
Blood, I can bearbut not the breath of deflowered
innocence
.
Death, I could smile at; but the writhing lip
of an abused husband, would be intolerable to me.
He
might not feelthere are such menbut I, I should feel.
I
should put myself into his place;and my heart would
dissolve with sickness and affright. Would I not be
avenged?I would.But how?Not by letting out the
blood of my betrayers, upon the very sheets that they had
profaned. No that were the revenge of a boya fool.
No!but I would sit down, calmly by them; call up my
childrenstrangle them, one by one, in her presence
and die
die
at her very feet. But not a hair of her head
would I touch, in wrath.Noshe that had once slept
upon my bosom, should never see mine heaving angrily
with her.I should speak no loud wordshed no tear
it may be; but, with my babes, unpolluted, upnrofaned, I
would abandon her, and go to heavenas I might.
But, let me return; my feelings carry me away.
It happened, one day, that I had some gentlemen to
dine with me. I was a brute and a fool, and got drunk.
They, however, were less discreet than I; for I
discovered
it, and went, as I thought, to my own room, to bed.
It was late in the afternoon. While there, I had an
indistinct
notion, that some woman was continually
disturbing
me. I arosemade a dead set at one that I saw,
and tore the handkerchief from her bosom. She was
frightened, I dare say; broke away, and left me,
sprawling
,
near the fire place. The next day, I heard the truth.
I had gone to a wrong room; and a vulgar girl had
been sent to the closet for something. I made my
apology to her mistress; and all passed off very
pleasantly
,
until, one evening, when I saw the same girl, busying
herself in a manner that amused me, not a little, near
my chamber, in such a manner, that I was sure to see
her. I had no respect for her, and felt, I confess, rather
inclined for a game of romps. I invited her into my room,
to set a
button on my collar
. This, I gave, as an excuse
for
her
not for
myself;
for I knew that she wanted to
come in. She came, and I was rather rude to her, I
confess
ityet, it was nothing more than country girls are
bred up toa little hugging and kissing. She made a
mighty fuss about itto be sureconsidering her
vulgarity
and ugliness; but that, I have found always to be
the case
always
the least agreeable are the most
unmanageable
.
Her mistress too, took it up, and carried
her head pretty high, for some weeks; but it was, at last,
wisely forgotten, for just what it was, a foolish, not a
wicked frolick. Nothey who know me, know this
that if I
would
that is, if I had set my heart upon such
wickedness, there would have been no arresting me in
my course. Blooddangerdeath, I should have
laughed
at.
The next case is quite serious; but, notwithstanding
my transgression, at first, I do contend, that, when the
whole story is known, it is
honourable
to me. I met with
a fine looking woman, in the stage coach. Her child was
with her. I entered into conversation with herand,
before we arrived at Salem, in New England, where I
intended to stop, my veins ran lightning. I sat next
to her, upon the same seat; and, when I alighted, her
hand trembledher frame shookand there was a pulse
to her finger-ends. She said, in a voice scarcely
audible
Good
night!I am
sorry
that you are to leave us.
She told the truth. She
was
sorry. It went to my
heart. I had kept up her spirits, for many a weary mile.
I had just learnt her name, and found that I knew
something
of her family. It was very respectable. It was
getting dark, and she would be nearly alone in the
carriage
.
I was not sorry to find, that, if I staid at all, I
must stay all the next day; a thing that I could not do;
for I was pledged to be in Boston. I entered the
carriage
again. I do not tell you
how
I prevailed; but, I did
prevail on this woman, to consent to see me, the
following
night, at a very respectable house, where she was
to introduce me, as a relation of her husbandand by
my true namefor I never use disguise at such moments.
Confidence begets confidence, even in the worthless. I
left her. I went to bed; but I could not sleep. I felt
that I was about to be a villain. I was afraid to be one;
yes,
afraid
, to be so base a thing, as the destroyer of a
husband's honour;so damnable a thing, as the blaster
of a family's peace. I resolved to break my
promise
.
It went hard with me; harder, to break my word, than
to abstain from crime. Butlook at me, Omar. I
never saw that woman afterward. To this hour, we
have never met. What think you now, of my
self-command
of
my principles?
For the next, my heart bleeds. It was a shameful thing
in me. Yet I was neither guilty, nor meditated guilt.
It was merely an unhallowed curiosity; that spirit which
has twice brought me to the very brink of perdition.
Let me beware of the third time. My good angel may
be weary, and let go her hold, at last! But the facts are
simply these. I was in the country. I had the
prospect
of a dreary evening before me, at a tavern, where I had
put up. Some person happened to mention that there
was a quilting in the neighbourhoodI inquired the way;
it was some distance; and, with my usual indifference to
consequences, I hunted
up
the house, entered and joined,
heart in hand, with their frolicking. There were only
two rooms. Both were open, and both were crowded.
In one, was a bed, upon which those that were tired of
dancing, threw themselves, without any kind of
ceremony
.
I was inconceivably diverted, at the flings and
flourishes that I saw;and the house shook as if it had
an ague. It stood high, upon four piles of block; and the
windows rattled to our dancing, like a cart of loose iron,
over a paved road. However, I shall not attempt to
describe
it. I was ready for any thing, and made some
advances
to the prettiest girl in the room. Her
lover
sat by her, a sheepish looking, handsome fellow; and
she repulsed me with rudeness. Thisfrom a woman,
and a pretty woman too, was never very palatable to me.
I determined to be avenged. But no opportunity
occurred
.
I was on the point, indeed, of abandoning her,
and going home with another warm hearted,
affectionate
creature, who, as I helped her upon her horse,
returned
B b 2
my embrace, with a timidity that disturbed my
philosophy most cruelly. Butshe was prettyand I
trembled to trespass upon
her
loveliness; for she had
treated me, imprudently, to be sure, but not haughtily.
I let her escape me;and, unwilling to return to my
uncomfortable lodging, I pushed on, after the company
had gone, to a house at a distance, where I saw a light.
I entered, and met a man who knew me; a man, who had
been indelicate enough, but a few evenings before, to
leave me, deliberately, and pointedly, alone, with
his
daughter, for a whole evening. He invited me to join
in a game at cards. I detest cards. Once, I loved them
I gambledrepented, and abandoned them. I refused.
In sauntering about the house, I entered a room dimly
lighted, in which I saw a woman and a man, sitting
together
,
in silence, by a stove. I approached. It was the very
girl!It was her lover! My heart beat hurriedly. Here
then was the opportunity I wanted. Some bad, very bad
thoughts went through my heartbut they rested not.
They were of evil omenand were scared away by each
other. Yet something, I was determined to do. I
prepared
my plan. * * * * I do not say
how
I succeeded;
but I
did
succeed, as far as I wished. I persuaded that
girl, a modest, sweet girl, who had scorned me, but a
few minutes before, to abandon her lover, and enter a
remote apartment in the same building, with me, a
stranger
.
I will not trouble you with the particulars. I
will only say that she refused to goand that I went,
nevertheless, and waited for her, assured that she would
come. She did come. The room was large;the
windows
were opposite to each other; and there was a piazza
in front. I was afraid of being seen, and led her to a
cornerand was laughing and whispering with her,
innocently, upon my honour, when we heard her
father's
voice. He approached. She was half frightened
to death. He came to the foot of the stairs, near the door,
and called. I know not what he suspected. But my
mind was instantly made up, to an unpleasant
retribution
.
In such cases, I never flinch. He opened the door;
and I walked out, under his arm, under the very
flambeau
that he held!He stood like one thunderstruck.
The door of the opposite room was open. The man of
whom I before spoke, sat fronting it, with his hands up.
He saw me come outand the next moment, he saw the
affrighted girl follow me. He dropped his cards. Can
you wonder at it? The thought went into his heart like
a knife. Here was I, the acquaintance of ten minutes,
found in a dark room with a girl. Could he ever forget
that he had purposely exposed his only daughter to me,
for
hours
?
Mr. OmarI do reproach myself for this. I did then.
And had the father fallen upon me, on the spot, I should
scarcely have lifted my hand against him, even in
defence
of my life. Yesthough my intentions were
innocent
by
this I mean that I would not have wronged
the honour of that girl, yet I did what was worse. I
corrupted
her heart. I blotted out her delicacy. I breathed
upon her lipsand her heart was in a thaw. For this,
I shall never forgive myself. It was cold blooded,
atroeious
vanity in me. How happened it, that I
prevailed
?
I'll tell you. A modest woman has no experience
in the ways of men. She is therefore more submissive,
and obedient. What I demanded of this poor girl, was
demanded with that air of consummate ease, which cannot
be resisted, by the inexperienced. Ask a woman for any
favour, as if you are not
sure
of it, and she will refuse
you, of course; but demand it, as if you have not the
slightest thought of refusal, and it is ten to one that she
grants it, as a matter of course. If she be inexperienced,
she fancies that it would be ill-bred. Take an example. If
you kiss her lips without making any fuss about itshe
bears it patiently. But if you ask leave, or tremble,
or look at her with half-shut eyesshe will never yield.
Why?in the first place, she feels that there is guiltiness
in it; and in the next, she thinks,
that you expect resistance
.
She is obliged to resist therefore, and always does resist,
just as far as she imagines that you
expect
resistance.
If you consider it a mighty favour, she does, too. If
you take it, as a rational contribution, she pays it with
the same carelessness. Thus, in the childish pastime of
redeeming forfeits, kisses go for nothinggracious God!
innocent lips, and soft eyes, are profaned by a succession
of greasy slobbering rascals, without emotion or shame.
Yet the same girls will go deadly sick at the heart, and
feel themselves irretrievably dishonoured, if you should
ravish a kiss from them, alone, in the dark. So true it
is, that we value most things, just as we see others value
them.
The next matter,I know not what to say to it. It
is a false and cruel slander; but, I have heard it before,
and it is my duty to put an end to it. I loved. The
woman that I loved, married another. I never saw her
husband. Years had passed, since I had seen
her
. By
accident, however, I heard that she was on a visit near
me. I was willing to see herbut not secretly. To the
house where she dwelt, I would not go. I had said so,
and kept my promise. There was one evening
one
, that
I knew she would remember. It was that, on which,
I had always met her, whenever I met her at all. I went,
on that evening, to the house of a friend. I expected her;
and she came. She had been to church, but passed me
on the way. She went to the church, but could not stay
there. We met. I was just as composed, as self-possessed,
as at this moment. I spoke to her as I was wont. Yet
my voice trembled not. I took her hand for a moment;
mine did not shakebut hers did. I spoke of her
husband
,her
child; I desired to see them both. He was
not in town; and her babe, I could not see, unless she
would send him where we then were; for I would not,
she knew that well, set my foot within the door of the
house where she dwelt. She promised to send her babe,
where I desired. The next day, I went thereI found
the child, and the mother. I sat with them; and was
constantly in the presence of the nurse, and one or two
ladies
.
This was our
assignation!
Out of that friendly
and affectionate interview, during which we were not
alone for a single moment, (nor have we been since her
marriage,) has been fabricated a story of tremendous
emphasis
.
It is said that we were utterly overcome;that we
wept, and perhaps embraced;that I took her babe, and
cryed over itI!. No, Mr. Omar, you shall judge
of this passionate self abandonment; by some part of our
conversation. She had beautiful hair, and eyes, dark
and melancholy;her husband's eyes and hair, and
complexion
were all dark and masculine. But the eyes of
the child were blue, like mine;his hair the bright
colour
of raw silk, and his complexion transparent. Some
fool spoke of it. I felt the allusion; and, to spare
her
distress
,
immediately observed aloud, that I did not believe
she loved her boy the
less
for his blue eyes and yellow
hair. I promised, in the same tone, to adopt him. We
parted. Was she imprudent? Noso entirely
circumspect
was she, that I never so thoroughly and heartily
respected her, as then. Naythe very evening before,
when she was about to leave the house, it was altogether
more convenient that she should go alone, with me; yet, she
had the wisdom to
insist
upon another lady's going with
us. She was right, our walk would have been innocent;
innocent in thought, word and deedfor the truth of this,
I can appeal to our Makerbut she had a husband. He
might have heard af it,and
might
have been disturbed.
Naythere were other reasons. I was told, and I
believe
it, that her husband never had heard my name
pronounced
;
that he knew not of my love for his wife, when
it was lawful to love her. There was yet something else,
something that I learnt from one that knew her well, and
slept with hersomething that, after her marriage
to another, I ought never to have knownbut enough
to make it wise, that we should never meet, however
happy
she might be, or however assured and confident I
might be.
Yetwe
have
met sincemet, under circumstances,
that the wicked of heart, may as easily misinterpret.
But another was with me. I met her as a friend;my
heart heaved, to be sure, for there were many deep and
passionate recollections in it;my fingers thrilled when
our hands met, and the maturity and dignity of the
woman
had not entirely overcome the witchery and
fascination
of the girl.Let her beware. She is yet in peril.
And it were no light matter for such a woman, one who
might have stood very loftily among women, to err, even
a hair's breadth, from the inflexible line. We may
never
meet again. It is probable that we never shall.
But there are others, more dangerous to a proud spirit.
But why dwell upon the memory of the past. It is cloudy
and cold, to the eye. And I care not how soon it is
forgotten.One thing, I forgot. It is true that she did
arise from her bed, to receive me. But why---I was not
alone, nor was it late. But she was wearied, and had
thrown herself down for a few moments, to recruit
herself
for the duties of a sick chamber. See how the world
will torture the blessedest and sweetest movement of the
heart.
The next girlhow shall I speak of her? I did not
love her; but, in time, I might have loved her. She
was a child, inexperienced, affectionate, and so far as I
could judge, from a short acquaintance, had a good mind.
I treated her like a sister. I was willing to be useful
to her;and, after some conversation with her, about a
course of reading, I offered to direct her in it. But
how should I proceed? She had a father, a rough, plain
man, who was very dear to her, and of whom she was
the idol. I wrote to
him
, and enclosed a letter for his
daughter, desiring his permission to correspond with her.
There was no mystery; nothing unfair in my thought.
I dealt plainly with him, and, as an honest man. I
knew that I could be of use to his child, and I was willing
to be. I told him that I should not mention love in my
letters, nor attempt to be sentimental;they should all
pass through his hands; that I liked his daughter, but that
before I could
love
her, I must know more of her. To do
this, there were only two ways;to visit her, or to
correspond
with her. The first I could not do;and the
latter was the surest, and most secret. I gave him
references
too, for his own security.
The good man could not comprehend me, it seemed.
He had no idea of a rational correspondence by letter;
a conversation, on paper, between a man and woman, who
had not made up their minds to be married outright.
So he told me, very plainly, that he could not understand
my rigmarole;and that, if I had any notion of
addressing
his daughter, I must come upon the ground.
My reply was very brief. I told him, that he had
misunderstood methat I had no idea of addressing his
daughter, and would not go upon the ground.
It was a pity. She afterwards ran away, and
married
no
matter how. I never spoke to her again; and
I hope that the father has never yet had reason to repent
of his conduct to me.Yet, her mother believes that she
loved me, more than her husband, even when she married
him. Some things have came to my knowledge,
however
,
that I think must disturb him, at times. I have seen
his daughter since---more than once---but I did not
speak with her; for I had ceased to respect her. I pitied
her, in my heart, and would have done much for her
happiness
;
but there were many reasons why I should avoid
her. Beside, she was afraid to meet me; I
know
that
she was; and, much as she desired to see me, after her
marriage, I know that she would have trembled from
head to foot, to meet my eye; for she knew my
sentiments
on that subject. She had heard me reprobate
these runaway matches---with no matter whom. They
are never happy. The element of happiness is polluted;
that confidence, which, like the pure spring water,
wells out of the young heart, when it is first smitten,---
that is defiled at the source---when disobedience to a
parent hath once mingled with it.---It is that infidelity,
which, in its eating cruelty, causes the heartstrings to
relax
and decay, in silence.It was
thatthat
, which
made Othello doubt
his
love. She had deceived her
father
the
kindest father!What might a
husband
look
for?---no, Omar, no. Wo, to the man that sleeps upon
a pilfered heart.It is liable to dissolve, and pass away,
in a midnight vapour, at the first approach of
temptation
;
orif its pulse
be
faithful, there will be distrust;
and distrust will work that, in time, which sensuality,
temptation, and death, itself, might never have wrought
together---an entire corruption at the core
a wish for
freedom
. When
that
wish is once felt---no matter how
secretly, in the deep places of the heart, that instant
there is murder and adultery there. It may perish as
the body perisheth, without blossom or fruit; but---the
thought hath sinned; and the flower is bloody, and
polluted
therewith, from that moment, as effectually, as if
the man, who slept upon her chains, and sentinelled her
spirit, had been strangled, sleeping, with her own
hands.
I say nothing of her imprudences. I know nothing of
them. The world are forever busy with invention; and
I have had sufficient experience already, never to depend
upon
any
report. She is young, and if she be kindly
treated, may yet make an exemplary woman
good night.Here we parted for a time.
Thursday Evening
.---I was to go to a ball this
evening
,
dear Frank, but I am weary of dancing, and glad of
an opportunity to renew the narrative of Molton. We
are nearly through now.---He proceeded as follows.
My accuser is indefatigable---yet there is an air of
candour in his representation, which is very imposing,
I confess. The next in order, if I recollect right---but
here are my minutes---yes, the next in order, is the
most disgraceful affair of my whole life. Yet it shall
be told; and told too, without embellishment. I found a
woman, of singular power, in distress, desolate, afflicted
and
desperate
.
She told me her story. I did not believe her; but, an
accident happened soon after, to make me pay attention
to it; and I took some pains to discover the truth. I
found that she was of an excellent family; that I knew
some of her relations; and, in short, after a
correspondence
,
into which I entered with a cousin of hers, I found
so much to confirm and corroborate her story,
with
nothing
to contradict it
, that I determined to save her, if I
could.If you have the patience, I will detain you, a
moment
,
upon
her
story. From her very childhood, she had
been fond of her destroyer. He pursued her, until he
was forbidden the house. She lived with her uncle.
She had been to the wedding of a female relation, one
evening; and met him, for the first time, after many
weeks, while she was returning. He proposed an
elopement
.
It were idle to repeat his arguments. Enough to
say, that he prevailed; and, that she consented to make it,
that very night. She returned to her uncle's. It was the
custom of the family, to assign a particular lamp to each
member. Hers was a little brass one. I mention these
trivial incidents, because they made an impression upon
me, and gave an air of circumstantial reality to her
story
.
She was disturbedand, when her uncle kissed
her, as was his habit, and bade her good night, she took
up
his
lamp, instead of her own, in her disorder, and ran
up stairs. She was just entering her room, when she
heard his voice. Yes!he was calling to her. She could
have fallen upon her face, in her terrour, and confessed
the wholefor she was sure that the secret purpose of
her mind, had been, in some unaccountable manner,
revealed
to him. She obeyed the summons. Her heart
smote her; and she stood before her venerable uncle.
Why Lucy, said he, thy wits must be
wool-gathering
.Thee
has got my lamp. It was true. Her plan
was not discovered; and she was like one restored to life.
She went to bed, cheerfully, confirmed and established
in her plan. When all was still, so still, that she could
hear the beating of her own heart, she took her shoes in
her hand, and prepared to descend. But, how was she
to escape? If she passed out the front way, there was
her uncle's door, always left open; and he awake, if a
mouse stirred. That would not do. But the back way;
she must pass through the servants' room, if she went
that way. But, that way she went. She passed the
sleepers on tip-toe; one awoke, and asked who's there?
But, she hushed her heart, and held her breath, till all
was quiet againand pursued her way. She came to
the bath-house; it was protected by venetian blinds. She
pushed one open, and got out, and stood upon a pump.
From the pump, she stepped down upon the ground.
And here, she had well nigh fainted. A great dog, of
which she was terribly afraid, arose and shook himself,
near her; but he appeared instantly to recognize her, and
lay down again, with a sullen growl. She came to the
gate. It was fasteneda thing that she might have
C c
knownand she had not the power to unfasten it. There
was a hole cut through, to let the dog out and in, however;
and, through that hole, literally upon her face, she
finally
squeezed herself. Her lover was at hand. They
ascended the carriage, and were soon beyond the reach
of pursuit. Search warrants, under the state authority,
were taken out; and the whole country was ransacked
for her. She fell sick with terrour and fatigue. It was
impossible that she could be married in that state; and
it was necessary, in her timidity, that he should pass for
her husband, to justify their being together; and that
they should sleep, at least, in the same
room
, during her
illness. She recoveredbut her ruin was accomplished.
He spoke of marriage;but, perhaps it was fancyshe
thought that his eyes contradicted his words; and she
refused to marry him. They lived together. She bore
him two children. But, the arrow of remorse was in
her heart. She besought a reconciliation. She was
accepted
returned
to her home. But
there
was no
comfort
.
Their very kindness was a reproach to her. Yet,
she bore it;bore the solitude of shame and desolation,
for a long time, till she was insultedinsulted!and,
desperate with passion, she abjured her home, forever;
and fled again, to the bosom of her destroyer.
It was then, that I met her. She was delirious
beset
on all sidesand ready to raise her hand against
her own life. I determined to interpose. But how?
There was only one way. I must acquire an absolute
dominion over her. I must make her love melove me,
better than aught in heaven, or earth.
I succeeded
.
But, before I tell you what were the consequences, allow
me to relate one or two anecdotes. It will show you the
character of her mind and temper. When quite a child,
she took her little sweetheart by the hand, and journied
with him, all over the city, after a man to marry them!
They met an aged Friend. Please to tell us, sir, said
she, sobbing, where the man lives, that marries
people
?
The good man put them on their way, in the
simplicity
of his heart, without further questioning. But
they were lost. It grew dark; and she and her little
cousin, and her future betrayer, all nestled and cuddled
together, upon some stepsand crying lustily, were
found by an older cousin, who was passing, on
horseback
.
Why, in the name of wonder! said he,
children
,
where have you come from? what are you doing?
We have been tototo get mamaried! was
the reply.
The other anecdote follows. She lived alone, in a
deserted
house. A murder had been committed in the
next room. She dreamt, one night, that the devil
appeared
at her bed side, and bade her awake, and get up;
for he wanted some conversation with her. She was
a good deal frightened, at first; though the devil was a
handsome, gentlemanly looking fellow, enough; but he
bade her be quiet; and assured her, that he had no other
business, than a little chat with her. She arose, went
into the next roomkindled a roaring fire; and the devil
placed a chair for her, in one corner; and another, for
himself, opposite. He was quite facetious, for a time.
Now, really, said she, I cannot believe that you are
the devil. Let's see your foot;comeup with your
hoof. He gave a sort of a whisk, and put his hoof in
her lap. Lord!as I am aliveso it is!Wellyou
are
the devil, sure enough; but, after all, quite an
agreeable
oneso. Stop said he.Do you see
that brick?mark it. She obeyed. She took a nail,
and scratched it. Under that brick, said the devil,
is a pot of money.Good night. He arose, and stood
in the door-way, holding on, by the top of the door, which
was partly open. The light shone on his face. It was
very terrible. In that room, said he,
there
in that
further corner she was afraid to looka man dies,
every night. At twelve o'clock, I come to meet him,
It is now nearly twelve.
She awoke; a bright fire was burning, in the next room,
where there was no fire, and no wood, when she went
to bed!There were the two chairs!placed
exactly
as she dreamt.She looked for the brick. It was
marked with the nail;and the watchman, that instant,
cried
twelve o'clock
, under her window!
She crept into bed, in an agony of fear. She lay there,
quaking, with flashes of fire and smoke, passing before
her shut eyes, continually, until day light; when she
arose, and took up the brick, and dug, till the
foundations
of the chimney were loosened, and she expected it to
fall upon her head, every moment. But, she found no
money, and never slept in the house afterward.
I studied her mind. I formed a plan, full of peril for
her, and a matter of life and death to me. She acceded.
I revealed it, distinctly, to the dearest friend that I had,
on earth; but I showed her the letter.
No
, said she.
Here is my last trial. Every thing in heaven and earth,
for me, depends upon this throw. I will never make it,
unless with the front of innocence. If your friend know
the truth, how can I meet him? He may not have the
charity for me, that you have;he may have
his
friend,
too;and my shame is publick, the moment that I
appear
.
Noabandon me, if you will. I have no claim.
upon you. You have saved my life, it is true; and I am
ready to lay it down, at your bidding. But I will never
advance a step, in this plan, unless you consent to
conceal
my history. I did consent. Wo to me, that I did!
I am naturally ingenuous. I hate mystery. Stratagem
is my abhorrence. For all that relates to myself, I am
candid to a fault. I never did that deed in my life, which
I would not have avowed, openly, in the light of heaven,
had I not been deterred by my regard for
others
. Yet, I
consented to
conceal
the truth; nay, in carrying on this
concealmentfor who can say where mystery shall
end, and falsehood beginI used deception and
falsehood
.
But why? I was not conscious of it. I had gone
on, step by step, with insinuation and inuendo, until I
ended in assertion. Yet
this
was my comfort. I shall
prevail, said I. I shall restore an extraordinary
woman
,
a
mother
, a child, a sister, to her own respectto
happiness, and to virtue. Shall I not be forgiven,
then?
Will not all, that have had any hand in the work of
redemption
,
bless me for having admitted their agency?
They will. Nay, Omar, they
would
. Butit failed. It
failed, as every such rash project must; and no matter what
I might have done, by perseveranceI thank God that I
had the good sense to abandon a scheme, so fruitful in
peril and disappointment. Yet, I plead guilty to it all.
I deceived more than one noble heart. I abused the
proudest confidence. I had well nigh broken and
shattered
one brain; and sent a sister, and perhaps a mother,
ashamed and weeping, to their grave. Forwould you
believe itit was a part of my plan, to give this helpless
creature, an asylum in the mansion of my own mother;
and give her, too, for her companion, the purity of my
own sister. It was well that I did not;it would have
killed them. Yet, let me do
her
justice. It was no fault
of mine, that all this did not happen. My plans were
maturedmy promises madeand I put the question
fairly to her, without flinching. She determined wisely.
No, said she, I cannot enter the house of innocence
I cannot pollute the abiding place of purity and affection.
Henceforth I have done with all this dreaming. You
have abandoned me. I expected it. You have not
deceived
me. You told me exactly what you would do;
what you could do; and you have done all that you
promised
,
like a man, without flinching. God will reward
you for it. I have been slanderedbut I was innocent.
I long to meet you once moreto throw myself into your
armsto weep away, forever, it may be, the shame and
oppression that I feel at the heart;but why should I
wish it? I have been too long a burden to you. I will
be so no longer. I will return in the path that you have
opened for me. I will go to my home. I will become
penitent and humble; and, perhaps, as you have so
kindly
said, and so often, too,
perhaps
God will forgive me,
and I may yet die in peace, supported upon the bosom of
a child, whose mother was forgiven for her love of that
child. Farewell!
Omar, you see the extent of my indiscretion. I do not
pretend to justify, or to palliate it. I only say, that, when
I sinned, my heart did not reproach me. There was no
deliberate wickedness in my disposition. But, I was a
fool. I was blotting and smearing my own senses
dashing the perfumed censerand shattering the
pictured
vase of the imagination;profaning the loveliness,
C c 2
and mystery, and enchantment of passion. Yet, I did
not
love
, then. Had I lovedrighteous God!as soon
would I have rolled with the festering leper---fed, and
drunk, and slept, in poison, and death, and rottenness,
as permit aught of impurity, to come near my heart.
That has always been my temper---always will be. I
had not even the plea of passion or habitude, in my
favour
.
No---my mind was above such things. I hated
and loathed the wanton. There were high and holy
places in my thought, upon which nothing of earth, and
such
earth, least of all, had ever trod;---places, within my
heart, where no unclean thing had ever nestled. There
are such places, yet---untrodden, but by God---unvisited,
but by angels. There have I enshrined the woman that
I love. Darkness may be there, and silence---but there
is no licentiousness---no sensuality.
Yes---although it is not true that I have pursued any
woman, steadily, for a time; or any one, without success,
or without obtaining what I sought---yet, it
is
true, that
one had the spirit, the heroism, to trample upon my
power
,
even in its excess. Peace be to her bosom! It was
a gentle one. She was unwise; but her meaning was
wisdom;---and she plucked out my image, from her
gentle
heart, like a cancer, by the roots. Is it wonderful
that her bosom is bleeding and sore yet? No!---and to
the last breath that she draws, it will bleed, with every
sob, and every swell. Do I not grieve for her? I do,
for she was the only woman that I had ever truly loved. I
observe your eyes. I make
no
exception;---and I reveal
not her name. I leave you to imagine who it may be; but
I leave it to your imagination alone. You will never know
aught from me. I shall never mention her again. Yes,
I loved her. I put myself in her power. She might have
used it more gently, for I have a proud heart, Omar; and
it well nigh sunders, when jarred unkindly, by one that
it beats gently for. My voice tremblesI am aware of
itand the light of the candle dashes athwart my eyes,
unpleasantlyperhaps they are wet. It may bebut it
is for the
last
time. I loved that woman. I would have
made her happy. I couldhappier than any man, upon
this earth. But that hour is past now. I could weep for
her;the loss is hers. It is irreparable. Had she
dared
to be my wife, she would never have had reason to
lament
it; butlet us leave the subject. She is a noble
creature, and I wish her all the happiness in the world;
yet, my heart
is
heavy, when I think of her. Married
or unmarried, desolate she must be, for she is learning,
every hour, that I told her the truth, and that I was
mightily dealt with, for one so haughty and devoted.
But who is she, with whom I now live? It is my wife.
I have no further answer. Let that question pass, then.
Yes, it
is
true. A young, and, I believe, innocent
creature
,
did put herself into my way, with tears. I did not
betray her. Yet I might. I did not debauch her; yet I
did wrong her; for I trifled with the hidden tenderness
of her heart. I am sorry for it. I wrought
there
, more
foully, more wickedly, more like a determined and
experienced
scoundrel, than in any other case. Yet, when
she was utterly mine, I forbore. I deserve no praise for
this. It is no praise to forbear from blood, after pilfering,
to excess. There is no merit in withholding the blow of
death, when but
one
blow is wanted, for the
consummation
.
The story of the nunnery; and of my being shot by
the brother of one, whom I had betrayed, is a lie. Yet, it
is a lie of my own coining. It arose out of a simple
frolick
;
but it continued, constantly augmenting in
seriousness
,
till I told a deliberate falsehood to support it. The
whole of
that
story is a fabrication.
The next is a singular affairto this moment an
unaccountable
one to me. I was on a friendly and familiar
footing with an intelligent woman. It had continued for
some time. I met her, as usual, one evening. I saw no
change, nor shadow of change; but, the next day, I
received
the following note:
Since we last met, circumstances of a peculiar
character
have occurred, that render thy future visits
improper
.
Do not ask me why;
but be assured (that) I
shall ever remember, with interest, our past
acquaintance
.
Oblige me by not acquainting S, or any one else,
with the contents of this.
There, Mr. Omar, you now know as much of
this
mysterious
affair, as I, myself, know. I dare not even
conjecture
the cause; yet, that there
is
one, and an efficient
one, I can readily believe; for she was a prudent,
sensible
,
and high-minded woman. There is
one
thought, and
one alone, which lies buried in my heart, that would
seem to throw some light upon the matter. But
that
thought is for no other eye, than my Maker's---not even
for
hers
. It is, possibly, the true one. I replied to her
note. I asked no questions. I only appealed to her
generosity
.
If I were slandered, it was her duty, if it were
proper
, to hear my defence. We have never met, since.
I shall always respect heralways; and I am sure that
she can never cease to respect me. Her name is not to
he told; nor would I mention aught of the circumstance,
were it not that, my own conduct may appear capricious
and unaccountable to some that know me. I was
intimate
in the family. I suddenly ceased to see, or speak to
them. This ought to be accounted for.
Yes, it is also true that I have been the cause of
jealousy
and uneasiness to more than one married bosom;
but, on what ground, as heaven is my witness, I cannot
conjecture. For myself, in one, and the strongest case,
I can aver, that I did not even suspect that any human
being could be jealous of me. It came upon me, like a
thunderclap, at last; and I put myself, instantly, beyond
all suspicion. Mr. OmarI have made more than one
such sacrifice in my time, to the idle and wicked terrour
of husbands. More than one woman, that was dear to
me, as a friend, almost as a sister;more than one, with
whom the extent of my familiarity, was a shake of the
handhave I abandoned, merely in complaisance to the
boyish jealousy of some husband. How little they knew
me! Their safety was in
my
principlesin
my
heart;
not in distance, absence, or coldness. But, it was my
duty to have compassion on their infirmities; and I
obeyed
the impulse. But, believe me, there never was a man
more innocent of unlawful acquaintance, with the
forbidden
property of another. I have poisoned no wife's
affection
breathed
upon no wedded lips(at least, not to
my knowledge)no!but I have always reverenced
both, however unworthily assorted they might be;
however
my heart might beat, or my eyes ache, for the
unnatural
intercourse that I have seen, between intellect
and earthspirituality and appetite. Yet, I have seen
such things, and lamented them; but it was not for me
to reformwhat?the abuses of heaven!
Judge you of my truth.
There
are three or four letters
from a woman, whom I knew abroad. We were
passengers
in the same shipinhabitants of the same boarding
house, for a time. I loved her, as a sister. She was
unkindly
treated. I taught her fortitude, forbearance,
resignation
.
My dealing with her was sincere and high.
If she hath been troubled in spirit, it was no fault of
mine. I did all that a brother could have done, to soothe
and sustain her. There is one, to whom these things,
that I now tell you, if she heard them, would approach
with a power that will appal her. Let
her
be faithful to
the high and holy confidence, that I have shown in her.
To her, alone, is the secret entrusted. She will
understand
me. The secret is in
her
keeping; and while her
noble heart hath life in it, I need not implore her silence.
Heaven bless
her
, forever and ever. May she sleep
quietly
,
when I am no more. That is all my prayer for
her
.
But, for the letters. There they are;---read them. They
are all; and they are very precious to me.
As he concluded, he gave them to me. I will transcribe
them for you, Frank, in order.
LETTER TO MOLTON.
Yes, I will, I
must
, tell you all (that) I suffer. I know
(that) it is not idle curiosity which prompts you to make
the inquiry; and, believe me, the lively interest which you
have manifested, is felt, with warmth and gratitude.
But I dare not trust myself to tell you, how much I thank
you. The voice of friendship or kindness, is irresistible
to me---always was; but, of late, I have been a stranger
to it. I must not listen to it, now. It only aggravates
my suffering, and renders my situation still more
intolerable
.
You must not, therefore, discover any degree of
sympathy for me; but I shall always believe that you
feel it; and even that will be a comfort to me, through
life. You see how I am watched, on all sides---an object
of jealousy and distrust, to those by whom I am
surrounded
.
Feeling and sensibility are alike strangers to them.
They cannot, therefore, understand the nature of your
sentiments, noble and generous as they are. I cannot
describe to you, the pang that I felt, when I discovered
that
he
was a slave to that most degrading vice. My
heart died within me; for I well knew that it would be
incurable;and I knew it to be the source of every
misery
in life. Oh, I thought that I could have borne
anything
but that---so humiliating!---To be the wife of a
man, and the mother of his children, who will
You have often seen me look troubled. Can you
wonder at it? Indeed, I wonder at myself, that I can ever
look otherwise. But, according to the old adage, the
back is often fitted to the burdenand I believe it; for,
many would have sunk under what I have endured. But
it has undermined my constitution, and brought me to the
brink of the grave. Had it not been for the watchful
care, and kind attention of Harriot, I do not believe that
I should have been alive at this moment.
I have been on the eve of separation from him, half a
dozen times; but my poor deserted child always arose to
my view, and prevented it. For his sake, I have made
every sacrifice. My days have been murdered.
I was formed for domestick happiness; but how little
of it have I known! Since we were married, he has never
spent a single evening at home, unless we had company.
For me, he has not one sentiment of affection, I verily
believe; nay, I cannot persuade myself that he ever had,
or he could not treat me with such continual neglect.
After my return from prayer-meeting, last night, he
abused me most bitterly, and was on the point of
turning
me out of doors;---swearing that if ever went again,
I should never enter a house of his. Such is the effect of
a violent temper, which terrifies me to death, whenever
it breaks out.
His estates are neglected; his intellectual powers
destroyed
;
his constitution impaired; and his reputation
irretrievably injured. All this have I foretold to him,
time after time, until, at length, I have given it up,
entirely
.
I feel that I have a double duty to discharge, and
a most imperious one. May God, in his infinite mercy,
give me strength equal to the task!
He has treated me better since the passage, than he
ever did before. You were the first that ever taught him
to set any value on my opinion. * * * *
I have now spoken to you, as I would, to a dear
brother
;
and, as you would guard the honour of a sister, I
entreat you to confine what I have said, to your own
bosom
.
Never breathe it to mortal, as you value my
friendship
.
Let me continue to be thought, by the world, a
happy wife. But, O, there is no happiness for me on this
side of the grave. How have the tenderest affections of
my heart been paralysed!---my hopes---how have they
been blighted!---laid prostrate before that sceptre, to
which we must all bowbut enoughLet me once
more beg of you, that you will commit this to the flames,
the moment that you have read it. It abounds with
errour
,
and, if I trust myself to read it over, I know that I
shall never send it.
May heaven bless you, and gather you into its own
fold, at last, is the sincere prayer of,
CATHARINE.
The second is as follows:
You are certainly a most wonderful being! How is it
that you can explore the secret recesses of my heart with
such accuracy? I have been wishing to speak to you on
the subject of your letters, but never could get an
opportunity
.
That person whom you have pictured from your
own imagination, was, indeed, all that you suppose. He,
like you, could read every emotion of my soul, by
looking
in my face. He had all your enthusiasm; all your
warm, impetuous, generous feeling, but none of your
levity
or
infidelity
. Add to this, that he was the
companion
of my childhood, from earliest years; and you will
not be surprised that I felt for him,more than I can
describe. That I lament his death, and ever shall, is
most certain, although I fear that I commit a sin by
doing
so. Yet I cannot help it. With regard to your
advice
,
I will try to profit by it, so far as I shall consider
it my duty; and so far as it is consistent with sincerity
But I never can act the hypocrite. I can avoid dispute,
it is true, by being silent; but, to practise the arts of the
most abandoned of my sexnevernever!You do
not know me
yet
, if you think me capable of deceit. No
I am resigned to my fate, if it be even to drag out the
remainder of my life, without loving or being beloved,
by any human being. You ask me if you had not better
abandon the house? I am selfish enough to say
no;
but,
if you can be happier any where else I answer
yes
, yes,
by all means. Although it would grieve me to part with
you,pain me not to meet you as I have been
accustomed
to, now and then, in this cold world, yet I entreat
that you will make no sacrifice on my account. This is
the last time that you will see the trace of my pen
unless
something unforeseen should occur. I have been
guilty of a very great imprudence. FarewellI feel
vexed with myselfbut when I see you, and attempt to
speak, I never can say what I would. May you be as
happy as I wish you, in time and in eternity! * * *
Bristol, (R. I.)
Sept.
.
I have been here nearly three weeks; and have not seen
a line from any one at home, with the exception of a few
words from my poor cousin. Am I not treated with the
most unparalleled neglect and cruelty? Had I searched
the world over, I could not have met with another being
so unkind. I have written letter after letter to him; but
they all remain unanswered. Nayhe told me when I left
home, if I did not receive the money from the estatenever
to return to him; for he would never see me again. I do
sincerely believe, that it is his wish that I never should.
I have only to submit to it a little longer. I left home
with reluctance, more especially, as I had not seen you,
my only friend, for so long a time. My own feelings
warrant me in claiming your friendship; for I feel for
you
a sentiment the most pure and exalted; a sentiment
that neither time nor absence can alter or diminish. It
is founded upon the most imperishable basisthat of
gratitude
;
and strengthened and confirmed by a thorough and
intimate acquaintance with your heart and character.
I have received much attention here. There are
several
genteel families about; and I have had invitations for
every day in the week. My health is much better than
it has been for a long time, notwithstanding the fatigue
of the journey. And, after a while, I shall be able to
enjoy
myself, I hope, if that can be called enjoyment, in
which the heart has no share. We had a delightful
excursion
,
lately, to a mountain in this neighbourhood. It
commands a beautiful and extensive prospect. But I
thought, while I stood upon it, how much its beauty would
have been enhanced, had you been near me. I think of
you every day, and almost every hour in the day. I am
interested in every thing which relates to you; and even
Mr. Stonebridge does not pray with more sincerity for
your happiness, than I do.
Poor Mary!you think that she will be unhappy.
Heaven
forbid. Were she my child, dear as she would be to
my lone heart, I would follow her cheerfully to the grave,
rather than her fate should resemble mine. But I will
not think of it. My suffering hath taught me to fix my
hope upon somewhat less fleeting than earthly enjoyment.
I am ashamed to send this scrawl; but it has been
written
in such a hurryyou must excuse it. * * * *
D d
The next, in order, my dear brother, is the following:
I have once ventured to ask Molton the name of the
woman
;but
he silenced me, forever. I shall never dare
to repeat the question.
Can it be possible, my beloved friend and brother!
Are you indeed about to forsake us. This is an
unforeseen
event, truly. But I have suspected it, more than once,
during your last visits, from your countenance. YesI
was sure that you had something of the kind in
contemplation
.
I am not at all surprised at it. Your feelings
have been too often put to the trial; and your
sympathizing
heart cannot bear to witness any longer, the
suffering
of one, for whom you have professed, and for whom,
I believe, you truly
feel
, a friendship. Dear and sacred
will be the memory of that friendship to my heartI
cannot
tell you how I feelI have wet the paper with my
tears. I cannot bear to write
farewell
. May I ask you
sometimes to think of me; and, when I am gone to another,
and a better world, will you look upon my poor boy, and
be a friend to him;upon my babe, if it survive me, and
bless it. I shall not be long here. It is impossible that
I can wear much longer in this way. But while I do
live, my prayer shall be offered up for your prosperity
and happiness, both here and hereafter. May we meet
in heaven!
Farewell, once more
.
THE LAST.
I have just read the manuscript that you left with me,
and thank you, in sincerity of heart, for this mark of
your continued esteem and confidence. I rejoice that
you have been able to extricate Mr. S. How he must
have felt! Situated as he is, I do sincerely hope that this
may be the termination of all his difficulties, and all his
sufferings. I have much to say to you, my dear friend,
of my own concerns. I feel a melancholy gratification
in making
you
acquainted with all my trial and
trouble
.
No human being knows of them except yourself.
You have seen me appear cheerful and happy, since my
return,to the world I mean. But O, how different
have been my real feelings!I have been abused, O, so
bitterly, so shamefully* * * * * *
Never before has there been such indifference, such
unkindness, so unprovoked, so deliberate and habitual,
shown to me. During my absence, I never received a
line;and a letter from one that was dear to me
You see what an opinion that friend has of my
married
stateshe is my relation,but I would not have
her
know, for the world, what I suffer. I cannot bear to
be pitied. * * * * *
You seem to think that I have enjoyed some happy hours
since my ill-fated marriage. Nevernever; unless it be
from the happiness that my dear little ones have afforded
me. I have never known any other. My life has been
a continual martyrdom. Not an hour have I known,
when my heart could approve of his conduct. Our
minds, and pursuits, and feelings, and sentiments, are
diametrically opposite. But this heartless indifference is
even worse than hatred. Yet I am now determined to
bear up against it all, and not suffer it to make such an
impression on me, as it has doneheretofore. I feel that
I shall be supported through it all; for the All-wise
Disposer
of events never lays more upon us, than we are
able to bear. While you visited us, I lived
comparatively
happy. The respect and attention, with which
you invariably treated me, made a transient impression
on him; but it soon passed away. Do not write to me
I charge you. This requires no answer. It is
written
on the spur of the moment, after having read the
manuscript; beside, there is a fascination in your
writing
,
which I do not wish to feel. I try to banish you
from my mind, as much as possible. This, you will
say is
kind
but it is the simple truth, and I cannot tell
you anything else. Farewell.
There, my dear brotherthe whole of his life is now
before you. What think you of Molton, now?
Yours, brother, heart and soul
.
JOHN.
JULIET TO SARAH.
O bless you, Sarah, bless you!I accept your offer, with
a full heart and overflowing eyes. O, you know not
what you have saved me from,but I cannot tell you,
I dare not---I only say that I am ready to lie down upon
my bed, and weep till the hour of our meeting. When
shall it be?----I am not impatient, not
very
impatient,
dear Sarah----but let it be as soon as possible. Can I
not join you? It may be a long time before you return
to New York;----and, in the mean timeBut no!
that were unworthy of me. I will await your own good
time. Sarah---I wish that you could see me;---my hand
shakes with a strange convulsion; and, just now, when I
arose to tie up my hair, which had fallen over my face,
and blinded me, I was struck with the change in my
own countenance. What does it portend?---
Am
I to be
happy yet!----O, righteous heaven, pity me; have
compassion
on me!----else may kindness do, what
suffering-humilation
,----the
approach of death has left undone---
make me forget
thee
. Sarah, I cannot write intelligibly---
farewell:---heaven bless thee----do not omit an
opportunity
to write to me, do not----you can have no idea what
a sweet consolation it is to meStay, I have read this
over. I have half a mind to tear it: yet something must
be said; and, if I trust my heart to tell its gratitude, there
is no knowing how unwise and pestilent a babbler it
may become.----So----go it must; but remember, I do
not complain. I betray no one----I accuse no one. I
only say that I am unhappy----very,
very
unhappy; and
that, the sooner I am in the arms of my own dear Sarah,
the sooner I shall be happy.---Farewell----farewell!---
The route to Quebec will be delightful---Ah, I wish that
I were with you.----
JULIET.
SARAH TO JULIET.
I promised to continue my journal. Lo! here it isI
copy it, just as it was written, with all my pencil
annotations
,
on the road.
Portsmouth ferry
What a beautiful river!and
what multitudes of fish. The name, too is remarkable,
and would indicate a strange affinity, between the Latin,
and the Indian tongues. Wrongthe Latin is a
language
,
the Indian a
tongue
a tongue is a dialecta
dialect
is ait is called
Piscataqua
that was the original
name too. The Indians say, that, it is, in their language,
the water of fish
. It is so in Latin. But there are other
instances
,
I am told, of the same kind. The current is
very
strong; and we cross in a wide curve. There is a
navy-yard in sight, where, I am told they are building
some three-deckers. We are now in old Massachusetts
again. This town is
Wells
. But what can I say of it?
Nothing.
Kennebunk
.A pretty place, with an air of bustle and
impatience, that pleases me. The tavern keeper, with
his surly good humour, good face, and gouty feet, is quite
an oddity. On the whole, there is an air of
picturesqueness
here, that strikes me.
Saco
.We are now approaching the capital of the new
state, that
is
to be. This is a marvellous, neat, snug
cluster
of habitations. The houses are of board,
(frame
, as we
call them)
wooden
they are called hereand painted,
chiefly white;which has a lively, bright air, when
contrasted
with the deep green of the turf and trees about, and
the clear blue sky. There is, I am told, a good deal of
fashion
and gentility here; and I dare say that it is true. For
I have always observed that, in these little towns, there
is (bating their scandal, which is less in quantity, and
sharper in quality, than with us)a general fondness
for convivial, sociable intercourse. Having more leisure
and being few in number, they huddle together,
without
much etiquette; and therefore, soon learn, all but the
parade of fashion, by learning to be agreeable. Have
you ever been in a country ball room? Did you never
observe
D d 2
the striking difference between the
gentility
of the
men, and that of the women? With the exception of the
village lawyer, a doctor perhaps, and some young
shopkeeper
,
the beaux are always rough-hewn, awkward
creatures
,
who scarcely know how to sit in their chair;
and dance, generally, in purple gloves, that discharge
their dye, like a steeped poppy,so stiff in the fingers too,
that few can succeed in shutting the hand. They are
like an iron gauntlet, without joints;while the women are
really well bred and almost fashionable. Whence is
the difference? I have asked Frank. He is running
over at the eyes, with pleasure;half crazy, I believe,
with one adventure after another. He says that there
is less difference in the employments, of women, than in
those of men. The woman of the village, and the lady
of the city, spend their time chiefly in the house.
But with the men, it is widely different. In the country
they are exposed night and day, to toil, and wind and
rain.
Voila la difference
.
This has been a great place for the
lumber
trade.
You know what
that
is. It is the place of a hundred
mills;but there has just happened a tremendous rise of
the river. It is all white and roaring, at this moment
and the bridges are all carried awayand many mills;
and, as far as the eye can see, the water is covered with
pine logs, tumbling and pitching about, in their way to
the ocean, with here and there, a little boat dancing like
a cork in the foam,carrying some men, who are busy
in picking up their stray lumber. It is very perilous, I
am toldAh!
At that moment, a boat upset, in sight of my window;
but no lives are lost. The poor creatures are just landed,
almost under where I sit. Our house is full,
uncomfortably
full; for, all the travellers are stoppedeach way;
and, it is with the greatest difficulty that the mail is sent
across. Such swells and inundations are called
freshets
.
They are caused by great rainsin the
up country;
melting
of the snows; and breaking up of the ice.
Portland
Wellhere we are, at last, in one of
the most delightful places, I verily believe, to be
found in the world. The weather is charming; and
we have just returned from a walk, to what they call
the Observatory. It is a tall red tower, built of pine, to
be sure, with a fine telescope at the top. It stands on a
high hill, from which you look down upon the coloured
roofs of innumerable houses, mingled with innumerable
trees. It is a beautiful fashion they have here, of planting
trees, along the streets, and putting every house into a bed
of foliage. It cools the air, and consumes that part of it
which is pernicious to animal life; purifies it; gives
shadow and beauty to the whole town; and has the
pretty
effect of making it appear three times as large as it
is. Portland is quite an amphitheatre, from the water.
There is a spacious bay in front of usthe bluest
water
in the worldall covered over with little islets, that
look like spots of green turf; and all along the horizon, on
one side, is a line of irregular greenlike surging
emerald
,
over which the white dazzling spray dashes,
incessantly
;
it is like an embankment of mossdrifting up.
There
is a light-houseand
there
are two neatly
constructed
forts. Just behind it, is another, that was
built during our revolutionary war. Before us, on the
hill, a heavy, but ruinous battery, bearing evident marks
of having been visited by the enemy, in other days; the
guns are broken and dismounted, and the intrenchments
levelled. Just below, however, almost on a level with the
water, is a formidable battery, recently constructed, in
consequence, I am told, of a threat made by the British
commander on the station, to enter, and cut out the
Enterprize
and
Boxer;
for, it was into this port, that she
brought her prize, says a gentleman that is with us, a
fidgetty, active, good natured, good-for-nothing sort of
a man, as I am used to call just such another one of your
acquaintance, to whom the Emperour Alexander once sent
a ring: O, by the way, did you ever hear the reason? It
was
admirable;a genuine
yankee trick
. He first
sent the Emperour a copy of the life of the
Czar Alexander
of
Russia
, magnificently bound, written and printed in
England!---a matter which might have cost three or four
dollars. In return for which, could the Emperour do less?
The Emperour sent him a ring, about the size of a shoe
buckle, in which a couple of hundred bits of broken
diamonds
,
are so managed, as to dazzle and blind many a
beautiful pair of eyes, that have attempted to count them.
Gracious! who knows but the Emperour may have had
that very ring upon his imperial finger---taken snuff in
it, perhaps!---O,---it reminded me of Henry fourth,
and his turnip,---so good a bargain. But let me return,
if I can, to the subject. Our guide was amazingly like
him---extremely polite, on account of our appearance, I
suppose---for, while he was with us, he appeared neither
to hear nor see any body else. He had been every where;
and seen every thing; and talked incessantly, with his
hat in his hand. He was the first on board of the Boxer,
after the battle. It was fought, almost within sight of
him. Her deck was covered with blood and brains---the
scuppers were running yet; and he saw two men shake
hands, who had been aiming and firing at each other, for
twenty minutes, during the battle. Each had killed or
wounded every body about the other; and the last shot
that was fired, struck a man in the mouth that stood by
the side of him. The mast was full of balls, too. But
how did you manage to fire so much faster than I? said
the Briton. I'll tell you, said the American. O, it was
a neat thing;my mess mate, in the fore-top, was
woundedso he lay down, and bit off the ends of the
cartrages; and primed for me, while I loaded.
This has been a place of great busines; but a series of
misfortunes and disorders, had reduced it, exceedingly.
Of late, it has taken a new start; a monkish superstition
has given way to the rational dominion of festivity;
business
has a wakened; rash and adventurous speculation is
done with; and things have settled down, into a
substantial
and healthful tranquillity. People are contented now,
with moderate and certain profits, in their business; and
there is an air of comfort and good sense about them,
that I love to meet with. Some religious factions have
existed, they sayand I am promised an introduction to
[8]
[8]
Ah, the secret is out! This courteous gentleman had heard of my poor father's
respectability
.How
amiable and disinterested.
the two rival chiefs. One, I am told, is a mild, gentle
creature, with a heart overflowing in benevolence and
sincerity; the other, equally sincere, but more ambitious,
and tremendously austere. The last prevailed for a term,
and darkened all the habitations of enjoyment. But the
reign of the other is now established; and things go on
pleasantly, rationally, and with a sufficient degree of
solemnity, even for a religious people.
This town was burnt, during the revolution, in a most
cruel, and wanton manner, by a wretch, whose name they
will not pronounce, even in execration, lest he should be
remembered; and I have just trodden upon the ground,
where Sullivan says that a sort of Indian battle was
once fought, many years before the Revolution.
Monday Evening
.I have been unable to write till
now. The women are very beautiful here; and some
singularly intelligentbut the menthey are
so---so
. I
speak of the young men; for, with two or three
exceptions
,
they have proved a very tame, insipid, spiritless
set to me. They affect to admire me; but there is no
character in their admiration. I had rather have a
blunt fellow wring my hand, till the blood spirts out of the
nail---in sincerity, than listen, forever, to the
chattering
of these magpies, however pleased they may really
be with me. But I lately spent an evening here in a
society of women, who would have done honour, to any
city in the world. Indeed, I never saw so many truly
fine women assembled together before. I saw a great
deal of plain unaffected good sense; and really very little
pretension, or prettiness, or affectation.It is true, that
they look much younger to a southern eye, than they
really are; for, a woman of two or three and twenty, here,
looks more fresh and youthful, than many of sixteen or
seventeen with us. And I have made an acquaintance
with one who astonished me, by telling her age, the
moment
that I alluded to her appearance, without the
slightest expression, either of concern or candour. She
was twenty-seven!Juliet!she does not look so old as
your humble servant. Twenty-seven!upon my word,
I have a prodigious fancy to know, how I shall feel and
look when I am twenty-seven.
Saturday we had a sort of a water party, to see the
fortsand eat
chowder
. That is no laughing matter,
here, I assure you. A large fish is caught, if possible;
if not, many small onesand soused in, head and ears,
into a large kettle of water,into which, biscuit, and
herbs, and one thing and another are put, until the whole
makes (with a plenty of pepper) a thick, indescribable
dish, which I really found quite palatable. This, you will
observe, is cooked in the open airand by the
beaux
,
with whom it is a matter of no little jealousy and
competition
.
We had some tolerable singingand were
politely treated, at the fortsbut we were well nigh
getting
most nobly ducked, if not something worse, on our
disembarkation; and returned, drenched, wet, and cold,
and weary. But that is a part of the amusement. It would
hardly be thought a water-party, else. Frank is half
frantick. The admiration of the women, by the way,
is not very equivocally expressed;but that we must
forget, when we recollect that the males have all
burrowed abroador scampered off; and that a good
fellow
is no light matter among such a multitude of
unmarried
women.But, Frank says, he would not mind
a
sleigh-ride
in such company! You, have heard him
describe
one that he hada ballcold roomscold feet
cold suppercold sickness at the stomachcold giddiness
of the headreturning lateno fireand going into a
bed, cold as a snow drift, with feetfeeling as if they
belonged toanybody but the owner.
BathBrunswick
.We are now at Bath. We
passed
through several pleasant places on our route; the last
of which was Brunswick. Here is the Bowdoin College;
a very respectable institution. I met a Mr. Cleveland
there, who, Frank says, is a man of uncommon science,
as a mineralogist, geologist, and conchologist(I
believe
these are the names;)that he has published a
book, which is the established text book, in the science,
at some of the universities of Europe. I liked the man.
His manner was plain and unpretending. He showed
us a respectable cabinet, and some decent pictures;in
return for which, happening to hear him ask Frank, if
if he had any acquaintance with German, I played off,
very adroitly, I assure you, some of my scholarship. I
begged,
modestly
, like the red coat, before Pope, (for, I
confess, I thought of
him
, at the time,) to be permitted
to look at the passage. I was able to explain it. And,
I thought, if ever the poor man had kissed any woman
but his wife, that he would have jumped into my arms.
His dark, manly eyes, sparkled fire. He was a
beginner
,
he saidand had never heard it pronounced. I read
two or three sentencesand we parted. What should
you
say, to my learning chymistry? I assure you, that it is
considered, here, quite a common thing, for a lady. Mr.
C. has made it popular and fashionable;he is an
admirable
lecturer, and lectures every season,
to ladies
. This
town is built on a perfect leveland is remarkable, I
dare say, for nothing. There are a great number of saw
millssome studentsplenty of pigeons; and, what they
call,
huckleberries
(whortleberries, I suppose.)
Bath
is a small, but very pleasant town. I am quite
pleased with it. Here lives the brother of our Rufus
King; an ambitious, strong-minded, awkward,
unprincipled
,
ignorant man, with considerable talent for
intrigue
and
military talent enough, to construct a
redoubt
,
lately, of pine-timberthe splinters of which,
when struck by a ball, would infallibly have done ten
times the mischief, that the ball would, if it struck a
whole platoon. So, says a mischievous fellow, here, who
seems to delight in caricaturing, with a great air of
pleasantry, whatever passes through his mind.
Wiscasset
.Here we are, at last, half dead with
fatigue
,
over the vilest road in the world. With this little
place, I am delighted. I shall never think of it, but with
affection
.
I am greeted and welcomed here, with that
cordiality
,
which we give to relations. I shall stay some
days here.
Thursday
.I am about to depart. I have made some
pleasant acquaintances; among others, a clergyman now
here on a visit;a very extraordinary man. He is
settled
in Bath; but they are about to lose him, as he
cannot
make up his mind to downright starvation. He is a
scholar, a gentleman, and a christian. There is a
Boston
lady here, tooa Miss R, with whom I should
be proud and pleased to renew my acquaintance. But
how unlikely it is!alas, my dear Juliet, it is a
melancholy
thoughtto part smilingly, and
forever!
---I cannot
bear it. It were better, I think sometimes, that we had
never met. I have found a sweet little creature here, too;
who, I am afraid, is about to be married. I shall never
forget Wiscasset, or its hearty, hospitable, intelligent,
and polite people.
Waterville
.--The pleasantest village in the world!
said Frank, the moment that we entered it. We are now
within eighty miles, I am told, of Quebec, in a right
line. Indeed, it is a beautiful placea few neat
dwellings
;
and all so happy and rural. Frank has just
returned
.
Would you believe itwe are close at home.
Here
here
, within a stone's throw, lives my beloved
aunt! O, I do feel happy. I must run to her.
Evening
.I
am
happy, Julietonce more, I am
really
happy. My dear aunt knew me, immediately. She
weptand fainted. I knew her characterI expected
it. She is a noble-looking woman; but sorrow and
disappointment
have broken her down. She says that my
resemblance to my mother is striking. I can scarcely
remember
her
. She was the younger sister, it appears;
but no more at present. I am happy. Frank appears
very cloudy and distressed, of late. For two or three
days, he has been remarkably silentand I have caught
his eyes dwelling upon me, sometimes, with a singular
expression. When I say, What is the matter,
cousin
?you
frighten me. He attempts to smileBe of
good heart, dear Sarah, he saysall will go right
I have only recovered my senses. Well, wellI will
not trouble myself about it. It was naturalthese
artificial
spirits of his have passed offand languor and
depression
are the natural consequences. Yet, somehow,
I do feel a little cold about the heart, as if some other
calamity
what,
I know notwere near to me.
Perhaps he is out of temper. He has been
inconceivably
annoyed, in all directions, on this road. He has been
repeatedly gazed at, followed, and questioned, as general
Ripley. I never saw the general; but, the resemblance
must be very extraordinary, indeed, to be observed here;
for, we are told, that he once lived in this village, and
practised law for some time. Frank is not so tall, nor
so old; and beside that, he has very handsome teeth, while
the front ones of the general are gone. Yet,
nevertheless
,
when sitting, he has been addressed as
general
, by
persons that knew him well. Even their voices are
alike.
I forgot to describe
Hallowell
and
Augusta
, two
towns upon the Kennebeck; or, rather, we passed through
them so rapidly, that I had no time. I am told,
however
,
that the people are active, polite, and kind to
strangers; and the situation and appearance of both
towns are very pleasant. I should like to reside in them,
awhile, I think.
Ah, Sarah.Frank has just left me. The mystery is
explained. He brought an open letter in his hand. He
sat down by me.He prepared mebut his heart was
full, and his hand shook the whilefor what I was to
expect.
My father was a bankrupt
. Does it shock you,
Juliet. I know not whyit may be apathy in meit
may be, that my sensibility is deadened by recent
suffering
it
may be, that I do not yet know the value of
what I have lostbut, at this moment, Juliet,if thou
wert near me, I would bid thee lay thy hand upon my
heartIt aches not. It is neither colder nor warmer---
more nor less hurried, or agitated, than before.
Perhaps
it is that I expected something more terrible.----I
did---I know not what---but this certainty, is really a
relief to me.
I shall send this, immediately. I shall now abandon all
thought of Quebec. Frank will leave me here, awhile,
and return to look into the estate. It may not be so
bad, as we fear;but, in the mean time, my sweet Juliet
will believe me, when I say, that my
only
sorrow is
that I have no longer a habitation for her.Perhaps
you have received my letter perhaps!Oh! that I
could pray that you may not. May it miscarry!if the
E e
offer were never madenever acceptedthe
disappointment
will be less cruel.Heaven only knows when we
shall meet, now.Farewell! farewell!
SARAH.
JOHN TO SARAH.
Let me entreat you, dear Sarah, to make Juliet leave
Jane and the family, without losing a day. I have my
reasons. I have just left her. I have had a mortal
quarrel with Jane.I will never set my foot within
her door again. But what will become of Juliet?O
save her! save her!Does Grenville wrong her?By
heaven, Sarah, I will see himsee him, immediately;
and, if that blessed creature hath aught to complain of
from himI know not what I am writing.---He is
constantly
thereand just now, when I entered unexpectedly,
Juliet was weeping----and Jane stood near her, her
countenance
inflamed with passion. What does it mean?
There was that devil of a Matilda, too----her arms
crossed so meekly upon her lap,and hell and death about
her eyes and lips---Offer Juliet your home immediately---
immediately! there is not a moment to lose.
JOHN.
JOHN TO FRANK.
Annapolis, Md.
Frank!---Frank!---Lock your hands upon your heart---
go down upon your knees. It is true after all----true.---
William was murdered
. Yes!----
and Edward Molton
was the murderer
. Lord, God! what a complication
of horrour and crime has been revealed to me.
Now listen.----Last evening, I had been to Jane's.
Something that I saw, displeased me; and I left the house
in wrath. I came here, and scribbled a line or two to
Sarah---for God's sake, Frank, do you enforce it---send
for Juliet---Let not a day---not an hour pass---I will go
for her----I will tear her away, by force----sword in
hand---from the devils that beset her.
I went to Molton's. It was moonlight. He
proposed
a walk;---and the temperature of the evening was so
soft and pleasant, that his physician consented; and we
wandered together for more than two hours. I never heard
Molton's true voice before. I never before saw him in
such a temper. God!he underwent a transfiguration
before
my very eyes---he walked out, in spirit, like an
archangel
.
I was uplifted, awed and borne away, by his great
eloquence. It was unearthlythe deep, deep utterance
of an acquitted, anointed rebel. It grew dark; and we
returned
by a way that was unfrequented. The wind rose;
and, at last, Molton himself confessed, that he knew not
where we wereat this moment. I thought that I could
perceive a ruined building nearI was right. It was
soand a part of our own tenement. I was amused, when
I discovered the truth, for it had never appeared to me
before
as it did then. I had been bewildered, and had never
approached it before, on the same side. We entered, and
were advancing with outstretched hands, when Molton
suddenly caught my arm. My blood retreated. He
breathed
like one, at his last gaspbut not a sound escaped from
his lips. He stoppedput his hand to his foreheadand
disappeared. A moment after, he returnedhe took
my hand. His own was cold as death. He appeared to
have made some discovery. His track was like an
Indian
upon the scent of his prey. His eyes flashed---I
could see them sparkle, though it was very dark. He
compelled me to follow him, by main force; and I did,
along by the broken wall---to a green spot---where the
great oak stands;---he paused there, for a moment---and
stood like one, trying to recall some forgotten thing----
but then a sudden recollection seemed to strike him. Some
sound, I know not what, escaped between his set teeth;
and he dashed through the shrubbery. I thought that he
was mad, but I followed him---he struck the doors aside---
one after the other, while he passed on, as with an iron arm;
and he jarred the whole house with his tread. At last, we
stood in the centre of my own room.
By the everlasting God! he oried, then----This
accounts for it! Yes---yes!--
there
is the very closet!--
that
the door---
there
--fool!---madman!---why did I not suspect
the truth?---Those spots of blood!---smoking, absolutely
smoking under my nostrilsthe whole house quivering
with the unbidden presence!mortal spasms, affecting even
material things!---My sleep broken---my senses
disordered---my
heart crumbling---and yet,---the truth---the
truth
never suspected, before! John Omarcome here---
here!
There
place your foot
there
!---a little more this
way. Look at me---can you see my face?---Look at me,
and listen. You are standing on blood. What blood?---
blood, shed by this hand---
this?
---whose?---the blood of
your cousin William! What! do you stagger! are you
not ashamed? Look at me---beholdLo! I set my foot
upon
the spot. Do I tremble? No. Yet---with this hand, I
slew him---and the spot where his blood rattled out, is
yet hot to the bottoms of my feet. It was just such a
night as this. Yes---guard the door. I am your prisoner,
am I?---fool! were you twenty times the man that you
areI could rend you, limb from limb, ere you were
able to utter a loud cry. Beware how you provoke me.
Hear me out---or, where I stand---on this very spot, will
I tread
your
heart into the solid wood, as I did
his
. Hear
me. It is the retribution of heaven. I am constrained
to speak. It is against my will. It was just such a
night as this. I had been unhappy---mad, it may be;---
for after the deed, I
was
mad. In that way, do I account
for the tremendous fact, that I have held communion
with the murdered man, night after night; slept within
smell of the blood, that I had let out---travelled, through
and through, the apartments of his habitation; and never
knew; never suspected; never dreamt that I was within
them---or near them, till this moment.
Helen heard our voices, and entered with a light.
Never did I see such a countenance as his, when that
light struck it. It was dislocated marblerigid--white
and the sweat was on it, like the night dew.
WomanBegone! said he.
She hesitated---looked terribly alarmed---I command
thee, Helen
leave
me!---
dear
Helen, do not trouble me,
now.---But leave the light. I will be with thee, anon---
Go, Helen!go dear.
She departed. Molton resumed his incoherent speech;
and, during the whole scene that followed, he never
stirred his feet, nor his hands; but, on he went, on, on
forever, like a speaking corpse.
Why did I not know the spot?---it was winter then,
the trees were leafless---the habitation desolate---the earth
wet, and soaking to my tread.
Your cousin insulted me. I smiled. He cursed me in
the bitterness of his wrath, and hatred. I bore it all.---
Many eyes were upon me, but I bore it; for, I had learnt
what it is to have the blood-dew abide upon the
blossoming
heart. I was patient---
very
patient; but, human
patience
hath its limits. He would have struck me. His
arm was raised---it was about to descend. I retreated---
for I knew that, if it touched me, in the descent, I
should shatter it to the shoulder. Nay---I knew that, ere
he could raise his hand again, my knife---I always carry
one---see here---
this
knife, would be buried, up to the
handle
in his side---I promised to meet him.
Alone
,
said he, menacing me.---Alone, said I. Your
weapon
?
said he. I care not, was my reply. But on
second thought, I named the small-sword. He assented.
My reasons were simple. I was a pretty good
swordsman
.
I might disarm, or wound him. I could do as I
pleased, about killing him. At any rate, swords were less
fatal than pistols; for both could not well be killed
with swords; and I was the challenged person. We met,
at the time, and on the spot agreed upon. You have
stood upon it. His body is buried under the very tree,
beneath which we first measured blades. I provided
against any accident; for I knew that he was desperate;
and, as I had never seen him play, I thought it probable
that he would shorten his blade, and close upon me.---
That might be fatal---and, therefore, I had prepared an
exculpation of
him
, and left it upon my table, with the
original correspondence between us. He, I soon found,
E e 2
had done the same. We met in silence.---I never shall
forget his look. It was a pale moonlight, much like this
which led us abroad to-night. His eyes were of a
preternatural
brightness, but his lips were deadly pale.---
His bearing had been noble---but very arrogant toward
me; and I gathered from his whole aspect now, that he
was determined to kill me, at all hazard. I
determined
to prevent it. We fought. I disarmed him, once---
and broke his sword; but the point wounded me in the
sword arm. I asked him if he was satisfied. He
answered
sullenly,
no
.---He grappled me by the throat, as
he said thisbut I broke loose from him, and dashed him
against the tree. In the struggle, my sword was broken,
or I should assuredly have slain him. We stood awhile,
then, panting and breathing. I was exhausted, by loss
of blood.The trampling of horses' hoofs, sounded near
us; and we were fain to delay our combat for awhile. I
would not have believed that such a mortal deadlessness
could exist in one so young. But so it was.Follow
me, said he.We shall find arms. I followed him,
weak and dizzy. He strode onwardand I never
looked
to the right nor left, until we stood in a large room,
that I had never been in before. The moon shone
through and through it.He took a pair of pistols from
that very closet.His breathing was loud, and the only
words that passed, were
Where are we, sir?
No matterthe house is uninhabited.
He offered me the pistol. I refused, again, and again.
I was unwilling to kill himand, perhaps, afraid to die.
I felt less confidence. He pressed me sorelyhe levelled.
I refused to raise mine. He called me by every
opprobrious
namecowardscoundreland liar. I shook,
with terrour and rage. My blood retreated from my
heart. A murderous thought aroseit might have died
but for him. I could have strangled itbut the
madman
,
weary of delay, and impatient for my blood, sprang
upon me, again; and, as he did, he pronounced a word
a single word;it was only a name, but it was the name
of one that I lovedO God!more than anything
dead or alive---in heaven or earthhe pronounced
that
name
her
nameand coupled it with dishonour.
What followed, I hardly know. Our pistols rang
together
we
were blinded and stunned by the smoke and
noisewe grappled, and felland
here
---
here
, where I
now stand---I first came to my senses. My knife was in
a dead man's heart---I was griping it, by the handle; and
my fingers were cramped---he was cold, cold---and the
moon had gone down---the smoke had all gone---and the
whole house was silent as death. I arose---I was stiff
and sore---I had but a dim recollection of what had
passed---I
recollected it, however, gradually; but I felt no
emotion---none. There was a preternatural sternness
and calmness in my movement. I took hold of his hand
---I lifted it---it was clenched---and it adhered to mine,
strangely, for a moment;---but, I shook it off, and it fell,
with a dead, heavy sound, upon the floor. I raised the
head---it fell, with the same sound. I felt upon the floor
---how long it had been there, I knew not---but the blood
had become a thick coagulated matter. I waited there,
even there, in the darkness, for whole hours---sitting by
the bodywithout one emotion of terrour. At last, I
bethought myself of my safety. My plan was formed,
immediately. I took the pistols, and the body---and I
bore them to the tree, through the cold and horrible
darkness and silence---the sweat falling from my face, like
rain; and my shoes full of blood---partly my
own---partly
his. I laid him under the tree. Our broken swords,
I laid by him. Our pistols, just as they were, I left. I then
went into town, and caused a note to be left with you,
sirthe contents of which, you cannot have forgotten.
I know all your movements. But what could you do?---
It was evident that he had met me, armed against my
life. What evidence had you against me? None. The
wound, in his side, you had never seen---or, if you had,
it would have deceived a wiser man than you; for I ran
the blade of my sword into the same wound, after I had
stabbed him with the knife, that you might be deceived.
Are you willing to destroy me? Do your worst. Here
am I---a murderer, ready to accompany you, wherever
you may bid me. Let justice take its course. I am
weary of life.
O, Frank, what was there in the voice of this man, the
deep troubled voice, that so shook me? I felt as if
I
had
been the murderer. Frank!---can you believe it? I stood
before him, as if I were the criminal,
he
the judge. In
my heart, I pitied him---wept with him---yea, wept with
him.
And now, said he, I am about to depart. Never
will I sleep, again, under this roof. Sleep!---O, I know
not what sleep is. Let me sit down. I have something to
communicate. You have been disturbed at night---all that
have slept here, make the same complaint. This house was
once in your family. Will you accept of it, again? You
are welcome to it. I have spent a night in it, for the last
time. Give me your hand. My pulse, you see, is
regular
and full. Now listen to me. I am no believer in
spirits. I have taught myself to laugh at all tales that
relate to them, as the gossip of the nursery. Yet---I
cannot
stay here. Let me tell you what I have seen. I had
been here but two nights, when Helen awoke me, and
whispered that there was somebody in the room. I arose,
and searched every corner and hiding place, with my
sword. She is not a timid woman;---but, hardly had I
shut my eyes, when I heard her breathing change. I
looked up. Omar, I am not a man to be easily
disturbed
.
I do not depend upon my senses---
they
are fallible---
but I employ my reason. Yet I saw something, as
plainly
as I now see you, standing with its arms folded, near
that window---the attitude, I then thought, was that of a
wounded man. I continued to look at it, for some time;
but, as I arose, it went away. I returned to my bed. I
endeavoured to account for it, as an illusion. I shut my
eyes;---but it was not in my brain. Nor did I again see
it, although I tried every position, and watched all night.
My attention was then turned to Helen. She was
insensible
,
and white. I questioned her, when she recovered;
but all that she recollected, was, that after I had
returned
to bed, she felt strangely cold on one side, and,
happening
to look up, saw, or thought she saw, the face of
a dead man, close to mine.
Some time after that, we were alarmed again; but, I
ridiculed the whole, as a childish notion. We slept
here
,
then; and it was only by her continual persuasion, that I
removed to the chamber opposite. The servants
complained
of strange soundsas of people, walking about,
softly, in their stocking feet...and whispering....poor souls
and you, I remember, were cruelly disturbed. All these
things made their impression upon me: but, still, I
forbore
to confess my terrour. I was ashamed of itI
am still ashamed of it. But, one nightlisten to
me, patiently. It may never be your fate, to meet with a
man who can tell, so calmly, what he has seen; or one,
who appears so entirely master of himself, and
is
honest
and true.
I was walking, excessively fatigued, about two months
ago, along a desolate road, in this neighbourhood. There
was a thick mist in the wind. You have observed the
strange, foreign air, of this old town. The venerable
solidity, fashion and spaciousness, of the dwelling-houses
all standing apart and alonesurrounded by heavy,
well built wallswith towers, wings, arches, and
abutments
are
of another ageanother countryanother
race of men. What a profound silence, at this moment,
over the whole place! It is a perfect solitude; and every
dwelling house, of itself, is another solitude, totally
unlike
any thing else to be found in America.
You
are not
so sensibly affected with the silent, old fashioned feudal
grandeur of the habitations here, as I am. But, had
you never entered one of them, till you were a full grown
man, you would feel as I do. Just turn your head for a
momentlook through that narrow windowwhere
will you find such a tree as that?it looks as if it were
a thousand years old. That clear, deep water, too!I
remember that very glitter, on the night of which I speak
it was like a brightness in the air. Look there, too.
Indeed, sir, you must feel itevery man must feel,
standing
as we are now, alone, at night, in a vast chamber
like this, looking out upon the whole city of Annapolis,
that here dwelt the ancient nobility of
Maryland---haughty
and lonely. It looks dark and sullen, as the retreat
of decayed gentilityalmost baronial gentilityshould
look. Mr. Omar, I was never more affected with the
solemnity of the place, than on that night. I wandered,
I know not how long, nor hardly in what direction, with
my eyes upon the ground, continually asking myself
what had become of the ancient peoplewhose dwelling
places, about me, were no longer inhabited; or inhabited
by strangers to their blood, who had bought
manors and
castles
, literally, for a few hundreds of dollars. At last,
I found myself in the open fields, thereback of you
near the Severnjust in the centre of that beautiful
sweep, there, where all the waters run together, and
shut up the town;but still, I held on my way, for the
cool, fresh feeling of the wet turf, was pleasant to my
feetnow and then, looking about me for glimpses
of the water, and half inclined to go into it, and spend
the night there, in swimming about the full brink. I do
not well know how it happened, but, at last, I had fairly
lost myself. There was a thick mist in the aira
something
heavier than mista fog, that loaded down the
heart. I felt it, like a heavy weight, upon my blood.
I grew troubled, without knowing why;and, after a
whileI know not how long I had been rambling with
my head downhappening to look up, toward the
higher
groundnear the waterI saw, what I thought, a
man following me. It was late, and I was unarmed---
or, rather, I had no arms but this knife, which my
residence
in South America, gave me the custom of
wearing
.
But he kept opposite to me; and walked, I thought,
like one in distress. I approached him. He vanished.
I then thought that it was my own shadow, and produced
by some optical delusion; for such things have been. I
returned
to the very spotI saw it againI walked, but
the shadow stoppedI stood still, yet that walked. It
was
not
my shadow;because there was no lightno
moonno starit was only a sickly twilight. My
heart
did
feel cold at last, and my blood curdled. I
approached
;
it stood still, like one, sternly regarding me.
Nay, I could have sworn that I struck my knife into it,
once morefor I was desperate, with a strange
unnatural
ferocitywhen lo! I saw it walking before me
again, at a great distance, with long strides, and a noise.
less step. Even
then
, shall I confess it to you?I
thought of Williamthe manner appeared like hisand
my blood ran cold. Such was the effect, that I became
sick.
I have now done. I am satisfied. I do not say that
he
hath appeared to me. NoI choose to imagine that, what
I have seen, is a deception. But, I will not expose
myself
any longer, to such deception. It would drive me
mad. Farewell.Do with me, what you will. The
house is yoursfurniture and all. I shall leave it, this
hour, never to enter it again. I shall only send for my
books, and a few pictures, that
are
dear to me.
There, Frankwhat am I to do with him?I will be
governed by you. Write to me, immediately. As for the
house, I will have nothing to do with it. It is of no
great value, to be sure; and the furniture is mere rubbish;
but, although it is quite too serious a matter to accept in
this way---I am unaccountably affected. A strange
humour
is upon me. What think you? I have tried to
forget it all; but something
was there
, I am sure of it---
it was not the mere delirium of a fever! Tell medo
you believe it
possible
for the departed to re-appear?
How little this Molton is known? He makes no stir,
here, now; and the affair of poor William's death seems
to be forgotten.What shall we do?
JOHN.
MAD. VERNON TO JULIET.
God tempers the wind to the shorn lamb, my child.
Come to my arms. I have succeeded, at last, blessed be
heaven;I have succeeded! and all that I have, dear, is
thine. The decision was finally made, about a month
sincebut I feared to declare it, we have had so many
disappointments, until the money was actually in my
hands. It is so now, at this moment; and the power that
I have to make my sweet, dear Juliet, happy and
independent
,
is a compensation for all. Use no ceremony
no delaythe gentleman that bears this, will take you
immediately under his protection; and never leave your
side, till my old arms are about you. And thenO
Juliet
!my
child!my child!how happy we shall be!
Your tenderness, and patience, and piety, are now to be
rewarded. Noit is no longer necessary to expose thy
young heart, to aught that may covet it. Together, we
will livetogether die, now, dear, unless some great
heart shall learn thy valueand thine shall beat for it.
Come to me. I shall not sleep, till we meet.
CLAIRE VERNON.
ANSWER FROM JULIET.,
Oh, my motherit is too latetoo lateI am
married
.
JULIET R. GRENVILLE.
END OF VOL. I.Salem
.
Mr. Ramsay died last evening, between ten and
eleven
,
with little pain, and in the full possession of his
faculties
.
His daughter is seriously indisposed; but she has
the best medical attention in the country; and her
deportment
toward her father, during his short illness, has made
her many friends. Be assured, madam, that she shall want
for nothing. She wrote a note yesterday morning, and
gave it to me, with your address, requesting me, if the
event should be as we anticipated, to enclose it to you.
She took to her bed, immediately; or rather, we carried
her, by force, from the presence of her father, who
commanded
it; and she is now delirious. Mr. Ramsay
received
every attention and kindness, that he could have
received at home. A catholick clergyman, from Boston,
one of the most amiable and benevolent of men, was with
him all the time, during the last two days; and no human
being ever manifested more resignation, after he was
told that death was inevitable. At first, he was a good
deal agitated; yet, he told me, not an hour afterward,
that he
knew
he should die in my house, the first night
that he slept here. I laughed at the notion then, but it
was verified. He did die, in the very room, in the very
bed, and at the very hour which he had foretold. I have
had some experience in these things; and am willing to
attribute much to the imagination; but, when I see a
sober
,
sensible man, like him, yielding up to a belief that he
has seen a spirit---pardon me, madam, I am little inclined
to provoke a smile at such a moment; but, Mr. Ramsay,
not an hour before his death, told me, that his wife had
appeared to him, and summoned him. Was there any
thing remarkable in her death? I ask the question, from
some mysterious observations that I heard escape him,
in conversation with his daughter, respecting the matter,
when he was first taken ill. He told his physicians and
me, that nothing could save him; but, desired us not to
inform her. We tried all that we could, to divert his mind
from meditating on the subject. But all in vain. Even
medicine had no effect upon him. Can the mind
counteract
such things?neutralize our poisonsdilute and
dissipate the most corrosive, and fiery applications?
Is that sympathy so vital, that the blood cannot be
chilled
,
where the mind is preternaturally heated? It was,
in his case. Blisters were applied. They came off, as
they went on. His skin had lost its sensibility.
Purges
and emeticks were given. No effect was produced.
The stomach and bowels were impenetrable. Laudanum
followed; but, the only result was, a more mortal
coldness
in the extremities; no sluggishness, no torpor;
the blood, therefore, was beyond our dominion. It is
considered here, the most extraordinary case, within our
experience; but we are told that such things may be, in
the books; and our limited observation would seem to
confirm the position. Sudden fright, I have known to
produce deathand to restore drunken men. And the
sea-sickness, always ceases, when the danger of
shipwreck
is imminent.
I am, respectfully, dear madam,
Your most obedient, humble servant
,
GEORGE WALLACE.